After that, just as expected, Liliana's fame was climbing high with a momentum that pierced the sky. Even people who held no interest to manga and anime watched and read the dramatic and touching news and began to hold interest to Liliana's existence itself.



And then, Liliana freely used her inherent princess skill and responded to the people's wild enthusiasm in entirety.



And not just that.



The young man who was reformed from Liliana's words talked how Liliana was a being that was overflowing with kindness, that he was saved by her, that she was exactly the goddess of kindness and salvation who descended to the present world, and with a respond to a television's news coverage as the impetus, sometimes there were fan letters or blog posts with content that talked frankly about the sender's troubles reaching Liliana.



Naturally, Liliana wasn't able to personally go to resolve those troubles, and she also didn't have any intention to do such thing.



But, even though Liliana herself was unable, Liliana knew a lot of acquaintance who were able.



There was the chunibyou monk, or the yandere young daughter of a great conglomerate group, or the lawyer wearing a painful-to-look suit, or the group of one-sama who were running in full speed through the path of manly woman, or a doctor, or a detective, or an apparition, or an alien……



Of course, she also had a lot of connection that she obtained from her days of working part-time.



And then, Liliana was a former princess. She excelled in using people more than anyone else.



After that it went without saying.



With pure virtue and correct calculation, Liliana used her fans to help her troubled fans.



If you ask then you will be helped.



When such story spread, naturally the quality and quantity of people asking for help increased.



When six months passed, the number and content of the requests for help became something that Liliana couldn't possibly deal with by herself. However, if she said「I'm stopping already」here, a riot would occur with certainty. After that Liliana devised a plan while feeling that she became unable to pull out.



That plan was,



――Liliana Aid Network



Such thing, in a manner of speaking it was the starting up of a "jack of all trades".



The difference with the normal jack of all trades was how it didn't have any employee who would bind the contract or act at the scene other than employee that dealt with the paperwork.



Liliana who categorized the gathered troubles in the dedicated site, aggregated them, and scrutinized their degree of priority and the content would then make her judgment. And then, she would choose from among the registered members of her fan club the person capable to resolve that problem.



There wouldn't be any reward. If there was any reward, then it would be the direct call from Liliana that asked "please" and preferential right for her event. And then, the words of "thank you" that they received directly from Liliana at the dawn when the trouble was resolved.



But, this system was surprisingly functioning.



The Liliana fan club members with de~ep personality and who were ridiculed by a part of the community as bunches with dozens of screw loose in their head, they would move with the readiness to work like a slave for the sake of "please" and "thank you" from Liliana.



That was already a kind of great wave. The great wave that was sometimes generated at the turning point of the era, that also should be called as the flow of the world.



The saved people became fan club members, and then those members would then saved other people, and those people who were saved would become the fan club member.



That cycle was without end, and before long it surpassed Japan and spread even overseas. "Liliana Aid Network" became a foundation before she knew it and even began to reach out its hand toward world scale relief activity.



One time it stopped a regional dispute, one time it established infrastructure in a developing country, granted education and goods to unfortunate children, planted greenery on a completely withered land……



And then when she realized……



「「「「「Your Holiness-! Your Holiness-! Your Holiness-! Your Holiness-!」」」」」



「「「「Holy Mother of Kindness! Holy Mother of Kindness! Holy Mother of Kindness!」」」」



Hairihi Volunteer Association, became Hairihi Religion.



「How did it turn out like this……」



☆Living God Lily



「Uu, really, just how did it turn out like this……」



Liliana who was doing the final check of the paperwork while doing ten second charge inside the office in preparation for her conference with the secretary general, returned to reality from her long reminiscence that she did before she knew it. It was actually really like Liliana for her to verify her paperwork and eating simultaneously even while reminiscing. (TN: Ten second charge seem to be the slogan of a jelly drink in Japan.)



Liliana was unconsciously letting out her complaint while thinking that recently she wasn't able to meet Hajime and others again. But suddenly a reply came back in respond to her complaint.



「That's obviously because you are a princess.」



「Howah!?」



There should be no one other than her in this office. Naturally, Liliana who let her guard down because there should be strict security in this place raised a strange voice.



When she turned her gaze, she saw there a rift in space and the figure of Hajime who came out from there.



「Hajime-san! Geez, please don't startle me.」



「That can't be helped. Even though I'm your family, but in this place with a really strict security where the secretary general of the UN is also in attendance, how I can say something like 'I came because I just want to talk a bit though, I'm also family so please let me in'. There is a limit even in being unable to read the atmosphere.」



「……Hajime-san. Before I realized you have become someone who is trying to read the atmosphere. You have really become an adult. Just as I thought, a person will mellow when he have as many as seven children.」



And then, 'I'm always getting a late start……' saying that Liliana's shoulders dropped in dejection.



「Just what are you saying? Even though you cannot even go home enough from getting so busy with the work as the founder of a new religion.」



「Uguu. It's harsh getting told that.」



Liliana pressed on her chest as though she was getting stabbed, but she immediately pulled herself together and made a fearless smile.



「But, that too will be over soon. If I can have this association recognized as an official volunteer organization from this conference, I too will be able to beg off from all duty. In the content of the agreement with the UN, there are requirements to establish an inspection division that is configured with only UN personnel as a monitoring mechanism, and also a decision-making body that has to accept at least one person from every country where they will vote to make decision. This association will stop being an organization where anything is decided with the will of just me alone. It will be a democracy you know Hajime-san, democracy! Like that my authority will be shaved and I will fade out naturally from here!」



「……Is that kind of plan going to be okay?」



「It's fine, there is no problem. ……Fufu, if the conference this time can go well, then I will retire. And then, I too will make a child with Hajime-san and devote myself in parenting!」



「Somehow, it feels like you are raising up flag there.」



Hajime's expression turned lost for word seeing the holy woman going 'ehehe' in a trip of delusion about her calm and happy future.



「Oops, come to think of it, Hajime-san, you want to talk? You are coming expressly in this timing, does that mean there is anything important?」



Liliana noticed Hajime's expression and she went 'hah' and returned to her senses. She tilted her head and threw a question at Hajime to varnish over her act just now.



Still with a complicated expression on his face, Hajime said「Aah, there is nothing really important」while shrugging.



「Well, how should I say it……what I want to say is, I also quite like Lily who is working busily.」



「……That's a surprise attack. What's more, I feel really complicated whether I should be happy or not.」



Even while she was saying that, Liliana's cheeks were blushing red.



「Wh, why so suddenly? Saying that kind of thing in this kind of timing, isn't that exactly something like a flag?」



「I guess. But, I want to say it ahead just in case. Remember, quite some time has passed already since your workaholic behavior was identified, but in the end you are undertaking completely staggering job like this. You aren't addicted to work anymore, but in the end, Liliana S. B. Hairihi is unable to change her way of life, isn't that how it is?」



「That's……」



She retired from being a princess and wished to grasp the happiness like a normal girl――like that the kingdom's people saw her off and she came to this world. Even though it should be like that, yet right now Liliana was going to tackle a conference with the top of the world where her fate was at stake.



Even though she tried doing part-time work, even though she tried to become a shut-in NEET, even though she tried to become a manga artist, even though she tried to become idol, but in the end perhaps the path that the human called Liliana was walking would always ended up converging to a path where she took responsibility of many people and stood in the lead to guide them.



It was because she was a princess. It was because she couldn't stop being a princess.



Was it just as expected, that she was unable to live the way she aspired for? In the end, was a person like her an existence who would put her beloved as secondary?



Liliana's shoulders dropped and she answered her own question.



Hajime who was watching such Liliana with a wry smile slowly approached her side. And then, he gently pinched at the cheek of Liliana who was showing a depressed expression.



「I came here not to make you wear that kind of face. Didn't I say it? I also like Lily who is shutting herself inside the office like this while getting chased by work.」



「Hajime-san……」



「Isn't it just fine, even if your aspiration stay as aspiration. Isn't it just fine, even if you put your husband as secondary. It is also not bad in its own way even if there is at least one wife treating me roughly. You see, it's Liliana's individuality that other wives doesn't have.」



「I don't want that kind of individuality at allll」



Even while saying that, Liliana was fawning on Hajime by rubbing her cheek on Hajime's cheek.



「Well, that's how it is. Just go without getting too worked up. Because no matter where Lily is going, I'll properly run after you everywhere.」



「Fufu, thank you very much. Hajime-san. But, as I thought, I will do my best here. Because I am Liliana. A woman who won't let my aspiration stay just as aspiration. Or rather, I want a child.」



「That's what you're stressing on?」



They smiled at each other and their lips overlapped naturally.



But, at that time, a reserved knocking sound that sounded like it was being considerate to the two's tryst was resounding.



「Looks like it's time already.」



「Ou, go do your best, your holiness.」



「Geez, please stop saying your holiness. I am the chairman.」



After joking, they smiled once more at each other and Liliana left the room behind. She didn't look back at Hajime who was left behind and she straightened her back with dignity.



And then the result of the started conference.



Before the mass media, the UN secretary general declared with blushing cheeks.



「She is truly-, the goddess who descended into this world! She is a living god! Hairihi religion will bring about salvation to the world!」



The populace gathering outside the conference building while watching the broadcast in real time, and the people watching television, they all raised cheers simultaneously.



「How did it turn out like this!?」



The scream Liliana raised was lost among the cheers that were raised even by the press people and vanished in vain.



Before, at another world, an existence that introduced himself as a god talked about his ambition that he would also become a god in earth. He proclaimed that he would become the god in the new world for sure.



But, the result was that the mad god was defeated by the demon king.



And then right now, in the place of the mad god, a wife of the demon king――



Became the god (?) of the new world.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



In the middle I didn't know anymore what I am writing……



Thank you very much for the many requests.



I took notes of them, so I'm thinking that I want to try writing them someday.



Something like Tio and Hajime getting spirited away, or Shia going bunnies in world of martial arts, or Yue and Hajime tackling underground world……or Remia……she is difficult~



After that, I'm thinking that I also want to try writing a bit long extra story.



The next posting is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 229




AN: I'm sorry it's late.



「Come to think of it, Goshujin-sama. I saw something strange in the middle of coming back here.」



Tio was throwing those words from a garden in a tranquil rural landscape.



Hajime was relaxing by lying down on the edge of the house's eaves like a sleeping Buddha statue while feeling the gently blowing breeze, the chirping of small insects, and then, the breathing sound of a beautiful woman wrapped in bamboo mat while being hanged up from the tree in the garden. He then directed his consciousness along with a suspicious gaze at the woman.



「Did you perhaps see a mirror?」



「Kufuu!? What excellent comeback. It's tough to be loved too much by Goshujin-sama……」



Tio was being hanged up like a criminal while her cheeks were reddening and her body was meandering and wriggling.



「Haah. It's fine even if you normally reflect on yourself sometimes you know? Even though we finally came to visit the house of Jii-chan and Baa-chan, you suddenly made an introduction that was lacking in common sense, and then you created an urban legend at the shopping district……」



「Goshujin-sama, thou said that, but exactly because they art family that it's only natural to convey the truth without any falsehood in it, art not that correct? I don't wish to speak deceiving words toward those two.」



「It's only your words that is wonderful. But, don't you forget that it was that unvarnished truth that almost sent Jii-chan and Baa-chan to heaven.」



Just as Hajime said, Tio had finished her meeting with Hajime's grandparents. Of course, it was done together with Yue and others.



Currently Nagumo family was in the middle of homecoming at the home of Shuu's father.



Because Shuu was a son who was born late, his parents were already in a really late age. They were in the age that would enter their ninety soon. Therefore, it was hard for them to rush and personally visit Hajime who had returned from the disappearance incident like the parents of Sumire.



In the end, with the persuasion of Shuu and Sumire and also Hajime himself, Hajime's grandparents were waiting for this day where their son's family would go to their home.



The two of them were really happy that their cute grandson came to meet them safely without harm.



Although, the moment they saw the many beautiful girls and women behind that grandson and they all introduced themselves as「I'm his wife」, their teary smiling face petrified completely. Their face stiffened so much it felt like they could hear *crack* sound.



What's more, when Myuu politely gave her greeting before energetically explaining her position as「I'm papa's daughter!」, both of them harmoniously staggered.



After all, no matter how they looked, Myuu's appearance was around five years old. In other words, their grandson impregnated the daughter of other people when he entered middle school, or perhaps it was even when he was still in elementary school……



The psychological impact on Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan was unfathomable!



But there, even more pursuing blow came from Myuu! The princess of Nagumo family was merciless even against the elderly!



「But, Myuu is also a bride! Myuu is planning to someday push down papa and make a fait accompli nano!」



'noo~noo~noo~' The end of Myuu's sentence echoed.



Obaa-chan collapsed. Ojii-chan supported Obaa-chan with shockingly agile movement. However, his severely trembling legs and waist didn't come just from his old age but a display of the deep damage that was dealt to him!



Incidentally an incomprehensible voice「Ubooa」leaked out from Hajime's mouth. Surely he was feeling joy(shudder) from his daughter's growth. He thought「This girl, she is closing the paths of escape!」.



It was at that timing, 「If I don't assert mine assistance here, then it will be mine shame as dragon race!」Tio for some reason was showing out her determination.



Toward Obaa-chan who somehow managed to hold on to her consciousness and the Ojii-chan who was desperately supporting such Obaa-chan, Tio launched words of self-introduction「I'm Goshujin-sama's sex(love) slave」that were lacking in common sense with a self-triumphant expression.



Obaa-chan's eyes turned white. Ojii-chan's soul was slipping out from his mouth. ……Even so, Ojii-chan's hands that were supporting Obaa-chan didn't let go.



Hajime who snapped by this point first of all he wrapped Tio in a bamboo mat, then he tied her on a missile and launched her flying to the other side of the mountain.



The draconic woman that was flying in a beautiful arc with red flare trailing behind was surely witnessed by a lot of the local people, while they were listening to a joyful shout of「I'LLLL, BEEE, BAA~~~~CKK!」



Incidentally, punishments of butt spanking and seiza + weight on lap were waiting for Myuu and the criminal instigator Remia respectively. Of course, for Remia there was additional punishment of leg poking after she reached the limit.



Both of them seemed to be reflecting properly on their fault so far as it goes. On the surface.



Although, when Remia's numb legs got poked repeatedly, she screamed things like「Dearrr, please forgive me alreadyyy. Aaahn」a little seductively, so Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan who somehow managed to revive then crumbled down once more.



In addition,「We heard that Hajime boy has returned?」the old people of the neighborhood also came bringing some gifts and also to make their greeting but……



They, witnessed it. The figures of a foreign beauty on all fours while raising coquettish voice (?), and "Hajime boy" torturing that woman.



Needless to say, they wordlessly turned on their heel. It was curious how the neighbors who knew Hajime from the past would deal with Hajime from here on.



After that, Nagumo family somehow explained the existence of Yue and others, and for the time being they acquired the understanding……abandonment of thinking, or possibly escapism from Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan.



In the middle, there was the phone call from Kaori's father and then the return of Tio still wrapped in bamboo mat like a caterpillar while she was dragging behind her the missile. Ojii-chan who witnessed that from the darkness got his soul slipped out from his body, but he survived without problem thanks to Yue's soul magic.



The total change of their grandson and then the behavior of the wives that were lacking in common sense caused the cheeks of Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan to keep twitching from start to end. But even then by the time they had dinner, the two of them became able to converse mostly calmly.



Like that, through the flow of the conversation, the two grandparents became curious with how their grandson encountered the girls who later would become his wives. Yue, Shia, and Myuu then talked passionately to the two of them how much they were saved.



It was a story that struck them dumb, but even so they understood that their cute grandson had helped others, and as the result those people who were helped wanted to be together with him, and now he brought those people like this to meet the two of them. Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan smiled happily for real this time.



Of course, after they heard the story until that far, they became curious about the last person, about the beginning of love with Tio. Obaa-chan asked that with a gentle expression.



Hajime was flustered. Shia got a faraway look. And hten, Yue shrugged her shoulders with a wry smile. Hajime who was opening his mouth to change the topic was obstructed by Sumire with a whip of udon noodle.



Using that opening, Tio spoke with a proud expression, as though to say that there was nothing to be ashamed of at all.



「Truly. How wonderful for thee to asketh, Obaba-dono. When I first met Goshujin-sama, that was the moment when mine life and sense of value changed for good. After all, that was the first time for me to be beaten up so viciously like that!」



「Eh……」



「Yes, yes. I can remember it so clearly even now. That blazing gaze which was sparkling so brutally. The impact that resounded until mine deepest core. I was vomiting blood and raised a pitiful cry, however Goshujin-sama only continued on hitting and kicking me violently without a shred of mercy even then!」



The hopeless dragon hugged herself and talked about her important memory while wriggling her body around with bright red face.



Ojii-chan got a coughing fit and udon spurted out from his nose. Chopsticks fell from Obaa-chan's hand and they fell with a clang.



Hajme repelled the approaching udon whip with finger bullets using crunchy bits of tempura and returned the udon to the bowl while he opened his mouth to stop Tio. But there a fried tofu from the father launched a direct attack!



The large fried tofu clung on Hajime's mouth like a mask. Like a baddie in a drama trying to make the victim fainted using a handkerchief that was soaked in chloroform, the father pinioned his son from behind while blocking his mouth!



Hajime who got vein twitching on his forehead raised a protesting voice「Mogah」and tried to tear off Shuu from himself, but there the mother joined in. She took out from who knew where something that looked like a chakram. It was an artifact named "Anywhere Clothes Drying Frame Without Care of the Place☆", it produced string for hanging clothes on it to let them dry, where the string would be fixed in space. The mother then restrained her son along with her husband!



Although it was only temporary, but Hajime who got restrained by a string for hanging clothes that could seal even a god's apostle became unable to stop his wife's outrage!



「And then there was that, the attack that bestowed to me a deep emotion that I wouldst be unforgettable for mine whole life……」



Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan looked at each other's face. They harmoniously put down their chopsticks and watched Tio with smile. That expression, was the expression of someone who had prepared themselves for the worst before the end of the world……



「Yes, Goshujin-sama, toward the buttocks of I who was wounded all over mine body by that point, he stabbed a hard and thick metallic stake into there!」



「「Ubooa」」



Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan were invited to heaven――Yue's soul magic! It brought back Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan who were rising to heaven with contend smile! As expected from the legal wife. It was a really fine play.



Of course, Hajime snapped. Just how many times his Jii-chan and Baa-chan needed to get invited to heaven before they were satisfied?



Tio's bed was decided at that time. It would be at the garden's tree. She wasn't allowed to sit or lean. But there was no problem. She would only become a bagworm just like usual.



By the way, the current time was after a night had passed. It was currently just before noon, the other family members were going out to the town. It was to mitigate the urban legend created by Tio while taking lunch in the restaurant that was recommended by the grandparents.



Yue's soul magic had been playing a very active role. Naturally, Tio was house-sitting so that there wouldn't be any more pandemonium. Just in case, Hajime who made the origin of the problem was also house-sitting doubled with monitoring Tio so that she wouldn't crawl down and chased after them.



About this time, Yue was surely piling up communication with the grandparents and deepened their mutual understanding and healed their mind. Incidentally there was also no doubt that she was restoring the honor of her husband and fellow wives. As expected from the legal wife. As expected of the legal wife-.



「And, soon it will be noon, how do you feel after getting hanged up for the whole night?」



「The love of Goshujin-sama who even though art saying this or that while acting like that, yet watching over me from a position where I can see. My underwear art crying that it wouldst be the limit soon.」



「……No good huh. Recently you are sleeping soundly even when you are hanged up……perhaps, I should consult with Adol-san for once.」



With a whisper, Hajime hung his head down dejectedly toward the pervert who recently was increasing losing her restrain while he called to mind the grandfather of that pervert. Even among Hajime's acquaintances that were filled with a lot of unrestrained people, he was a respectable "adult" who was few in number.



Without showing any sign of noticing that whisper of Hajime, Tio started the course correction of the talk topic that had diverted by a lot.



「Rather than that, I was talking about strange thing just now, Goshujin-sama.」



「Hm? I think that there is nothing stranger than you in this world though……and? What was it that you saw?」



The casual abuse caused the toes of Tio's dangling feet to go really taut. A strange voice「Nfu」also leaked out from her mouth.



「Ri, right. When I was launched away by Goshujin-sama and impacted the mountain side, the first thing I did was to roll down the slope in order to get out of the woodland path.」



「That's a really daring idea. As expected from the black dragon whose selling point is her toughness.」



By the way, if at that time there was someone who witnessed that figure which was earnestly spinning in full speed like a somersault or spinning top sometimes even while rolling down the slope, surely that witness would yell「Ah, a real Roll○ Girl!」without doubt. While it was a ghastly way of falling, but it was also a fall that vaguely gave artistic impression.



「And then. Midway I made an error in the balancing and mine face struck a thick tree that I stopped in place.」



「Normally anyone would die from that.」



「What, something like that, the attack from Goshujin-sama art far more luscious. There art no need to worry.」



「Who is worrying huh. Don't speak like I'm feeling jealous to a tree.」



Ignoring Hajime's straight-man act, Tio continued to talk while throwing her gaze to empty air in remembrance. Wind was blowing and the bagworm Tio was swaying back and forth.



「Now then, I was about to roll down once more, but at that time I suddenly felt a pressure. It was as though mine body was wrapped wholly with silk floss while getting pulled in. It felt like that.」



「? You felt it? You didn't see anything?」



「No, it was after that. I felt curious and went a bit toward the direction where I was pulled in. It was hidden by the slope and trees really well, but there was a small cave there. That cave, it wouldst not be found easily unless they art diving down the slope like me.」



「Hee. Well, after all around this area is a countryside that still has a lot of nature. It's not strange even if there are a lot of that kind of place……but it doesn't stop there right?」



Tio nodded「Truly」.



From the other side of the stone wall, suddenly a child's face jumped out. It must be a child from the neighborhood. Perhaps he heard their conversation and peeked in curiously. Naturally, what he saw was a beautiful woman hanged up on tree and a man that was gazing at the woman while lying down on the veranda.



The child silently withdrew his face. He had seen something that he shouldn't see. It was a mysterious experience of his childhood.



「I guessed that it was a mist. Something like a white mist was coming out slowly from the cave, however, it then drew back as though the cave was breathing. Perhaps it was caused by the flow of wind, even so it was also strangeth how a mist was occurring locally like that. Added with the strange pressure, it is a mysterious story isn't it?」



「Certainly. I have never heard of any phenomenon like that. A white mist coming out from a cave……it's curious.」



「Right?」



「Then, in the end, you didn't ascertain the true shape of that?」



Tio answered Hajime's question with a triumphant face.



「Right after I was going to ascertain it, mine foot slipped and I rolled down!」



「Aa, hm, I see.」



It seemed after that she became a Ro○ng Girl once more.



Tio's eyes were shining in expectation.



「How is it, Goshujin-sama. Everyone also won't come back for a while. Won't thee, go in an adventure for a bit with me?」



「Adventure huh……」



Her smile wasn't from a perverted ecstasy as usual. Tio was sending him a bright smile that was obviously from pure feeling that wanted to go in a little mysterious trip with Hajime. Hajime was looking at such Tio while showing a thinking posture for a bit,



「I guess. Being Buddha statue like this is also boring. I'm also tired looking at you hanged up like that. Let's go amuse ourselves to a small adventure for a bit.」



「Ri, right! ……E, even though Goshujin-sama was the one hanging me……to get tired looking……this damned Goshujin-sama-. Haa-haa」



Tio was whispering something while breathing roughly, but Hajime normally ignored her. And then, he moved from his Buddha statue posture using one arm to spin four times in a display of pointless technique that was pointlessly refined while landing on the garden. While he was in midair before the landing, Hajime had properly worn his shoes and even put on his jacket.



Hajime approached Tio and untied the rope binding her body. He then locked the door of the house and turned around.



There Tio's voice called at him.



「Goshujin-sama. Can thou bring mine footwear for me?」



Hajime looked back and he saw Tio's feet. Her white and smooth bare feet were fidgeting around. Come to think of it, she was bounded inside the room and then hanged up from there――Hajime who recalled that grinned while replying.



「You need it?」



「!?」



Tio-san was twitching in shudders.



Even though they were going to an adventure in the middle of mountain after this, yet she was asked「Something like shoes is too good for the like of you, do you need it?」. It was a critical hit for the perverted dragon.



……Although, the true critical hit was surely how even after saying something like that, Hajime brought her shoes before personally putting it on Tio's feet.



「Above here?」



「Right. Look over there. There are the tracks where I was slipping down correct? There art no mistake.」



Hajime glanced at the spot where Tio was pointing at, over there he saw a track where there was a straight concave. It was as though something landed there face first before sliding down without getting peeled off.



Hajime returned his gaze as though there was nothing there. Ahead he saw trees and grasses growing densely along with a really steep slope expanding in his view. Depending on the place there was a slope that wouldn't be an exaggeration to be called as a cliff.



「There won't be anyone looking in this kind of place. Tio, lead the way.」



「Acknowledged. Let's go right away Goshujin-sama. I wouldst determine with this dragon eyes of mine, whether thy hath grow dull or not.」



「Bring it on. You yourself, don't show anything unsightly like slipping and then falling down.」



They made frivolous talk. Tio grinned fearlessly and then she instantly waved the edge of her clothes and dashed away suddenly.



*ton-* With a really light sound, at the next moment she was far above.



A beat later, Hajime also jumped out.



*to-to-to-to-* Leaving only those light sounds, the two of them were jumping up like acrobat using tree root, slightly sticking out rock, or from branch to branch.



Tio sent a glance at Hajime who was following her. She leaked out a joyful chuckle「Fufuh」and increased her speed further. Hajime made a bit troubled smile at that and he also followed her by increasing his speed.



Seen from the side, they only looked like shadow climbing up the mountain with fierce speed. If, by any chance there was a witness here, then undoubtedly there would be a new urban legend created that Tengu was living in this mountain.



Turning into modern era Tengu, the two of them sometimes shifted their course a bit, sometimes they meaninglessly climbed tree while sprinting down slope playfully. After a while,



「Muu? This is strange.」



「What is?」



Tio landed from a big jump and came to a stop before she tilted her head.



When Hajime copied her by tilting his head, Tio stayed silent while pulling on Hajime to get closer. Their standing position changed by just a bit from doing that.



Hajime looked suspicious. But he saw the place Tio was pointing at and reflexively leaked out his voice「Oo」.



「This is, it's like a natural camouflage……no, if I have to say which, then perhaps this is more like a trick art?」



「Isn't it splendid? Just by changing our standing position a bit, there art nothing that could be seen except a slope. It is exactly because we art in this angle and position that we art able to notice this cave.」



Just as Tio said, before when Hajime was right before Tio, he was observing the surrounding attentively looking for a cave, but he didn't notice the cave over there at all until Tio led him to the spot he was currently standing on.



The cause of that really should be called as trick art. If they weren't standing on a particular spot, the surrounding landscape and the miraculous bulge of the slope would cause the cave to be unseen.



Hajime was feeling admiration while asking Tio once more.



「And, what is strange about it?」



「No, Goshujin-sama. In the first place what was the reason that I who was rolling down the slope noticed this place?」



「Aah. A strange pressure and absorbing force, was it? ……I don't really feel anything here. There also doesn't seem any mist.」



「Correct. I too don't feel anything right now. Let's see, was it perhaps mine mistake……」



Tio cocked her neck while groaning 'uumu'. Hajime approached the cave and peeked inside. It seemed that the cave continued quite deeply.



Hajime turned around after confirming that.



「There is no way we can dismiss the senses of a dragon race as a misunderstanding that easily. Besides, we came this far for adventure. Then we cannot just go home without even stepping in or checking it right?」



Those words of Hajime that were inviting adventure were responded by Tio「Indeed」with a nod while her shoulders shook happily.



「Even though this art a world without great labyrinth or monster, but for some reason I am getting thrilled.」



「What is called an adventure is not looking for danger. It's looking for the unknown. In that meaning, the conquest of great labyrinth cannot be said as an adventure then. In a sense, this might be our first adventure you know?」



「The first adventure, with me and Goshujin-sama? Fufuh, perhaps Yue and others would be jealous with this.」



Tio raised a delighted chuckle for sure this time. Hajime also joined her with a cheerful grin.



「Then let's go. Dragon race of another world.」



「Right, let's go. Godslaying demon king-dono.」



Both of them thrust their body into the cave jokingly and also in high spirits.



……



……



「……Goshujin-sama. Mine butt got stuck completely. Please pulled me from inside.」



「Slo, sloppy.」



Even though they had put up a front and stepped inside, but now the voluptuous butt of the dragon-san was splendidly getting stuck.



Tio faced back and she twisted in her body as though she was going down a ladder, but her plump butt only changed its shape *mugyuuuu* and couldn't get in.



Feeling that it couldn't be helped, Hajime was sighing while he grasped Tio's legs and pulled in with a jerk. The butt was going *mugyuuuu-*. It still couldn't enter.



「Hrrgh-」



「Aah. My butt, if it's treated that violently-」



A scream that sounded a bit happy echoed. Hajime put even more strength. The charming butt shook *furu furu* as though in resistance. It still hadn't showed any sign of getting in.



Hajime took a breather「fuu」, and then he proposed to Tio who was kicking around her legs as though to say「Come ooon haul it in」.



「……Tio. It doesn't look like it will go in at all. There is no other way, so how about I tear off your lower body so that I can pull in your upper body?」



「Suddenly I'll turn splat!? There art no way I'll agree! Such thing art beyond the limit even for I who love pain!」



Tio couldn't hide her shudder from Hajime who made a brutal suggestion like a demon king. Hajime said「It's a joke」while putting his hand on Tio's thigh.



「Anyway, it doesn't look like you can enter like this so……I'll take it off okay?」



「What? How……aa, by storing it inside the Treasure Warehouse. Yosh, then cometh, bring it on!」



Today, Tio's fashion was pants-look. And so, if her pants was transferred away into "Treasure Warehouse II", then a space would be liberated from it gone.



The "Treasure Warehouse II" fitted on Hajime's finger shined crimson for an instant. By doing that, at the next moment Tio was reduced into a female pervert with her panty fully exposed.



「I, it's really breezy down there……」



Tio kicked her legs up and down looking a bit embarrassed. Hajime held the voluptuous thighs in front of him using his arms and then he pulled in once more.



However, Tio's large butt was unexpectedly obstinate.



「Ada-, adadada-. Go, Goshujin-sama! My butt's skin art getting bruised!」



「Good grief, it's really a stubborn butt.」



Hajime cursed, because he was pulling Tio forcefully, her panties dug into her crotch and now it looked like she was wearing T-back panty. Hajime glared at the shaking butt.



And then, seeing no other choice, he also transferred the panty into Treasure Warehouse.



「……Goshujin-sama. By any chance, I hath also lost my last fortress now?」



「It can't be helped. It's in the way.」



From the entrance of the cave, there was the lower body of a woman getting suspended without even a shred of cloth. If the people of the dragon race village who idolized her as a princess even now saw her like this, surely they would have out-of-body experience without doubt.



Hajime took out from his "Treasure Warehouse II" something like a thin stick and inserted it between Tio's shivering butt that was looking pitiful somehow and the rock where it got stuck.



「Muu? Something cold art on mine butt……」



「I'm pouring oil for lubricating machine. With this it will be smoother to pull you out.」



This was the same idea with using soap to take off ring that couldn't come off. The overflowing oil trickled from the gap between the butt and rock and flowed down on Thio's thighs. Each time Tio twitched and shivered and she leaked out trembling voices.



After pouring in a lot of oil, Hajime readied himself and pulled in Tio's legs.



「Oo!? It's slipping in! It's working, Goshujin-sama!」



「Yosh, just a bit more. Do your best, butt-naked dragon!」



「Haua!? Not forgetting to insult even in this kind of time……this damn beloved Goshujin-sama!」



The two was strangely getting roused up for some reason.



Right after that, *nupon-* a strange sound rang and Tio's bombastic butt slipped out from between the rock.



And then,



「…………Goshujin-sama. It's a bit hard to say this but」



「Don't finish it. I know already.」



Tio-san, also had a bombastic breast.



Her shirt was rolled up and her back was fully exposed, however, this time it was her gigantic twin hills that got stuck. For the time being, Hajime embraced Tio from behind to try pulling her in but……



「It's happiness to be embraced tightly by Goshujin-sama but, mi, mine breast felt like they wouldst get torn off……」



「Haa. Let's just go with the same method.」



「Please be gentle.」



Like that Tio――became stark naked.



She limply sat on the floor of the cave with her cheeks blushing faintly. Her butt and her breast were glistening because of the oil.



「At the start of the adventure, the proud princess of dragon race got stripped naked and became all slimy……Goshujin-sama, honestly speaking, what doth thy think?」



「I'm thinking it's pitiful.」



Tio didn't look happy like usual, she was wafting off sorrowful aura and agreed「That's right」with a faint smile.



Hajime wordlessly handed her a towel.



Tio wiped her body using that while taking out the traditional garment of dragon race――the kimono that was a blending of Japanese and Western styles from her own "Treasure Warehouse" and she quickly put it on.



「……Say, Goshujin-sama. Thinking really really carefully, I was stuck because of the rock correct?」



「Hm? Yeah.」



「Then, wouldst not it be better to use transmutation?」



「……」



Hajime halted. Tio also halted. Inside the gloomy cave, Hajime and Tio looked at each other.



「Now, Tio. The unknown is waiting ahead from here! Our adventure will begin from here-」



「O, ou! That's right! It's from here on!」



It seemed that for now they would get over it with mood.



Both of them started walking deeper into the cave with a strange tension.



After walking for a while, inside the cave was unexpectedly starting to show aspects of cavern. The deeper they went, the wider the cave turned.



「Somehow, this is nostalgic.」



「Might it be about Orcus?」



Hajime muttered in small voice. Tio guessed what he was thinking and asked.



「Yeah. There is no light of green light stone here, but as expected, speaking about cave for me just means Orkus.」



「I can imagine that. It was the starting place for the current Goshujin-sama, and then――it was also a place of a precious encounter.」



Tio sympathized with Hajime with her voice vaguely containing gentleness. Hajime walked while illuminating the surrounding with light while glancing at Tio beside him.



「That encounter tied Goshujin-sama, spun a bond with Shia, and connected toward me. Most likely, if there art just one of those lacking, then I wouldst not be here like this.」



「Don't make a solemn talk like that so suddenly. It's rare for you to talk about what-if. That's a meaningless supposition right?」



「That's right. Indeed, it's meaningless. But, I feel happy with our time right now that art like a miracle, so much so that I'm looking back like that. Being solemn sometimes art also not bad.」



Saying that, Tio made a really hard to describe smile, even so there wasn't any shadow in it by any means. Even though it was just for a moment, but Hajime's eyes were definitely stolen by that smile of Tio.



「Oh? What's this, Goshujin-sama. Art thou falling in love all over me again? By any chance, the possibility of surpassing Yue art……」



「It's completely none.」



Hajime's immediate answer dealt critical hit. A sweet voice leaked out from the hopeless dragon-san. 「If only she kept smiling like just now, no matter from where you look she is a wonderful princess of the dragon race, yet」Hajime was staring at Tio with disappointment filling his eyes.



「Or rather, you, you are aiming to surpass Yue?」



「That art really a late question. There art not a single woman that art not aiming for that. Of course it wouldst not be something that art done bloodthirstily, but a chase to overtake that art done enjoyably, it's something like a serious playfulness between fellow wives.」



「……I thought that it's just Kaori who is like that.」



「Fufu, you still hath some way to go Goshujin-sama. Everyone like everyone else to the greatest degree, but that art that. This art this. Because we art woman, then as expected we want to be told as "number one", we desire to be "the only one" for the man we loved. Even Yue often said it art not she? 『I'll accept any challenge anytime, anywhere, no matter how many times』.」



「I see.」



A wry smile emerged on Hajime's lips thinking that he still "had some way to go" while he scratched his cheek. Even though normally Tio was just a pervert, sometimes she would give Hajime "understanding" with significant words smoothly said like this. She was by nature really thoughtful, and that was also one of her charm.



Hajime wanted to say something to the smiling Tio and he opened his mouth.



But, before he could speak,



「Ah?」



「Mu?」



Hajime and Tio simultaneously ran their gaze at the surrounding. Sharpening wariness resided in their eyes.



Before they realized, it was truly before they realized, mist was manifesting around Hajime and Tio. It was an extremely thin mist. However, seeing this it was clearly unnatural for mist to be appearing so suddenly inside a cave like this.



And above all, what they were feeling right now proved that the mist was abnormal.



「I see. Indeed, this is a strange pressure, and I also feel a pulling force into deeper inside the cave.」



「It appeared that it wasn't just mine misunderstanding. Now then, what about Goshujin-sama's magic eye stone? This art definitely not a magic, but perhaps it's one of the mystic of this world?」



「My magic eye stone isn't reacting at all. But, it's unthinkable that this is a natural phenomenon. It seemed that a rare phenomenon is really occurring for real right now.」



Even while they were conversing like that, the pressure and pulling force were growing stronger. The restraining force was strengthening as though it wouldn't let the two of them got away while trying to drag them in.



Hajime took out a reconnaissance plane from "Treasure Warehouse" onto his palm and made it fly deeper into the cave.



The place was advancing deeper unhindered and its view was shared with Hajime so he could look at the situation inside.



Like that, after it advanced a little ahead,



「-. Oi oi, seriously?」



「Goshujin-sama, what's the matter?」



Hajime made a bit of dry chuckle. It seemed there was an unexpected situation that made Hajime unable to hide his surprise.



Hajime kept his eyes fixed deeper into the cave while answering Tio's question.



「The reconnaissance plane was swallowed.」



「Swallowed? What doth that mean?」



「Exactly like that. The mist is getting thicker the deeper you go ahead. The shared view turned pure white and nothing can be seen at the surrounding. And right after that, my link with it got cut.」



「That's……」



Tio gulped. She understood well how powerful Hajime's artifact was. Even though it was just a reconnaissance plane, it was impossible for its link with its master to be severed that easily.



Hajime gave even more shocking words to the surprised Tio.



「That's not all. Just before I lost the plane, it was just for an instant but……I could see sea of clouds.」



「Sea, of clouds? Wait a second Goshujin-sama. It wasn't the sky, but thou couldst see a "sea of clouds"? In other words――」



「Yeah, the scene I saw wasn't something I could see from a cave even if the ceiling here is transparent. Hahah, we are really inside a cave right?」



Hajime and Tio looked at each other's face.



And, at that time,



「Nno!?」



「This is!?」



The mist moved. No, the mist around Hajime and Tio increased in thickness so suddenly they mistakenly thought that, at the same time the pressure and the pulling force were also generated.



「Aa, this is bad Tio. Just maybe, this cave is a "natural gate". At this rate perhaps we might get thrown out to another world somewhere.」



「I see. The true identity of "spirited away", by any chance it might be this kind of place or phenomenon.」



Even while Hajime and Tio were speaking out their hypothesis, they were trying to turn around toward the entrance.



But, it seemed the phenomenon of spirited away was something that couldn't be escaped from that easily.



「Ah, this is no good.」



「Truly, I understand this sensation. ――We art caught.」



With those words as their last, Hajime and Tio's figure was enveloped by the abnormally white mist.



And then, a few minutes later, the mist finally cleared up and the figure of the two weren't there anymore.



Right after the mist coiling around them cleared up, Hajime and Tio were,



「Oo, it's really the blue sky.」



「Entering into a cave and fall from the sky, this art truly something.」



Free falling in the great sky of an unknown world while they were folding their arms with unmoving thinking posture. (TN: In the raw the author is using the kanji (zessan/great praise) related with the free falling. When I google it it’s related with the free falling stock market price, but to my shame I still really don’t get what is the connection between great praise and free falling. Help please.)



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This is Tio arc.



About how far it will continue, what kind of end it will have, there is no plot, so even Shirakome doesn't know.



But as expected I don't think that it will run wild like Lily arc……





Chapter 230




The wind howled roaringly. Wind pressure was striking everything. If one looked up there would be the vibrant azure sky. The light of sun was showering down brilliantly. The sea of clouds was shining silver from the reflection of the sunlight.



Surrounded by all those, there were two silhouettes freefalling with their arms folded.



「I wonder if it's my fate to enter a cave then freefall in the sky?」



「Who knows. But, at the very least this art a refreshing fall compared to before isn't that right?」



「This is really a pleasant weather~」



Just to make sure, let's specify it one more time. The two were in the middle of freefalling without parachute or lifeline.



「For now, should we try going under the sea of clouds?」



「Right. It looks like the weather art bad, but perhaps there wouldth be something that couldst make us understand what kind of world this place art. After all there art nothing above the sky.」



Hajime and Tio plunged into the sea of clouds even while they were talking like that.



At that moment, they received the baptism of terrific air turbulence and random lightning. It seemed that this sea of clouds wasn't merely thick clouds or rainy clouds, but something that resembled a super vast cumulonimbus cloud. Seeing how there wasn't any sign of vortex it wasn't any kind of typhoon. It was a storm cloud with abnormal range that silently covered the world as far as the eye could see.



The lightning flying wildly about along with thunderous sounds attacked Hajime and Tio as though to remove the intruder.



Hajime's body instantly emitted red spark. The lightning that should strike Hajime's body directly was streamed away as though it was sliding off the body. It then flew away to the direction of the beyond.



As for Tio, she seemed to normally endure the lightning by using dragon scale hardening. She used regeneration magic to repair the hole opened on her clothes with an unruffled air.



Only a few seconds past.



*bobat* Both of them came out at the bottom of the sea of clouds with some cloud part trailing behind them.



Without delay, fierce wind and rain attacked the two mercilessly.



「Uwaa, this is just terrible.」



「What to say……art this world, ended up already?」



Gravity control type multipurpose assault unit――Cross Velt. Hajime summoned eight of them to put up a cube shaped barrier around him and Tio. They looked from the inside at the rain water trickling along the barrier's surface and they unconsciously leaked out their voice.



Their reaction was understandable. No matter how they looked, the heavy rain pouring down toward the world like waterfall looked like muddy water. The rain water that hit their skin dyed the spot pitch black.



Tio used wind magic to shake off the black rain and while she was at it she combined it with fire magic to warm her and Hajime's wet body while drying out their clothes in high speed. She was doing that while expressing her impression toward this another world with a really astonished voice.



Her gaze was looking at her own arm that was wet with the black rain just now. Countless red specks were coming out from there. It seemed the place that got touched by the black rain was getting inflammation.



It was a world with obviously harmful black rain pouring down.



Of course, perhaps this was a characteristic phenomenon of this region, but at the very least it was obvious that the dark color of the ocean spreading below wasn't caused just because the sunlight didn't reach. This black rain was pouring down so much that it colored the sea black.



And then, if the sea that was polluted to this degree followed the sea current and flowed through the world……they naturally could imagine the hopelessness of this world.



Hajime took out his smartphone and made a drop of black rain to fall on the display. Right away, a ripple spread on the display. A loading screen appeared for a few seconds.



「Unknown composition just as expected. It doesn't match anything from the data of Tortus or earth. Its effect to human body is……oou, looks like Tio's impression is seriously bull's eye. Look here, this rain has the effect to cause necrosis to the cell.」



「……Oh dear. However, no matter in what kind of environment, what art called as living thing wouldst find a way to adapt in the end and survive. There art still possibility of organism that manages to adapt in this place. Besides, perhaps even this black rain art limited to this area.」



「Well, you're right. Anyway, for now let's return above. This rain doesn't has much effect to us and we can heal the effect right away, even so this kind of muddy black world is depressing.」



「No doubt about that.」



Hajime and Tio took one last look at the raging black world before charging into the sea of clouds once more with the barrier still activated.



They went through the sea of clouds and returned once more to the clear azure sky.



「If someone meet spirited away phenomenon, they will get thrown off to a world that is really hard to survive huh.」



「It looks like it. What wouldst we do Goshujin-sama? Art we going home?」



Tio asked without even any doubt that they would be unable to return to earth. With "Compass of Guidance Crossing" and "Crystal Key", it was possible to return home to earth no matter what kind of world they were in. That was the reason that the two weren't flustered at all even when they were going to be swallowed by the white mist inside the cave.



Hajime turned his gaze to Tio's question. He showed a thinking gesture「Hm~」and asked back in return.



「What do you want to do Tio?」



「……We should return. This adventure is not in the level of going to mountain for a bit anymore. I wouldst consider looking around for a bit if this is a good world though……. Also thinking about the time until Yue and others return home, even if we art going to adventure, we should return once to take Yue and others together too.」



Tio made a wry smile just for a moment before she advocated cautious theory. Indeed, although they could return anytime, the scale of this situation was too big to be a little fun that was done while their family wasn't at home, the state of this world was too turbulent.



It was really an opinion with prudence that was just like Tio.



Hajime narrowed his eyes to such Tio before he showed a bit of thinking gesture once more. And then, perhaps he had finished scrutinizing Tio's opinion because he smiled wryly while agreeing「I guess」, and then he activated his "Treasure Warehouse II" to take out the "Compass of Guidance Crossing".



Right after that,



「Hm? Hmm? ……Damn it. Now I've really done it, Tio.」



「Mu? What art the matter, Goshujin-sama.」



Hajime was scratching his head awkwardly which caused Tio to tilt her head in puzzlement. Her expression froze with a snap at Hajime's next sentence.



「The compass, I forgot to bring it with me.」



Hajime was jovially saying「I'm beaten, I'm beaten」while laughing 'tahahahaha', with Tio staring open mouthed in a daze and amazement at such Hajime.



A beat, two beat. Finally the meaning of Hajime's words seemed to soak into Tio, her complexion changed and she began to press questions in fluster.



「Wha, wha wha, what do thy mean with forget!? It was inside the Treasure Warehouse wasn't it!?」



「Haha~. I just recalled it only now, just before this I lent it to Yue but she hadn't returned it to me. That's really careless of me.」



「Tomfooleryy――!! Such important thing art not something to be forgotten!」



「Oo, I got scolded by Tio……this is really a fresh experience.」



「Art this the time to say thattt――――!! What to do……, we couldst not go home.」



Hajime's attitude that was too overflowing with irresponsibility caused Tio's shoulders to drop dejectedly. She was in a state that she didn't even realize that for the first time she had yelled angrily at Hajime.



「Well, don't be that upset.」



「What? Goshujin-sama, thou art really composed. Art there any prospect of us going home?」



「We have no prospect to go home, but looking from the opposite it means that Yue is carrying the compass, so we don't particularly need to get flustered isn't it? I am carrying the Crystal Key, but if she find me using the compass then it's possible to search in reverse.」



「……I see. Now that thy said that, indeed there art no reason to lose composure. If Yue use the compass to find us who didn't return home, we wouldst be able to return home at that point of time. Fumu, mine apologies Goshujin-sama. I was showing something unsightly.」



Being able to understand that their situation wasn't particularly serious after getting told so, Tio casted down he eyes from shame of her disordered state.



Tio who averted her eyes didn't notice, but the expression of Hajime who was looking at her embarrassed gesture was extremely gentle. Different from the normal Hajime who was usually dealing with Tio in full S mode, his warm expression now was emitting a definite affection.



Everything was because he understood the reason why Tio unusually lost her composure like just now.



Tio wasn't feeling uneasy at the possibility that they couldn't return home itself. In front of her there was a man who had obtained the mean to cross over worlds with only his determination when at the start he didn't have anything at all. Doubting that they couldn't return home was instead nothing more than an insult to Hajime.



Therefore, the reason why Tio was flustered was something else. That reason was in the fact that she separated Hajime from Yue and others through something that was caused by them doing something that she suggested. She had no doubt that they would be able to go home. But, the problem was the time. At how long Hajime would be separated from Yue and others.



In short, her lost of composure at their inability to go home was the manifestation of her consideration toward Yue and co. Although her sturdiness was her strong point, she was someone who wouldn't hesitate to turn her own body into a shield for her comrade's sake, her way of losing composure was really like herself.



「Well, under the cloud feels like the end of the century, but the sky is really not bad. Until it's time, let's go adventuring to see if this sea of clouds will end somewhere, and if there is we will look for land, Tio.」



「Right. Yes, yes-. Let's do just that!」



The embarrassed Tio raised a happy voice lively after receiving that order to resume their adventure. There wasn't even any need to mention her expression. It was truly a smiling face that would charm anyone that would make anyone who knew her to be amazed thinking「Even though if she can be always like that, there won't be anyone doubting her if she is really the princess of dragon race or not」.



A while after they began their sky journey, currently Tio had transformed into a black dragon where Hajime was riding on her.



At first Hajime was using his skyboard while Tio was also only using her wings from partial dragonification, after that she used wind magic to fly in human form, but Hajime requested her that he wanted to mount her.



Riding on a dragon's back to fly at the sky faraway――that yearning of every man had often been realized by Hajime, but he never got tired of it and if there was chance he would ask to ride Tio like this.



『It also hast been a while since I fly with Goshujin-sama on mine back. There wasn't that much chance since we returned to earth.』



「Yeah. What's more, we were flying mainly at night whether in Tortus or earth. It's really has been a long time since we last flew in the sky this clear.」



『If thy wish it then we couldst fly anytime correct? The sky of earth art constrained, but if it's now the we couldst do anything using Goshuujin-sama's artifact isn't that right?』



「Yeah. I can just make artifact for jamming and camouflage. Just spare me from having dog fight with the ASDF.」(TN: Air Self-Defense Force)



Tio caught the wind and flew among the cloud chasms with a movement that was drawing an elegant curve. The milky road that was like a flowing cotton candy was an amazingly superb view.



The sea of clouds weren't only shaped flatly, at some places the clouds would make a gigantic mountain shape or chasm shape like where they were at right now. There was also cloud that was arch-shaped and also a cloud that was shaped like a surging tidal wave. It was a magnificent view that should be described as a continent that was made on the sky.



Hajime was sticking still on Tio's back using gravity control so there wasn't any concern that he would fall. The wind pressure and air were also controlled within one meter from the body using a dedicated earring artifact. And so Tio was flying to her heart content without needing to give any consideration or restraint.



She broke out from the chasm with a steep climb and slipped through the gap between clouds floating lazily with while barrel rolling.



She passed under arching cloud and swiveled around a mountain of cloud as though she was dancing, she went through a steep climb before leaving her body to swoop down in a free fall. And then, she unfolded her wings with a force that blown away the clouds at the surrounding and flew inside the tidal wave cloud like a surfer.



「Having fun?」



『Yes, this art really fun!』



In contrast with the fierce maneuver, Hajime was asking with a calm voice. And the responding voice was an excited voice just as expected. And then a single roar as though she was giving a service. While it was a powerful roar, but the reverberation felt pleasant somehow. Hajime also raised a cheerful laugh at that.



But, it was at that time, as though in respond to Tio's howl, there was a faint sound reaching the two.



「O? Tio, just now……」



『It seemed, we hath discovered the first villager――not, the first living thing here. It's truly auspicious that not every living thing here art exterminated.』



Even in this world where a black rain that caused necrosis on living cell was pouring down, it seemed there was still living thing here as expected. Right now the sound vibrating in their eardrum that was getting louder and louder was obviously coming from a living thing――in addition, it seemed to be a howl that came from a large type organism.



Hajime tapped on the black scaled back and Tio took a steep turn in complete agreement.



They passed through several cloud mountains and at the end they circled around a conspicuously large spiraling cloud. Then, there they were able to catch sight of black spots in the sky that looked like dribbling ink.



『Hou……so there art mine fellow race even in this world.』



「As expected, this is a fantasy world huh. Well, we don't know yet whether they are like your race that can turn into "human" or "dragon", or if they are just a variety of monster.」



The specks reflected on the azure sky were gradually growing bigger. The two who possessed eyesight that was incomparable with the average people could clearly see the true form of those specks.



They were dragon. Not the snake type dragon of the east, but the western dragon. Their number was around ten. Their body was grey colored and their body length was around two until three meter. Their body build looked bad. Compared to Tio's build, they looked really frail. Their howl that they sometimes raised to call at Tio sounded like a crying voice instead after the two saw their figures.



First thing first, Tio tried talking to the small dragons that approached nearby in the blink of eye in order to investigate their intelligence level.



『All of thee, art thee able to understand mine words? Couldst thee communicate using mind?』



The respond that came back was only *gyau gyau gyao gyao*, a crying voice of beast. They were flying in circles around Tio who was hovering midair as though fawning at her――



「「「「「……」」」」」



They took a second look at Hajime who was sitting on Tio's back. They were definitely taking a second look.



Seeing the grey dragons stopped crying and instead were staring fixedly at him, Hajime gazed back「Aa?」in suspicion.



Right after that,



「「「「「Gyuwa!?」」」」」



The grey dragons showed a reaction that looked like「We have seen something that mustn't be seen!」before running away in full speed. There was even a dragon among them that was too panicked it lost speed and almost fell.



Their state was exactly like an unfortunate victim encountering a monster, or perhaps like a villager A who suddenly bumped onto the demon king out of nowhere.



Like before they only cried out like a beast without showing any state of using language or even advanced intelligence. But, seeing how they were running away with terrible desperation while looking behind them several times,



――Ruunnn, quickly runnn



――Someone-, someone helpppp!!



――Oh god! Oo, god in heaven, please grant us your salvation-



――There is no way, I'm going to die in this kind of placeeee-



It felt like those kinds of scream of heart could be heard.



「…………Tio」



『Wha, what is it, Goshujin-sama.』



Tio replied back to that quiet voice in slight fluster. When she turned around her head and looked behind, she saw the figure of Hajime looking at the faraway there. A vague sorrow was drifting from his side profile.



「Am I, really that terrifying?」



『N, nooo, I think that art not really not the case……』



「But, no matter how I look at their reaction, it's like they are a victim that encountered the devilish homicide in a horror movie. Even though I'm not emitting pressure or anything. Even though, I'm not doing anything.」



『Ma, mayhaps, they art not used to human? When they approached me because they thought of me as their fellow, they saw a creature that they hath not seen before and got surprised. Surely that art the case here.』



「Are they running away that desperately in terror because they are surprised? ……Recently I'm told that I was mellowing down, and I thought that I have adapted a bit to live in earth but……」



『Goshujin-sama, mine motherly instinct art really tickled seeing thy rare disheartened figure, but for now how about we try chasing after them? After all they art the living thing in this world that we finally discovered.』



「……You are right. Let's do that.」



Tio was writhing lightly seeing Hajime who was somewhat dispirited.



If it was him when he was at Tortus, something like this would cause vein to twitch on his forehead before he shot them down *dopan-*, so him being disheartened like this showed that he was in the process of acclimating to the life in earth. That was what Tio thought, but this was really a rare sight so she didn't say anything instead.



In exchange, she urged Hajime to chase after the change in this world that they finally encountered so that it wouldn't get away.



She flapped her wings once. Tio began to fly glidingly. The grey dragons that glanced back as though saying「They aren't following us? Are we safe already?」saw the following Tio――or more accurately Hajime who was riding on her back and their body twiiiitched and trembled.



Naturally, they began to escape with even more desperation than before.



「……」



『Aa~, Goshujin-sama? This art surely that. They don't look like they hath intelligence in the level of human, they art genuinely a beast. That's why, they art instinctually sensing Goshujin-sama's strength――』



Tio followed up in a touching gesture. However, it was unclear whether her words reached or not. Hajime didn't react at all while his somewhat dispirited expression was starting to change bit by bit.



The disheartened face turned into a fixed stare, and next it changed into a small irritation. And then――



「Fine then. If they are asking for that kind of character from me then, aah, that's fine. I should answer their expectation. Ku-ku-ku-ku-」



『Go, Goshujin-sama, art making a sadist face like when he was dealing with me!? Run away! All of thee, quickly run awayyyyy-』



The demon king-sama stood up imposingly above Tio and widely spread his arms in a dramatic pose as though welcoming in the enemy. His lips split apart like a crescent moon while his eyes were blazing fiercely like a hunter cornering his prey!



Tio howled and urged the grey dragons to escape. The grey dragons that looked back simultaneously at that voice――saw it right away.



「Now, run, run, run! I'll leisurely hunt you down and devour youuuuu-」



They saw the demon king who was bursting with crimson magic power while loudly yelling something like that which reverberated to the whole azure sky.



Of course, it went without saying that the body of the grey dragons twitcheeeeeeeeeed. It also went without saying that they were starting to run away with even more desperation than before. From behind them「HAAH――――HAHHAHHAHHAH!!」a loud laughter resounded. Something shining could be seen glittering around their eyes even though they were dragon――surely that was just an imagination.



Around thirty minutes after Hajime turned demon king. Hajime who had just created one more black history was sitting on Tio's back while grasping his knees. Tio who was taking the stance of "Let's just left him alone for now" finally called at Hajime.



『Goshujin-sama. Stop being down and look ahead.』



「Just leave me alone Tio. I'm disgusted with my own foolish act and lack of growth. ……If I don't reflect back on myself a bit then I'll turn completely into Endo.」



『If he heard that then he wouldst get upset and indignated……no, mayhaps, he wouldst be happy because his comrade increase? Well, rather than talking about that, come now, stop acting like that and raise thy head. It's worth it to chase after those dragon with some distance in between. I believe this art a sight that wouldst make thy heart greatly throb though?』



「Dismissing my concern like that……well, certainly the matter of Endo doesn't matter but……. And, what are you saying about the sight――」



Hajime stopped hugging his knees while casually saying something cruel about a certain friend with thin presence and he lifted his gaze. And then, he lost his words while unconsciously rising voice of admiration「Ooo」.



In the middle of the chase, the two felt that it was futile chasing after the grey dragons and they took distance from them while following behind without the dragons noticing. And now it seemed now they had reached the place where the dragons were dwelling.



「Is this a real Lap○ta huh.」



『Aah, that masterpiece……indeed, this resembled that. Though as for me this reminded me of the Holy Precincts.』



The sea of clouds were continuing without end since the place they appeared at the beginning until now. There was only the sea of clouds as far as their eye could see. It was possible that perhaps this sea of clouds was covering the whole world. In that case, because the surface was ravaged by the black rain that was bringing fatality to the living thing, then where would the dragons rested their wings――the answer to that question was this.



――An island floating in the sky.



Yes, it was a piece of land that was floating above the sea of clouds without anything supporting it from below. It was as though a piece of land had been reeled up as it was, below there was the exposed earth and stones, above there was the verdant green ground, there was even a forest covering the center of the floating island with tall trees. Its size was around five or six Tokyo Dome.



「I thought that this is a fantasy world by the time there is dragon, but with this it feels even more like it.」



『Before, there was no time to thoroughly observe the floating island at the Holy Precincts. I am feeling a bit thrilled. Goshujin-sama, the dragons before art likely to be here too, so it's better to land at the edge as to not surprise them correct?』



「Yeah, do that. I'll use "Presence Isolation" in advance.」



The more Tio approached, the more a commotion happened at the forest at the center. The trees were unnaturally shaking slightly, however, right after that the forest was filled with peacefulness. Surely the dragons were hiding there.



Tio landed on the edge of the floating island while feeling their presence. She landed gently with a softness that didn't fit her large body. Hajime jumped down from Tio's back and he stepped on the lush ground with his own feet.



Right after that, Tio dispelled her dragon transformation and stood beside Hajime. *rustle*, the sign of agitation was spreading from the forest.



「It looks like normal weed from the appearance. The composition of the soil……it seems similar with earth and Tortus but……hm?」



Hajime crouched and took a grass with his hand, he then analyzed the soil composition with "Mineral Appraisal". And then, 「Oh?」 he blinked as though he noticed something.



「What art the matter? Art there some kind of mysterious composition mixed in it?」



「Rather than calling it a mysterious composition……something that is really similar with a composition I'm really familiar with is mixed in. What's more, it's scattered all over in wide scope like a fertilizer.」



「Familiar composition? From thy speech, is it something from Tortus?」



「Yeah. They are small granulated mineral that is even smaller than sand. ――【Converging Transmutation】」



Thinking that it was faster to see directly, he made his palm faced up. Right after that, Hajime was activating a transmutation master's secret art of transmuting without the hand directly touching the material to converge the mineral at the surrounding.



Sparkling sands were bursting out from Hajime's surrounding. They were like flowing large rivers of the cosmos, swirling like sparkling stars with Hajime as the center where they were gradually converging above his palm.



With an emission of crimson sparks, the item that was finally created by the compression transmutation was a fragment of shining azure mineral.



「This art……it looks like god crystal.」



「Yeah. Though it's different in the finer aspects. It seems that the aspect where it takes in magic power and condenses it to manifest liquid is the same though.」



To be more specific, it couldn't retain magic power as much as god crystal, on top of that it also didn't have the power to create god water that possessed the recovery effect that wouldn't be an exaggeration to be called as regeneration. However, its ability to take in magic power into itself and then created liquid with abundant nourishment, and then its circulation rate of going through those sequences were far faster and more efficient in the degree that couldn't be compared with the god crystal's production of god water.



Hajime acquired that knowledge from the analysis of his smartphone that was equipped with the advanced function of analyzing using "Mineral Appraisal" and Creation Magic and Metamorphosis Magic. Tio who received Hajime's explanation said「I see」in understanding and then she looked around.



「So that's how a land floating in the sky couldst be this verdant. The reason art because it hath that god crystal look alike.」



「Looks like it. Although, that's not the reason why this land is floating though……」



Hajime stood up and turned his gaze at the center of the floating island. He was intending to go investigate there. Tio also nodded and she was about to walk, it was at that time,



「Mu? So they art coming out by their own initiative.」



One dragon suddenly showed out its face from behind a tree. *jii~* It was staring at Tio.



Hajime and Tio looked at each other. For now they would try watching in silence. Hajime was using "Presence Isolation" in full power while also forming a simple barrier using a pencil sized Cross Velt. It wasn't an artifact for defense, but a barrier artifact that used space magic to bend the light for optical camouflage. It wasn't that powerful, but it more or less also possessed space isolation effect, so it blocked the body odor from detection.



The grey small dragon was looking *jii~* at Tio for a while, but seeing Tio wasn't moving while looking back at it with a calm expression, it seemed the dragon let its guard down just a little because it came out with unsure steps from the forest.



Behind that dragon, 「Oi, is it really okay?」「Stop I told you! You are going to die!」the other dragons timidly showed their face from behind the trees as though to say those.



「It looks like they art calming down a bit there~」



The figure of those dragons that could be said to be charming in a sense caused Tio to loosen up her face. Perhaps Tio's atmosphere that was softening further encouraged it, the dragon in the lead was advancing a bit and stopped, then it advanced a bit and stopped again. It was repeating that action while approaching Tio bit by bit.



Before long, the dragon that had arrived until near Tio brought its snout closer to Tio and it sniffed her smell *sniff sniff*. And then, it nervously retracted back its neck and tilted its head before it brought its nose closer again and sniffed her scent *sniff sniff* again.



「Hmm. It appears they art confused, whether I am a dragon, or a human. In that case……it's great isn't it, Goshujin-sama. It appears Goshujin-sama art not especially hated, this children seems to fear "human" itself.」



『I see. In other words, that means human, or at the very least "humanoid" being is existing in this world.』



Hajime replied using "Telepathy" just in case so the dragon wouldn't get spooked. While the two were doing that, the other dragons also seemed to lose to their curiosity toward this mysterious existence who smelled like their race even though she was human. They were coming out from the forest even while looking timid with unsure steps.



Tio was surrounded by dragons in the blink of eye. She slowly reached out her hand toward one of the dragons that was bringing its snout closer. The dragon twitched and drew back, but when it saw Tio waiting silently with her hand still reached out, it approached back slowly.



Finally, Tio's hand touched the dragon's snout. And then, when Tio caressed it, the dragon blinked in surprise before it started to narrow its eyes pleasantly. Its shrill but low purr *kururururu-* seemed to show its fawning act.



Behind Tio, another dragon was pressing its snout as though to appeal 'me too'. Just when she thought that was it, the other dragons also pushed their snout forward from left and right too.



「Oi oi, all of thee. For the dragon race of all things to be spoiled children like this every single one of thou? What a troubling children.」



Tio chuckled while saying that. Although, even though she was saying that, the emotion dwelling in her eyes was an unconcealed kindness. She gently caressed them in turn with smiling eyes and loosened cheeks, looking truly like a mother.



Hajime also looked fondly at the figure of Tio surrounded by dragons while gently spoiling them. Even though normally she was very much a pervert, but her true nature was a noble person that was overflowing with prudence, kindness, and pride. That was exactly the charm of this woman, Tio Claus.



「Mu? I vaguely feel a passionate gaze……now now, Goshujin-sama. Art thou envious that I am paying attention only to these children?」



While smiling mischievously, Tio accurately threw her gaze at Hajime who was hiding behind barrier of optical camouflage.



It was a fact that Hajime was captivated, so he smiled wryly while replying「Perhaps」. Getting that unexpectedly positive reply, Tio's cheeks blushed faintly. It seemed she was a bit happy.



To divert the attention from her shyness, she opened her mouth with a bit of rapid talk.



「Goshujin-sama. If it's now this children's wariness art lessened considerably, how about giving a try to pat them?」



『I guess. There won't be many chance of something like this.』



Hajime manipulated the pencil Cross Velt and deployed the optical camouflage as close as possible on his body. He was also in the middle of activating Presence Isolation in full force, so he should be able to pat the dragon if he reached his hand from a blind spot.



Hajime slowly approached a dragon. It was half closing its eyes from Tio's caressing, so it shouldn't notice anything even if he touched it a bit.



But, it seemed that wild instinct wasn't that naïve.



「!?」



The dragon that Hajime approached suddenly leaped back from that spot. Furthermore that jumped happened so deftly and vigorously that for a moment there it felt like there would be a sound *hyuba-*.



'Am I noticed?' Hajime stared fixedly, but the dragon tilted its head「kuruu?」while looking around. It seemed it didn't notice Hajime but it only acted instinctually.



Hajime tried taking a step forward. The dragon took a step back. Hajime tried taking two steps forward. The dragon took two steps back. Hajime tried to circle behind it. The dragon circled with a fixed distance preserved in between. It was as though there was an unseen wall between Hajime and dragon, the two sides were turning in circles without any change of distance between them.



It seemed that the dragon didn't understand why it was acting like this. It frequently tilted its head.



「Ma, mayhaps it understand instinctually that there art something it hate there?」



Tio muttered such thing, perhaps from sensing how Hajime's eyes were gradually turning scornful.



Hajime tried approaching the other dragons. The other dragons also took distance with natural movement. No matter where Hajime tried to go, the dragons would distance themselves from Hajime as though they were magnet of opposite pole. There was no doubt that they didn't notice Hajime's existence. In other words, they were avoiding him in subconscious level.



Hajime was hurt for a tiny bit. He was looking at the day after tomorrow with a faraway look.



But, at that time, perhaps it was just a coincidence but one dragon clawed on the ground with its hind leg. The soil that was hurled from that went splat on Hajime.



That action was as though, like what a cat or a dog would do to filth……



「……Go, Goshujin-sama?」



「……」



Hajime didn't reply. He merely grinned.



Crimson magic power suddenly sparked. The dragons were still busy fawning on Tio. They didn't notice how they had stepped on a landmine.



Hajime slowly walked while still having the barrier and Presence Isolation activated and he took position at the center of the dragons by skillfully manipulating the distance.



There the dragons finally noticed the strange air and they looked around restlessly.



And then, they turned their gaze at the area centered around them that was for some reason was empty without anyone there.



――Stand B~y! Stand B~~y!!



――Now, everyone, are you all finished with your preparation?



――It's starting you know?



――Pe~~ek, aa~~~~~~~~~……demon king!



The barrier vanished and the Presence Isolation was dispelled.



What appeared was a bursting crimson magic power with the demon king-sama grinning wideeeeely at the center.



The result went without saying.



「「「「「PIGYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!!」」」」」



The dragons' scream that was filled with fright resounded through the clear blue sky.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 231




At a corner of an island floating in the sky, there was a demon king sitting on the ground grasping his knees.



It was Hajime.



「Even though thou understood this is how it wouldst end up……」



A weeping back, eyes that looked like dead fish, a beautiful huddling posture. Hajime who was the personification of picture perfect "depressed person" was told by Tio with an exasperated expression.



「Guu」



He barely could let out a 'guu' sound. Seeing such Hajime, Tio snickered once more even through her exasperation. The situation that was the exact opposite of their normal act surely would make anyone who knew these two to doubt their eyes if they saw this. (TN: In Japan there is a saying of "he cannot even make 'guu' sound" to show how speechless or cornered the person is)



「Come on, Goshujin-sama. Come back to thyself quickly. Thou art going to investigate the cause of this island's floating state correct?」



Tio squatted snugly beside Hajime. She peered into Hajime's face with a consoling smile. Hajime glanced at Tio. And next he glanced across his shoulder to look behind.



Over there were several fainting dragons with the white of their eyes completely exposed. Several of their fellow dragons poked at them to ascertain their well-being while several others were staring fearfully at Hajime and Tio. It went without saying that the fainted group was the victim of one of Demon King-Style 108 Harassment Skills, "Peek-a-Demon King!".



「Just leave me alone and take care of those guys. You see, I'm disgusted from the bottom of my heart of a foolish existence like me.」



「Well, certainly, it was really immature.」



「Gufuh. Getting told that by the like of a hopeless dragon……depressing. I want to……not die, I want to be a shut-in.」



「Even though Goshujin-sama's mind art damaged that much, but this natural abuse, nnn-」



Tio's cheeks reddened while her body fidgeted.



A dragon that was poking its comrade behind tilted its head「Oh?」, and a beat later it made a commotion *gyau gyau*. The other dragons that got startled and turned around then started to make similar noise. A fainting dragon had its tongue spilled out limply from its mouth. ……It seemed that it was just a step short from the death's door.



「However, for Goshujin-sama to make merry until this far, how rare this is.」



「Well, I cannot deny that my mood is uplifted more than usual. After all an adventure where there is no clear objective, no powerful enemy, and no companion's life at stake like this is the first.」



「Boy.」



「You say that, but you too are high spirited aren't you?」



「Yes. I couldst not deny that.」



One more dragon had its tongue spilled out limply. And then one more dragon, although it opened its eyes just for a moment, it then stretched its forelegs to the sky――before losing strength and flopped on the ground.



This scene was obvious to the trained eye. Right now, something that looked like a white vapor was rising out from the limply unmoving dragons toward the heaven with swaying motion! They were dying from the shock of "Peek-a-Demon King"!



「Well, for now, I'll depend on you to keep my disgrace a secret okay? As expected, if this is known by Yue and others, then I'll turn into a real shut-in from shame and self-disgust.」



Hajime stood up while making Tio to promise to keep this a secret. He then turned on his heel and walked away briskly. He was heading toward the dragons making *gyau gyau* noise at their comrades' death.



The surviving dragons were startled by Hajime's approach and their body froze before they escaped in panic.



「Fufufuh, a secret just between the two of us, that really art not bad. Very well. The childish figure of Goshujin-sama will be locked inside mine heart.」



「Please, okay? Now then, you guys, don't go to the other side as you please.」



Hajime was talking with Tio while fitting his hand into a black glove that was overflowing with romance. He then suddenly reached out his hand to empty air and grasped something violently. And then, he drove it into the dragon below him.



The dragon with its tongue lolling out twitched and convulsed. The other dragons raised their cry while evacuating to the sky, as though to say「He is beating up a corpse!?」



Not paying any attention to that, Hajime did the same thing to the other dragons, he caught something midair and then drove that something with a palm strike into the dragons' body.



「Still, looking at them from nearby like this I can really see it……these dragons, their body is really frail.」



「Yes. They art scared against human, and then the polluted land, there art no doubt that this world is a harsh place without sufficient food for these children to live.」



While conversing like that, Hajime made red sparks running through the black glove. *bachi bachi* With that sound, the hand became clad in moderate electricity before Hajime's hand casually struck at the place where the heart of the dragon with lolling tongue seemed to be located at while he was still talking normally with Tio.



The dragon with lolling tongue twitched and trembled. At the next moment, its eyes opened with a snap and it accomplished its revival!



The "Lightning Clad" seemed to be overflowing with casualness, but actually it had been superbly adjusted. Hajime also granted electric shock using that into the dragons that were ascending to heaven.



By the way, Hajime reaching out his hand to empty air was a direct blow to soul――by using the black glove that was a protection artifact, Hajime grasped the soul of the dragons that was ascending to heaven and returned them to their body.



The dragons that received the relatively rough direct resurrection treatment were shivering in terror as expected when they saw Hajime. Hajime muttered「Well, can't be helped. I reap what I sow」. For the time being he took out food――meat that was preserved inside "Treasure Warehouse II" for the bean sprouts dragons.



Hajime threw it carelessly at the dragons' feet. The dragons jumped in place because they couldn't escape even if they wanted with their distance being too close to Hajime, even so their nose was twitching from the wafting smell from below.



They were bothered about Hajime. Or rather, they were scared. Perhaps they would be killed instantly the moment they took their eyes off from him……



Even while thinking that, drools were already dripping like river from their mouth. In less than ten second their eyes were already glancing repeatedly at their feet.



They looked like a doggy that was told to "wait" .



Hajime smiled wryly.



「That's an apology for surprising you guys. You guys looking like bean sprouts even though you are a dragon race is also pitiful. Eat as much as you want.」



Saying that, Hajime also carelessly leave behind raw meats including the share of the dragons that were circling above while observing the situation. And then he drew back.



The dragons looked at each other. 'He is not attacking? What is this thing with good smell? Is it okay to eat?' It felt like those voices of heart could be heard from them.



The flying dragons hesitantly landed down. And then, their eyes were getting bloodshot from seeing the lumps of meat while drools were dripping down from their mouth like waterfall. The dragons looked at each other, and then, they glanced at Hajime.



Hajime was standing silently beside Tio. Beside the mysteriously kind great existence who was clad in the same presence like them.



Before long, one dragon became unable to endure anymore and bit at the edge of the meat. While the other dragons were watching over him「O, oi. You are okay?」, for a moment the dragon stiffened, and then its eyes snapped open instantly before it charged the lump of meat.



「GYUUOOOOWAAAAA!」



Anyone could understand even without word. That was truly a roar of joy! 'How can something this delicious exist in this world! This is like a treasure of food~~-!!' Such voice of heart was resounding.



Naturally the other dragons also snapped at the meat. And then, they raised similar roar of joy.



One dragon exposed its white of eyes and its tongue lolled out from the excessive deliciousness and excitement. Its soul that looked like a white vapor was ascending to heaven. Hajime quickly grasped it, drove it *zudon-* into the body, and revived it with *bachi bachi*. The dragon then snapped into the meat once more.



「These guys, they are dying too easily. Just how frail they are?」



「Truly, this art too pitiful for a dragon race……was what I wanted to say, but it looks like this art even their first time eating meat for these children. Most likely, they art surviving by living in this island eating fruits or something else. By the way, why art Goshujin-sama bringing meat like that?」



「Aa. Remember, we had barbecue before right? A lot of people came and so I bought a lot of meat in preparation in high spirits, these meats are the remains from that time.」



「Mu. Wait a second, Goshujin-sama. If I remember correctly, the meat at that time was really good meat correct? I remember that it was the brand product from somewhere.」



「Yeah. These are grade A5 meats.」



「……The meat they art eating for the first time, art the top quality product. Perhaps it couldst not be helped if they ascend to heaven from that.」



Rather, this was an act that would make the meat producer to fly into rage saying 'don't use this meat for animal food!'. If Hajime was going to make excuse, he gave them this kind of meat because he only had preserved food other than this. Even Hajime felt a bit regretful doing this.



But, this act that was an extravagance in a sense brought an unexpected result at the present.



「Hm? ……Their wariness is lessening slightly?」



Yes, the dragons that were giving off satisfied aura as though to say「I'm full!」were sending glances at Hajime. From those gazes, it certainly looked like the color of terror from before was lessening. Right now if he had to say they were more bewildered than scared.



「……Are we mistaken perhaps? Who will ever thought that these guys who were that scared against human will change their heart like this just from a single food.」



「Muu. These children art too simple that it's worrisome. They are like children who wouldst follow a stranger just because they are promised candy.」



It was unthinkable for a wild beast to so easily let go of the wariness they had harbored once. That was why Hajime gave them meat in the name of apologizing but……at this rate, perhaps these dragons would react warmly against human who they actually ought to be wary against different from before.



The result of doing that would be the same like shortening the life of these dragons. Therefore, Hajime's expression turned a bit bitter.



「But if you look from the opposite, perhaps they are being so cornered to the degree that their wariness will lessen just from a single food……」



Hajime sighed. And then, he exposed a really speechless expression before he suddenly changed his presence.



「Sorry. I didn't intend to toy with you guys but……I did something bad. Get scared against human properly.」



Saying that, Hajime was about to emit "Pressure"――it was at that time,



「「「「「Gyauh!?」」」」」



The dragons suddenly turned around in panic and rushed in full speed into the forest.



「Goshujin-sama?」



「No, that's not me. I haven't emit Pressure. Just what in the――」



Tio turned a face that was questioning Hajime, but naturally Hajime responded with words of denial. Hajime himself was tilting his head n puzzlement why the dragons suddenly ran away.



But, the next moment, he noticed the cause and stopped his words. If it was the hell rabbit ear Shia, the it would be possible that she would notice in the same time or possibly faster than the dragons.



「What? Something is approaching? A living thing……but this voice」



「Mu? I couldst not hear anything……no, now I ccouldst. ……This is…..it sounds like motor?」



「Ye, yeah. I also can hear something like that……」



From faraway the sound of *kiiiiiiiii-* was faintly resounding. Certainly it was just like Tio said, the sound resembled motor sound. Yes, it was a voice that was raised by machine. Therefore Hajime couldn't hide his bewilderment.



A black rain that polluted the world, dragon, and floating island in the sky. In this undoubtedly fantasy world, something that was making a sound that resembled motor sound was approaching rapidly. It couldn't be helped that his image of this world was crumbling.



「Nevertheless, this thing is……」



「Fast!」



The moment Tio continued Hajime's sentence, that thing showed its appearance along with a high-pitched sound.



A hard-looking frame in delta shape that had a trace of roundness with sky blue color that could be concealed by the azure sky. Several long and narrow tubes were attached at its bottom part. There were five of them, rushing straight toward the floating island with beautiful triangle formation.



Seeing those things flying away instantly above Hajime and Tio, Hajime said,



「Why fighter aircrafts!?」



He grandly acted the straight-man.



Yes, those things were obviously fighter aircrafts. If compared to the existing aircraft in earth, then these aircrafts looked like space fighter aircraft that appeared in a movie of near future, but Hajime's excellent eyes certainly caught sight of a few things. That human was riding inside the cockpit installed at the front part of the airframe, and that the tube things installed below the aircraft resembled the missile in earth.



「……Goshujin-sama. It seemed our world view art mistaken. If we hath to say what kind of world this is――it's SF.」



「What's with this chaos.」



A black rain that polluted the world, dragon, and floating island in the sky, futuristic fighter aircrafts flying in the sky.



Certainly it was a chaotic world.



*KIIII* The hard sound resounded from the other world aircraft that drew a beautiful arc in the sky. The formation of five planes was circling above as though to observe the floating island and then they took distance for the moment.



「The other side should be able to see us too. It will be fine if they can communicate with us somehow.」



「For now, how about trying to talk with them using telepathy Goshujin-sama?」



Hajime and Tio talked with each other carefreely. Ahead of their gaze, one of the circling aircraft suddenly began to be clad with a strange light. The aircraft that was giving off presence that felt increasingly like SF――or rather like UFO, it released something like light ripple the moment it passed across the forest.



There wasn't any thunderous sound reverberating or the forest getting blown up. But, there was certainly a result from that.



*KIIIIII-*



A hard sound that was different from the motor sound struck the ear.



「-, this is」



「Sound wave?」



Hajime and Tio screwed up their face reflexively. Tio immediately blocked the sound wave using wind barrier, but even so that sound attack caused her headache.



Naturally, for the dragons whose hearing was better than Hajime and Tio and didn't possess any barrier, this was an attack that would make them feel outrageous agony.



「「「「KUWAAAAAAAAH」」」」



The dragons raised a cry that sounded like scream and they flew out all at once from the forest.



It seemed they fell into panic. They frantically tried to distance themselves from the forest as much as they could. There, another plane fired its missile.



The missile that was approaching in high speed burst before it could impact the dragons, and from there a net was ejected.



The net spread widely and enveloped the dragons without even giving them time to twist their body. On top of that, the net wasn't falling down but it stayed fixed midair and restrained the dragons. It was as though the dragons were locked inside a cage that was created midair.



「A hunt, huh.」



「……I see. We art not helping?」



Tio didn't sound blaming. She asked merely as a question. Hajime made a wry smile.



「If there is someone being a nuisance to a fisherman saying『What are you doing catching the fish huh!』, then that person is simply an idiot. No, rather he is a scoundrel that is hindering the fisherman's work.」



「Certainly. It's not something good if we who doth not know anything about this world interfere as we pleased.」



It was a completely sound reasoning. They only had a bit of interaction with the dragons, but it would be a lie if they said that they didn't feel attachment at all to the dragons whose reaction were like a stray dog. However, if they were asked whether they were so attached to the dragons to the degree that they would hinder the aircraft pilots who were possibly hunting the dragon to feed their family or for some kind of important work, then the answer was a big NO.



「But, I'm curious to the working of that net that is fixed midair and the sound wave attack and flashing phenomenon of the aircraft. No matter how I look, their driving force seem different compared to earth's aircraft……perhaps, it might have the same principle with how this island is floating.」



「Either way, they art a party that we might be able to exchange word with. Letting this chance get away art not an option. The problem now, art how to form communication with them, but……art we going to try sending them telepathy?」



「It will be great if my Language Comprehension and interpreter artifact can demonstrate their effect.」



Even while the two were conversing, most of the dragons that were flying out from the forest were captured. Hajime was observing to see how the dragons would be transported, but during that time one of the aircraft circled around and it was facing its nose toward Hajime and Tio.



「Oh, as expected it looks like they noticed us. Seem the toher side is the one coming to contact us see?」



「Ri, right. It appears so but……for some reason, I hath a bad premonition though.」



Tio's premonition was correct.



The moment *voo-* an instantaneous sound split the air and a sudden flash scattered from the lower part of the aircraft's nose――wind of killing intent assaulted the two.



What was fired without any warning was a machine gun. The storm of bullets that were concealing terrible destructive power mercilessly rushed at Hajime and Tio. The surrounding ground was rupturing as though getting blown away. The thrown up cloud of dust covered the two from view.



The aircraft passed overhead Hajime and Tio as though nothing had happened and it rejoined its comrade. It didn't even give any glance at Hajime and Tio anymore. It was clear that the pilot thought the two weren't existence that was worth anything. It was only mowing a grass at a corner of the garden that was an eyesore――that was how it felt like.



「……Calm down me. This is another world. Don't judge things with our own common sense.」



「……Those guys……ignorance art truly terrifying isn't it.」



The cloud of dust was carried away by the wind. What appeared from there was naturally the unharmed Hajime and Tio. Cube-shaped barrier was deployed around them using Cross Velt. The strafing that had a might which resembled 30mm Vulcan cannon was blocked without even a single crack in the barrier.



However, it was doubtful whether the heart of the person inside could block that kind of uncompromising tyranny.



Hajime was folding his arms with vein pulsing on his forehead, even so he was trying to suppress his anger and persuaded himself. Tio beside him was directing a gaze that was shuddering in terror to the aircraft pilots. Of course, that shudder wasn't directed toward their strength, but at their attitude that was picking a fight against a godslayer right from the front.



「This is a world with polluted land. Then, a ground that is floating in the sky must be really important for human to live. Naturally, they should be managing and protecting it strictly. And now there are unknown people rudely stepping on it. I cannot complain even if I got shot without any warning whatsoever. Isn't that right, me? That's right, me.」



「Go, Goshujin-sama. I understand that thy art angry, so please stop that soliloquizing. Somehow it's terrifying in different meaning.」



The way to suppress anger Hajime-style――soliloquizing. Seen from the side, it was a skill that was wholly judged to be more terrifying then getting angry normally.



Because in earth there was no way he could uncompromisingly go "instant death for everyone♡" like when he was in Tortus, this was a patience skill that Hajime newly learned.



From afar, seeing how Hajime and Tio were unharmed, the pilot seemed to be taken aback and he directed its aircraft's nose toward the two once more.



Hajime cleared his throat once and he called for ceasefire while activating "Telepathy".



『Aa~, pilot-san, pilot-san. Can you hear? We don't have any ill intention. If we are trespassing illegally, then we will apologize and get out right away. That's why, first let's have a tal――』



Missile coming!! Without warning it went whoo~~~sh-!!



Of course, Hajime and Tio were unharmed.



『……』



『Sto, stop it! All of theee, doth thee hath a death wish!? Let's hath a talk right now!』



Hajime was muttering to himself inaudibly.「Perhaps the telepathy didn't go through. No, perhaps they didn't understand the language. Perseverance is important in communication. Isn't that's right, me? That's right, me」He was soliloquizing again. His eyes were completely not moving though.



『Please, listen to us. We――』



Missile comi~~~ng-!! Yes, whoo~~~~sh-!!



Perhaps the missile this time was of a different variety, it didn't just explode but it had extra flame blast with viscosity. The surrounding was dyed crimson. However, inside the flame that was blazing rumblingly, the two were standing still unharmed as expected.



Tio was getting flustered 'awawawa' while glancing at Hajime, but when she saw Hajime's expression had gone past rage and he was starting to smile instead, she covered her face with both hands as though to say「I cannot bear to see this anymore!」



But, it would be troubling if the current Hajime was looked down on. In order for him to live normally in earth at Japan, his homeland that believed in law and order, everyday he was working hard to not use violence, but instead he was learning different strength that was patience and perseverance, negotiation power and financial strength.



He wouldn't snap just from a bit of machine gun strafing and missiles!



……It felt like the dragons would want to retort「Then, why did you snap before this!?」if they knew it.



『Pilot-san, we――』



Hajime tried to call out once more with a voice that had lost any intonation. This time, finally there was a reaction. Although, the reaction wasn't something that "came back" to Hajime, but a complete ignoring of Hajime.



『Chih, what the hell is this. Don't tell me they are carrying shielding device in the same level with a warship?』



『Vans-san, surely that's impossible. Do you see anywhere any device with size necessary for shield of warship level?』



『Are they OOPArt owner? ……I want that.』(TN: Out of Place Artifact)



『No way, you think there is any explorer in this ear huh. Rather than that, look there. That woman. Her outfit is strange, but she is an extremely fine jewel yeah? Hey, Vans-san? Looks like that guy is calling at us, so let's land down and kill just the man, then give me that woman. The woman from before is not usable anymore. I want to make her my new pet.』



It appeared these guys weren't really guys with class. At the same time, it seemed they were thinking that the conversation at their side weren't leaking out. Most likely they were under the impression that the communication method of Hajime and Tio was something like their own method, it seemed they thought that they couldn't be heard because they were in different frequency (?).



Hajime was silent. However, any color was gradually leaving his smiling face.



In the middle of that, the man who seemed to be the leader called Vans-san said this to the man who made a remark of wanting to kill Hajime and make only Tio as pet,



『Hmph? Certainly, I'm curious with that abnormally strong shield. ……Fine then. We will land down and pull information out from them. After that kill the man――and I'll take the woman.』



『Eeh!? That's unfair!』



『Don't make a ruckus. I'll lend her to you when I'm not using her.』



『A~a, can't be helped then~』



Their screwed up conversation was continuing. The five fighter aircrafts――if following what they were saying, it seemed the plane was called sky battlecraft――that were circling with their nose directed at Hajime and Tio were lowering their speed and altitude. Currently in the conversation that was being leaked out clearly, the hot topics were about how they would kill Hajime or how they would rape Tio later.



「……Haa, the fools. They art waking up a monster that is not necessary to wake up. They art getting their just dessert.」



Tio's words were muttered to herself.



The sky battlecrafts were approaching. The dragons were peeking at their direction from inside the net.



Hajime figure vanished instantly.



And then, the pilots of the sky battlecrafts, especially Vans who was flying in the lead as the first plane, were doubting their eyes.



『There is no need to get down. I'll send you all down to hell myself.』



A flat voice was resounding inside their head. At the same time, an impossible sight in front of them leaped into their sight.



With a giant weapon loaded with giant stake carried in one hand, a human silhouette jumped at the front of the flying sky battlecraft's cockpit while scattering crimson spark.



「Eh? Ah? What――」



That became the last sentence of the man named Vans.



『What……the hell, is that』



『Just now, what happened!?』



『What is going on!?』



『Shit-, is that seriously some kind of OOPArt!?』



Panicked voices resounded.



The sight that they witnessed.



It was a moment of a man jumping up for a few hundred meters with blood and flesh body, and then with one hand carrying a weapon that was unthinkable for any human to lift, he literally pulverized the first plane.



The wreckage of the first plan that was scattered into little pieces and shower of flesh and blood were raining down to the ground. A single black giant stake pierced the floating island like a gravestone.



The pilots that were cursing while rapidly turning their plane were treated with further absurd sight.



It was a sight of a barrage of giant stakes flying wildly everywhere.



『Sca, scatterrr!』



The plane that seemed to be the second in rank immediately gave a command, but he was already too late. One plane received a direct hit and got turned into scraps midair.



『Holy shit-, you bastard, I'll absolutely murder――』



The one speaking turned speechless. His eyes were opened wide. That was natural. After all, the target was calmly standing midair while causing crimson ripples, furthermore at the opposite hand of the hand carrying the weapon that was shooting out giant stakes――gatling pile bunker, another giant weapon materialized.



The name of that weapon which was put on the shoulder was――Agni - Orkan. It was a weapon that displayed the most power in surface-to-air combat.



Instantly, a great number of missiles were launched.



The man that was about to spit out curse screamed soundlessly while steering his plane, but how could he possibly evade more than fifty missiles that were assaulting him from every directions. Naturally, his fate was decided.



One more flower of flame blast bloomed in the sky.



『Withdraw! We're withdrawing!』



『Mo, monster-』



The two remaining sky battlecrafts circled with a maneuver that was possibly even more outstanding that aircrafts made in earth. They tried to retreat from the battlefield right away with their highest speed.



Their speed was also amazing as expected, they had turned into the size of bean in one breath.



Hajime silently stowed away the gatling pile bunker and Agni - Orkan, and he took out the replacement weapon.



――Anti-Material Sniping Cannon Schlagen AA (Acht Acht)



Across the scope, a sky battlecraft escaping to the sky faraway was reflecting.



『That was a good lesson right? Use it as reference in hell.』



The trigger was pulled after that whisper. No matter how excellent the speed of the sky battlecraft, there was no way they could match the speed of a bullet that was accelerated electromagnetically. One plane was pierced from its back part until its front part, and then with a state that was like it was skewered, its figure was vanishing into the sea of clouds.



Hajime who was shouldering Schlagen AA called out to Tio.



「Tio. We are pursuing. We are annihilating――not, it appear that plane is returning back toward its comrade's location. Let's thoroughly have them tell us about this world.」



「Aa, yes. That's right.」



Tio was seeing Hajime tearing apart the nets capturing the dragons using cakram with a wry smile while transforming into dragon.



And then, Hajime rode on her back and she started flying in the sky with a terrific speed.



「Goshujin-sama, thank you.」



「……For what?」



Tio didn't answer. Hajime also understood what it was about. She was happy that he exposed his wrath when the men said they would make her a pet.



Instead of answering, Tio's acceleration that was far smoother than usual told the answer more eloquently than anything.



「Now then. Was that the standard of this world's human, or else it's different, I'll have them show me.」



「Thy art really on fire……」



Even while feeling a bit excited at the fierce gleam in the eyes of Hajime who was facing an enemy that she was seeing for the first time in a while, Tio was also feeling just a little pity at the vulgar residence of this other world who angered the demon king right from the start.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Recently, I'm becoming unable to make it in time……I'm sorry.



Now then, just when you thought it's fantasy, it's actually half SF! That kind of story.



Tio arc, just where in the world it's going to? Even Shirakome didn't know.



But, I'm writing while picturing an enjoyable development. Just like usual!



The next update us planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 232




The near future type aircraft made in another world was racing through the sky in a speed that left the territory of sound in the lurch.



It detoured a large cloud mountain with amazing turn to shake off something, it then accelerated in one go from its slight reduction in speed. The nozzle at the plane's rear was ejecting sparkling silver particles――the ejected amount increased explosively.



The sky battlecraft intruded into the world of the speed of sound once more along with an impact sound. The surrounding cloud was blown away from the shockwave. Its acceleration knew no end and it had easily surpassed Mach 2 already.



『NUOOOOOH-. THAT'S REALLY FAST-. AS EXPECTED FROM FIGHTER AIRCRAFT! IT'S GETTING AWAYYYYY-』



A beat later, a black dragon appeared by charging through the cloud mountain with a desperate look. A whirling black wind was deployed around Tio. Seen from the side, it looked like there was a jet black typhoon flying horizontally.



It was Tio's flying skill that realized flying in super speed by reducing the air resistance to the extreme and furthermore she caused a spiral shaped wind around herself to convert it into propulsive power. Even if one looked at the long history of the dragon race, there didn't exist anyone that entered the realm of the speed of sound.



Therefore, something like storming into an unknown territory of speed, and what's more it didn't stop there, furthermore she was flying while maintaining a speed that was twice the speed of sound. It was truly something out of common sense. A miraculous feat that couldn't possibly be realized without the age of god magic called sublimation magic and the assistance of artifact. Of course, there was also the delicate yet powerful skill that should be called as Tio's own special talent included in there.



Tio was unmistakably the history's fastest living thing in Tortus. However, even so it was the fact that against the aircraft that was continuously accelerating even now she was gradually getting left behind. She somehow managed to be hot at its tail because the aircraft would sometimes take evasive maneuver against the threat of Hajime's sniping but……



『Hmm~, looks like it will be the limit soon even with the threatening. It seems he is starting to realize that we got no intention to hit him.』



『Nuu. I know that I couldst not win against fighter aircraft in a match of pure speed but……when it comes to it, it's vexing to be left behind like this.』



『No, by the time there is a biological creature that can freely fly in the sky at speed twice the speed of sound, complete with heavy armor and high firepower, that's already a nightmare. You too has deviated much from the scope of a living thing you know?』



『I'm happy to be praised, but it's only this that I couldst not accept even with logic.』



Tio was looking at far away at the sky battlecraft that was already looked nothing but a speck in the sky while moaning「Muu」in dissatisfaction.



Seeing such Tio, for a beat Hajime tilted his head as though he was thinking of something, and right after that he grinned――and took out something.



It looked black, thin, long, and elastic――



『Here we go, Tio. Let's show our combination move.』



『Mu? What in the world――-, tha, that's!?』



Tio glanced back at Hajime's words and she opened her eyes wide in astonishment, her voice was raised half in shock and half if joy.



That thing which her gaze captured. That thing which was going to be swung right now.



――Black Whip ver 2.1 "This is not a weapon. It's for personal use desu"



It could be easily guessed for what kind of personal use it was used for.



『GO-, TIO! UNTIL THE OTHER SIDE OF THE SKY!』



The black whip was swung down. *hyun-* It split the air and dexterously flew to right behind and made a really good sound *bechin-*.



『AA―――!! HOW COULDDDDDD-. Thi, this sensation that hath been a while-』



『What's the matter Tio! Your strength shouldn't be just this much!』



Once more, *bechikon-!* The greatly twirling whip's tip was *donpisha-* striking Tio's butt.



『IT CAME IT CAME IT CAME-! MINE POWER IS OVERFLOWING OUT! MORE! HIT MY BUTT MOREEE! WITH THAT, I FEEL LIKE I COULDST GO FURTHER!』



『You said it! You matchless pervert dragon! I'll give you more!』



『BRING IT O―――N-!!』



Tio's eyes were getting moist. Her mouth was leaking out heated breathing 'haa haa'. Her body was shivering in joy and the jet black tornado enveloping her was fiercely increasing in acceleration! By using her special skill "Pain Conversion", the reward that was granted to her by her master was giving her strength! Her speed was increasing endlessly!



The sky battlecraft that had turned into a speck was getting larger to the size of a thumb!



『PLEASE HIT ME! MINE BUTT, PLEASE TORMENT IT MORE!』



*hyun hyun-hyuun-* When the sound of slicing wind resounded, the sound of whip blow *bishi-, bashi-, bechikon-* was resounding as though in respond of that entreaty. By using the personal use artifact that was bypassing the black scales and granting direct and superb pain only to the internal, the hopeless dragon-san was reaching her perfect form!



The sky battlecraft at the front was reeling for an instant.



Just when he thought that he had barely escaped with his life from the incomprehensible monster that destroyed sky battlecrafts using flesh and blood body, next a majestic black dragon that he had never seen before was chasing after him clad in jet black typhoon. In addition the dragon was moving in speed of sound and also equipped with something like laser cannon attack.



He lost count how many times he made mistake with his piloting and reduced his speed from shock……



On top of that, a perverted roar that was mixed with excitement『HIT MINE BUTTTTT-』reached his ear as though that solemn voice was coming from the sky.



The pilot was in chaos! Next he became teary eyed! He couldn't understand what the reality was anymore!



「Glowser 4-. I believe in you! Get me out from this nightmare!」



The pilot called out to his beloved plane――Glowser 4 with a pleading voice. The mindless plane was naturally keeping silent, but due to the hard stepping on the slot pedal, it was displaying its ability until the very limit of its performance.



Based from the specification, it was a super fast sky battlecraft that could reach the maximum speed of Mach 4.4 in pure straight line. It left behind explosive sound that was like the air ruptured and dashed through the sky like a streak of meteor.



Behind it, the hopeless dragon-san was chasing right on its tail! The owner-san riding on her back was swinging around "personal not weapon" without pause in high spirits! Howls of joy were resounding through the vast sky! Tio Claus was outdoing modern aircraft!



『ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA-, you got slightly left behind! Put your strength into your ass! This damned hopeless dragon-』



『AHIIIIIIIH! I CAME! I'M COMING TO BEYOND THE SKYYYYYYYY-』



「Just what the hell-. Please no more-. Someone HELP MEEEEEEEEE-」



The sky was blue. The wind was refreshing, the sea of clouds was beautiful.



Amidst such magnificent nature, three different roars from three different people were……



It was truly, a chaos.



A while after chaos was spread in the azure sky,



『Hics……』



「Don't cry Tio. You set a new record you know? You are without a doubt the fastest living thing in history. You are amazing. In various meaning.」



There was the figure of Tio who was flying in normal speed while sobbing and Hajime who was consoling her.



It stood to reason. Tio who reached the realm of four times the speed of sound even though it was just for a moment was unmistakably an existence that had deviated from the scope of living thing and could be said to have entered the realm of god. But, even so, she was unable to match the endurance of the near future type aircraft of another world that could maintain such speed continuously. In the end she was left behind like this and her pride got hurt.



『It's vexing, how vexing』



「Come on, stop crying already. You are amazing okay.」



Hajime exposed a gentle expression that was unthinkable coming from the person who just now was exhibiting a storm-like whipping while laughing loudly. He was patting *pon pon* and caressing Tio's black scale.



To be given the carrot after the whip, Tio drew in her tear of vexation and continued「But……」while enveloped in aura of happiness.



『We let go of a source that we couldst finally communicate with. What wouldst we do from here, Goshujin-sama.』



「H~m, let's see. We can also return to the floating island just now and investigate the cause that make the island float, but we had flown really far from there. Let's try to go for a bit toward the direction that guy is flying to.」



『Well, in this first place this art an aimless adventure, I don't mind that.』



While saying such thing, the two continued to fly carefreely in pursuit of someone who they didn't know how far he had escaped.



Sometimes Hajime would change their route randomly saying things like「Let's try going over there」or「Let's try going toward that cloud」. Tio would tilt her head thinking「He is not in the mood of chasing anymore?」, even so there wasn't any particular reason for her to object so she would continue fly following the instruction.



Like that, they must have flew continuously for half a day.



Midway, they were discovering several floating islands while advancing through scenery that wasn't really changing. The time was finally starting to enter a period where the sun was starting to sink at the other side of the sea of clouds.



Inside the world that was painfully beautiful dyed in madder red color, it appeared.



「Hee. This thing is also really big. Is this a mother ship I wonder?」



『……It's not clear if this is the place where that guy escaped. Well, though it doth not feel like we art mistaken based on the direction and distance.』



「Ou. We aren't mistaken.」



For a moment, Tio directed a really speechless expression at Hajime, but she immediately pulled herself together and asked「What wouldst we do?」



Hajime showed a thinking gesture while staring at the thing ahead of his gaze.



It was a large flying warship vacantly shining dull grey from the illumination of the sun's orange light. It shape was similar with a blimp in earth's term. It had a small but wide shape like a rugby ball. Thinking how it was made from metal, its shape as a while was unsuited for flying, but it was giving a definite sense of stability even seen from afar. It was ejecting out sparkling silver particles to the back while flying with considerable speed.



Its size was about as big as two aircraft carriers in earth. Seeing really closely at it, there were countless cylindrical protrusions on its exterior. There was no need to guess that those were weapons on board the ship. Countless small square hatches were lining up. There was no doubt that those were for the loaded weapon like missiles or the like.



'This is becoming even more like SF' ――Hajime was thinking of such thing while speaking out their plan.



「Yosh, the situation changed from pure fantasy to semi-SF. We too will job change from adventurer to spy.」



『H, hmm? In other words, we art going to infiltrate?』



「Yeah, somehow I'm getting thrilled. Tio, dispel your transformation. We are sneaking into that mother ship overflowing with romance――Golia○ with camouflaging artifact fully deployed.」(TN: Goliath is a destroyer ship in Laputa)



『It feels like that temporary name art telling the fate that ship wouldst meet though……the flag of its sinking art as likely as a certain Titani○-san』



Tio was saying such thing while emitting a bright flash from her transformation cancellation. She was hovering with her wings showed out using partial transformation. Hajime also took out a skyboard from "Treasure Warehouse II" that he rode on. He activated pencil Cross Velt and deployed barrier for camouflage.



「Do those guys have the technology that can break our camouflage……we won't know until we try it.」



「What wouldst we do if we art discovered?」



「Of course, we will have a peaceful dialogue. After all I am a virtuous and exemplary Japanese. If I tell them that I'll at least spare their life if they hand over the guy screwing around before this, then surely both sides will be able to build a friendly relationship.」



「Goshujin-sama, that's a joke correct? Thy face art serious and thy voice art flat, but that's a joke correct? Isn't that right?」



Haijme-san didn't answer. Since the ancient time a good Japanese boy was a taciturn person!



In a state that was without sound, and without shape if seen from outside, and furthermore without heat that couldn't be detected, the two of them approached sii~~lently from behind the mother ship. They could feel how big it was the closer they got.



The two who arrived above the mother ship removed away the skyboard and wings before landing on the edge of a giant deck.



「……This is unknown metal, but it doesn't have any particular effect. I guess it's a normal metal.」



「So this thing art floating not because of the metal.」



Hajime whispered while kneeling on the deck with his hand crawling on the smooth floor. Tio was paying attention to the surrounding but there wasn't any human sign on the deck. At the central part there was a sticking out place that seemed to be the control room of the mother ship. They could see glimpses of human silhouettes across the windbreak. They couldn't make the judgment whether that place was really the control room or just a watchtower.



「Goshujin-sama. Although we hath invisibility barrier, I just couldst not calm down no matter what by staying for long in a place this open. I couldst see something like an entrance over there, how about we hath a look for now?」



「I guess. I'm curious with the material and some other things but……well, I can just take some sample with me.」



Hajime said such thing and he casually tore off a railing and stored it into "Treasure Warehouse II". The area part around ten meters from the door that seemed to be the entrance became uneven as though it had been gnawed by worms.



What a natural vandalism & larceny. Police officer, catch this demon king please.



Whether he actually noticed the amazed expression of Tio behind him, Hajime whose mood to be stealthy was zero despite being in the middle of infiltration was advancing through the deck briskly and reached in front of the door that connected to inside. He covered the whole door with barrier so to not ring any alarm from the difference in air pressure and the like and he put his hand on the door to investigate if there was any trap.



And then he used transmutation and changed the door into a mere hole and stepped inside also with a casual attitude. Tio followed in and the door was returned to its former shape again with transmutation. Lock or anything was meaningless in front of a transmutation master.



「For now, infiltration success.」



「How strange. This art different from the infiltration that I know though.」



Hajime nodded in satisfaction that there wasn't any alarm that got triggered. Tio's expression was really complicated.



Both of them paid attention to the presence at their surrounding while advancing forward. They progressed through the passage of smooth metal. Several places were gouged by Hajime-san's hand. He was like someone who was using coin to scratch cars on the roadside while casually strolling. It was truly a nasty prank (?).



「The driving force is likely to be at the rear of the hull. Also, that place n the highest position, it must be the watchtower or the control room.」



「That sparkling particles must be one of the reason the island art floating. Then, should we search the rear hull first?」



Hajime thought for a bit before nodding at Tio's suggestion.



「Yeah, I want to quickly carve the meaning of regret to that guy who got away but, well, we know he is inside this ship anyway, we can put him for later.」



「……Right.」



Both of them vaguely headed toward the rear hull. In contrast with how big the ship was, the corridors inside were unexpectedly narrow. Three people walking side by side would feel cramped.



Naturally on the way they encountered a lot of the ship's crew.



Hajime and Tio who were able to detect the other party's position using Presence Detection before they bumped with each other kept advancing forward without getting discovered.



Even in the case they encountered a small group inside the small corridor, they would jump to the ceiling and pierced the ceiling with fingers thrust and clung there until the group passed, or created an appropriate gap on the wall using transmutation and pushed their body into there until the group passed.



The mood was really like a certain spy somewhere. Hajime's expression was in enjoyment as though his childlike innocence had returned to him.



By the way, when they were clinging on the ceiling, Hajime would turn into something like human hammock to take hold of Tio, and when they slipped into the gap created in the wall, Hajime would embrace Tio tightly, so Tio herself was also really having much fun with it in feeling embarrassed and happy.



「It seems there art a proper country existing. They look like military personnel. Their ethics art low, but they hath obedience for the chain of command.」



「Yeah. They are proper military with pecking order divided into ranks. The military can deploy an expedition of this scale means that their country also has quite the scale.」



The two made their conjecture based from the figures of the crews who were wearing unified uniform even if in different color schemes, the conversation the two overheard, and in addition how the weapon the crews were armed with were obviously guns also with uniform made.



Even while conversing like that, the two were enjoying their game of spy make-believe to their heart's content, slipped through several doors, passed through several spacious rooms, descended several stairs, and then they came out into a particularly large corridor at the lowest floor where they suddenly smelled an unpleasant smell.



Hajime and Tio looked at each other's face with a grimace at the familiar offensive smell and they followed the smell as though in invitation.



They could hear talking voices from the other side of the corridor's corner. Both of them peeked out from the corner.



「Oi, did you heard? Those guys from Glowser squad, they were annihilated except Higgs.」



「Is that, true? Just what in the world happened huh. Was it those Avenst bunches?」



「Might be. But, among the Glowser squad that came out for supply, it's only the messed up Higgs who came back in terror. That one seems true. Is it that scary just by getting attacked by those bunches?」



「That's……perhaps, they used new weapon?」



「You think those bunches has that kind of power huh. They are just air pirate that keep spewing out delusional words like tradition or pride or whatever you know?」



「Then, why do you think Higgs got that scared against the like of those bunches?」



「Ain't no way I know that even if you ask me.」



The two men were leaning on the corridor's wall while speaking out several concerning information. The source of the smell certainly came from those two. It was obvious from a glance. The reason was because their work clothes that looked like overall was drenched in blood.



There was a large door in front of them. They must be doing work that drenched them in blood there. The two didn't really want to imagine what was being done inside there. Most likely the men were in the middle of break right now.



「Well, anyway, it's fact that we lost four sky battlecrafts. After all we are ordered to extract spare fuel for aircraft like this.」



「You're, right.」



The two workers sighed at their comrades' misfortune. It wasn't clear how strong their feeling of fellowship against their comrades from their conversation. However, it seemed certain that the work which drenched them with blood was necessary to replenish the sky battlecrafts that Hajime shot down.



The two workers took a puff of something that seemed to be cigar before returning inside the room feeling that it was bothersome. When they entered, an intense smell――blood smell was overflowing from behind the opened door.



「Goshujin-sama.」



「Yeah, let's go.」



The two's personality weren't so cute that they would falter just from smell of blood after this far. In order to ascertain the true identity of the "fuel" that was the source to make the sky battlecraft, and perhaps also this mother ship and the floating island to float, Hajime and Tio approached the room.



The door was a sliding type, most likely it would automatically close after a certain time. Hajime and Tio slipped inside the room before the sliding door closed.



And then, they witnessed it. The cause of why those pilots were trying to capture the dragons alive. And also the true form of the "fuel".



Inside the room was spacious. It had the height of two floors with length and width that could reach a hundred meter. Three sides of the walls were made from cages without any gap in between, there was some kind of work stand at the middle of the room. Several things that looked like crane and arm were protruding from the ceiling and floor.



The cages were filled with dragon and nothing else. The dragons' size, color, and shape were varied, but they were living things that were obviously dragon from a glance. There were also grey dragons like the dragons they were playing with at the previous island. Even the biggest of the dragons here didn't surpass three meter, most were only small dragon with size around one or two meter. There were also dragons with size around thirty centimeters among them.



The center of the room was truly in a state of sea of blood. There was a large work stand and a dragon was lying down there and fixed in place by several arms. The dragon already didn't have light in its eyes, blood was still flowing from its ripped open chest onto the floor.



There were around ten workers including the previous two. One of them was carefully washing a small silver stone that taken out just now from the dragon.



And then, the stone was entered into a machine nearby, and after the worker confirmed something that was displayed by the machine, he handed over the stone to other worker. The worker who received the small silver stone inserted it into another machine and he controlled the machine while confirming something several times.



Like that, the small stone that had uneven shape before this was processed into a clean square chip.



The silver stone that was processed into a square chip was then handed again to another worker. That worker inserted the chip to the bottom of cylinder machine that looked like a thermos connected to a cord. And then, after he pressed several buttons, the meter display at the side of the cylinder machine was starting to shine silver sequentially from below.



After witnessing until that far, Hajime muttered with a small sound and expressionless face.



「……I see. So the dragon of this world also has something like a magic stone.」



「And by processing that, they couldst obtained this "fuel".」



Tio who nodded beside Hajime was similarly expressionless like Hajime in contrast with her comprehending words. Her voice had no intonation at all.



「Surely the floating island also has similar ore like that. ……Geez, it will be fantasy world banzai if this end just with that. This really left a bad taste.」



「But, just because of that, we couldst not stop them or resent them. For them who are living in the sky because of the polluted land, dragon hunting art truly a matter of life and death. Perhaps obstructing them from doing that art the same like saying 'die' to them after all.」



「Yeah.」



To say further, because Tio was a person of dragon race, she had just a little emotional attachment toward dragon species, even so, if it was said that these dragons were monster unrelated to her then that's that. Even in Tortus, she wouldn't hesitate to exterminate a monster of dragon species.



But, as expected, the likable dragons she first met in this another world flashed at the corner of her mind. Therefore, there was no way she could think nothing about this work of making dragon as battery replacement.



It was just as Hajime said, even though they could understand what they were doing, but it left a "bad taste" inside.



「Let's go Tio. It's enough already.」



「Right.」



They had seen and known something disgusting――Hajime and Tio left the room with such feeling. The weak cry of the dragons that sometimes reached their ear sounded like a cry for help to the two of them. Even though they knew that it was just their imagination, they couldn't help but sigh deeply.



Like that, Hajime and Tio were about to step out of the room, it was at that time,



*gouuun-*



A sound that resounded to the bottom of their stomach, and along with that G force assaulted their body as though the ship was accelerating all at once.



The sudden change was nothing for Hajime and Tio, but several of the workers were stumbling or fell on their butt.



『Announcement from the control room. Sighting of Avenst is confirmed. This ship will enter battle action from here on. All crew, go to your post right away. Repeat, this ship will enter battle action from here on. All crew, go to your post right away.』



At the same time with the shrilly alert sound inside the ship, a broadcast to the whole ship resounded. The announcement from the control room commanded the sortie of the sky battlecraft squad, in addition, an order that commanded the workers in this room to hurry with the resupply was given.



The situation inside the ship suddenly turned hurried. The workers put around ten of the cylindrical machine like just now into a case and put the case on a trolley before going out of the room with fast steps.



Following them, Hajime exited from the room while opening his mouth with a pensive look.



「Avenst, is that the air pirate those guys talked about just now?」



「Perhaps so. It's unknown whether this is a coincidence or inevitability, but it appeared this wouldst be a battle.」



The two didn't know the battle strength of the other party, but it was unthinkable for a regular army that belonged to a country could be done in by a "pirate" group at best.



However, even so, an army in possession of unknown battle strength would battle an enemy with similarly unknown strength. They would like to be spared from harmoniously staying inside this ship in the unlikely chance that this mother ship got shot down.



「Let's get out quickly. We grasped the cause of the floating phenomenon already, and I smell a bit of danger from the energy that might result from the destruction of the power reactor that grant the absurd propulsive force to this mother ship. Let's take some distance and watch the situation.」



「Right. That art the wise choice.」



Hajime was thoroughly ignoring the flurried activity inside the ship while taking shortcut to get outside by irresponsibly opening stair shaped hole on the floor using transmutation, before he opened his mouth as though he recalled something.



「Come to think of it, that survivor……if I remember correct, his name is "Sniff" is it?」



「Indeed, I think that person kept sobbing without end since he encountered us, but his name art not Sniff, but "Higgs". Goshujin-sama, you only get the "i" correctly.」



「Well, it doesn't matter if he is Hics or Huggs. Sorry, looks like we don't get the time to beat him up.」



「Such thing……I'm not really concerned of that. Just knowing that Goshujin-sama got angry for mine sake already made me need replacement panty.」



「No need to worry. I thought that might be the case, so I stocked panties for your use inside the Treasure Warehouse.」



「What, the? Thi, this art the first time I heard that.」



「Yue made me brought them. Some time ago there was a chance when I went out with just you right? At that time, she said something like『Did you bring your handkerchief? Your wallet? Tio's panty? Geez, it's no good to be forgetful. Nn-』.」



「What legal wife power……」



The two of them were doing that kind of stupid conversation as though to wash off the unpleasant feeling from just now while Hajime used the hole that he arbitrarily opened out in the hull to jump out from the mother ship that was cruising in high speed to outside where the winds were buzzing thunderously. Tio also jumped out after Hajime.



Hajime wasted no time riding his skyboard while Tio also revealed her dragon wings. They were taking distance from the mother ship while starting to fly in parallel with it.



Hajime laid out a camouflage barrier that wholly covered both him and Tio, then he turned his gaze to what the mother ship was pursuing.



The flying ship of the air pirate called Avenst had similar shape with the mother ship, but its size was only a third of the mother ship. Different from the mother ship, its rear hull wasn't emitting silver particle, but white light that even looked colorless.



The speed difference between two sides was evident, the sky battlecrafts that flew out from the mother ship quickly caught up and began their offensive.



The airship of the air pirate endured the attack with skilful maneuver while intercepting using the weapon on board so that the sky battlecrafts couldn't get near. In addition, sky battlecrafts were also launched from the airship of the air pirate, and they were also displaying splendid dogfight technique while protecting their ship from the assaulting enemy.



「It seems the air pirate is inferior in equipment and number, but their skill is better.」



「The speed difference art obvious, and their turning ability and weapons art also inferior in a glance, yet they art splendidly enduring. But……」



「Yeah, the difference in strength is hopeless.」



Yes, no matter how skilled the air pirates were, their battle strength was overwhelmingly insufficient. Even from a quick count, the difference in number of sky battlecraft was three times, the power of their Vulcan and their missile weapon's maneuverability were so weak that the spectator would want to avert their eyes from looking.



Most likely, the air pirate's side would get shot down if they got hit by a single missile or several bullets from the Vulcan. In contrast, the sky battlecraft of the army side, putting aside the missile, it seemed like their battle capability wouldn't be affected even if they got hit dozens of times just by the Vulcan of the air pirate's sky battlecraft.



The air pirate was facing against an enemy with several times their number, they couldn't hope to shoot down the enemy without landing hits several times as many and they also couldn't shake off the enemy using speed. The preeminent skill of the pilots was displaying a miraculous defense that would make any spectator to spontaneously sigh in admiration, but it was obvious that too was only a matter of time.



「No matter how you look at it, it's not that the air pirate came attacking, but they unfortunately got discovered by the army……something like that.」



「O, Goshujin-sama. It looks like the mother ship of the air pirate art changing course. Hou, it seems they art planning to plunge into those clouds that looks like a mountain range see?」



They could see a giant waterfall of cloud at the left side. The river of cloud was flowing down like vapor of dry ice falling to the ground from the towering mountain range of cloud that looked like it was continuing until the end of the world. It was merely a place with height difference among the sea of clouds, but seen from the side it indeed looked like a mountain range of cloud.



Inside the sea of clouds was a place where black rain that caused necrosis on the cells and fierce lightning were raging. As expected, was the airship and sky battlecrafts of the air pirate that seemed to have low spec able to endure that environment……



No matter how they thought about it, this was obviously a sin-or-swim gamble. But, either way it was only a matter of time until the air pirate got shot down at this rate. There was no doubt that for the air pirate too they had no other choice then to make this gamble.



The airship of the air pirate was starting to swivel left as though drawing a large arc. It was already partly damaged from getting shot several times by the army's air battlecrafts. Even so, it was evading the powerful cannon and missile from the mother ship, so it was still an amazing skill that they were displaying.



Although, if it was asked whether they could escape like that,



「……It will be harsh.」



「Yes.」



The mother ship was approaching until nearby already. The nearer it got, the more accurate their bombing became. No matter how divine the skill of the pilot was, there would be nothing they could do if the distance was closed further than this.



It was really unthinkable that the air irate would be able to reach until the cloud mountain range.



Hajime and Tio were watching that sight. Of course, the two wouldn't head out to give reinforcement. These people were the "pirate" of this world. The outlaw that ignored the rule which protected many. This wasn't a good problem to be mucked up irresponsibly by people of another world who came just to fulfill their curiosity of wanting a bit of adventure.



No matter how problematic the moral of the army's pilots, no matter how the "fuel" production left them with bad taste, it was completely unthinkable for them to be the air pirate's ally because of that.



As expected, the environment and the way of living of the people in this world were a bit too severe for the two of them to purely have fun here――Hajime and Tio smiled bitterly. They didn't have the disgusting hobby of purposely enjoying the death of many people, so they averted their gaze thinking to withdraw from this airspace.



But, the destiny or something following Hajime and co around wasn't that good of a guy that would let them get away that simply. All the events that happened at other world Tortus, tumbling into another world like this when they came out just for a little stroll, then how that world had ended already, furthermore having the scene of a battle between two factions unfolding in front of their eyes like this……



――Piiiiiiiiiih



「Aa?」



「Mu?」



In the battlefield that was decorated with explosion roars, howling wind, and orange flame blasts, suddenly a high-pitched sound reverberated. It sounded like blown whistle, however, there was compelling desperation filled into that――crying voice.



Hajime and Tio who reflexively returned their gaze to the battlefield caught a presence of something small rapidly approaching them.



A shining silver small creature was flying, weaving its way through the orange gap of the explosions and the light of the setting sun that illuminated from the interval of the sea of clouds and sky. It was a small but magnificent dragon.



「Piih. Piiiiiiih」



The silver small dragon was desperately flapping its wings while raising a cry that sounded like it would tear up its throat.



'A lost dragon?' Hajime and Tio thought doubtfully, but they immediately noticed. That small existence was staring straight at the two of them, no, more accurately it was staring straight at Tio.



Hajime looked at the pencil Cross Velts floating around them. They were functioning normally. The camouflage barrier was going strong. Their form, smell, and heat shouldn't be possible to be detected. But, the small dragon heading at their direction was going straight at Tio no matter how he looked.



Hajime suddenly brought his face closer to Tio and his nose sniffed repeatedly.



「Wha, what is it, Goshujin-sama? As expected it's embarrassing to have mine body suddenly sniffed at.」



「No, I'm wondering if you have a unique smell that even my artifact cannot hide.」



「……Right now, it shouldst not be wrong of me for thinking of wanting to hit Goshujin-sama.」



Tio who was unusually angry was pushing on Hajime's face with her hand to make distance while her cheeks were blushing slightly.



Even while they were doing that, the small dragon arrived at their position, 「Pii! Piih!」it was crying out while circling around the two. It appeared that it was really detecting their presence without any doubt whatsoever.



「Oi oi, what's with it? It's looking really desperate somehow.」



「……Don't tell me, is it looking for help?」



Tio stared at the tiny dragon with an expression that was lost for words. She was wondering why a dragon that should be fearful against human was trying to get involved with human conflict. Hajime was also cocking his head in puzzlement.



But, the strange matter was continuing further.



Of all thing, the pirate that should be heading desperately to the cloud mountain range was swiveling greatly while bending their path. The direction the ship's nose was pointing was at――the direction of Hajime and Tio.



「What's going on? Don't tell me the camouflage barrier is really broken?」



「No Goshujin-sama. I'm only guessing, but this child might be the cause?」



「They are turning midair to chase after a small dragon when they are in the brink of getting shot down anytime? I seriously don't understand what's the meaning of that.」



Perhaps the army also noticed the small dragon's existence seeing how the air pirate changed course, surprisingly several sky battlecrafts broke away from the front line and approached here. Even though they should be pressuring the greatly skilled air pirate's sky battlecraft, yet they still approached the small dragon even if they left behind a hole in their side's battle force.



At the same time, the sky battlecrafts of the air pirate also ignored the defense of their own mother ship and flew out toward the small dragon.



「……Just who in world art thou?」



Tio unconsciously asked at the small dragon that was desperately pleading something. The air pirate that pursued the small dragon even if they had to throw away their life. The pursuing army that left behind the air pirate even though it was just a bit more before they could finish them off.



It was already obvious that this small silver dragon wasn't just a mere stray dragon.



「Chih. I don't know what's going on, but at this rate we will get dragged in. Tio, we are finished being a spectator. We are withdrawing from this airspace right away.」



「Mu, acknowledged.」



The two were curious with the small dragon's existence, but it was out of the question for them to get saddled with an existence that was unanimously pursued by the army and air pirate. Hajime and Tio nodded at each other and tried to leave that place.



That moment, as though guessing the intention of the two, the small dragon blocked their route. And then, it began to emit silver right immediately after.



Tio and Hajime unconsciously stopped moving seeing the dazzlingly shining small dragon that looked solemn somehow. Inside their head, a pleading resounded. It sounded vaguely childish, yet filled with a greatly earnest feeling.



『Help-, help! King, please! Everyone, my friends, help them-』



They didn't hear any clear words. But, that feeling was certainly conveyed to them.



Hajime and Tio couldn't hide their bewilderment. They looked at each other while standing still.



Instantly, a sound wave impact assaulted the area.



「Piih!?」



「Uoh」



「Nuwah. This art from that time!」



It was the sound wave attack like what the sky battlecraft emitted at the floating island. Furthermore this one had more power than that time. It even generated physical shockwave that mercilessly attacked Hajime and others.



Naturally, Hajime and Tio weren't damaged, but the small dragon wasn't unharmed. The small dragon that was emitting a mysterious silver light got blown away by the impact and furthermore it was falling limply as though its consciousness was cut off.



「Ah, hey, get a hold of thyself!」



Tio spontaneously leaped out and held the small dragon with both hands.



「Tio! Don't daydream!」



「Nu?」



The sky battlecraft of the army passed through instantly. When Hajime gave her warning, it was after the second planes following behind it had launched the missile that deployed net like the time at the floating island.



The special net burst in front of her eyes and it spread widely to envelop its target.



Hajime cut in between just before it could envelop Tio and the fainted little dragon.



「HAAH!!」



A yell of fighting spirit. The magic power that was gushed out directionally was converted into physical impact due to the skill "Magic Shockwave". The crimson wave that possessed immense power blown away the cage net far away without any trouble.



After the second plane passed through, the third plane that was further approaching was decelerating while deploying something that looked like a hook from its lower part. Most likely it would use that hook to catch the cage net and carried it until the mother ship.



The pilot of the approaching third plane opened wide his eyes in shock.



After all, just when they were about to capture the small dragon by a beautiful coordination, suddenly a winged beautiful woman appeared midair and caught the small dragon in her embrace, furthermore the cage net was blown away by a crimson wave and in the end a man riding a flying board also appeared after that, that was why it was impossible for him to not get shocked.



Yes, Tio got out of the camouflage range when she leaped out, and Hajime also exposed himself because he fired the magic shockwave.



The tough-looking hook flying out from the rapidly approaching third plane's lower part was about to hit Hajime and Tio and the small dragon behind him.



The fingers of Hajime's right hand bended like claws. He instantly swung his right hand toward the hook that almost hit him.



By doing that, what was left behind was the figure of Hajime that was reduced into a pile of meat and got sent flying――was naturally not what happened. There was only the sight of the torn apart wreckages disappearing into the sea of clouds.



The sky battlecraft that pursued after the army's sky battlecrafts swiveled greatly to avoid Hajime and Tio.



When Hajime sent a glance, as expected, the air pirate pilot was also showing a shocked expression as though his eyeballs were going to fly out. He looked really like「WHAT THE HELLLLLLLLLLLLL-」



「Tio, how is the dragon?」



「Hmm, looks like it's just losing consciousness without any serious wound. ……Forgive me, Goshujin-sama. Because I unconsciously jumped out, we art dragged into something troublesome.」



Tio showed an apologetic face while approaching Hajime's side. Hajime shrugged while smiling wryly to that.



「If your body moved by itself, then that must be the action that Tio want to do from your heart. Then I don't really mind that. First of all, it's too late already saying we are dragged into troublesome matter by this time. This kind of thing can also happen from putting on air as onlooker.」



「Ye, yes. I see. Thank you Goshujin-sama.」



Tio's lips loosened up greatly hearing Hajime's indifferent speech. And then, for some reason Tio seemed to be nestling even closer than before to Hajime.



Ahead of Hajime's gaze, the scene of the air pirate's airship approaching and the army's mother ship circling around the two of them was unfolding. The sky battlecrafts were circling around Hajime and Tio in circles with wariness and bewilderment.



Seeing that kind of sight, Hajime's wry smile deepened and he muttered.



「Now then, first how about we try starting with a peaceful "talk".」



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Just a little notice, the comic version that is in the middle of serialization in Overlap-sama's homepage was update.



Damn, seriously damn. The impact at the fight against the claw bear among other things is just damn.



It really has impact and I can enjoy Hajime in his early day at abyss with another fresh feeling.



If you are interested, please take a look by all means!



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 233




『Ee, everyone. This is sudden, but we are not anyone suspicious by any means. In this situation, we should strive to reach a mutual understanding peacefully, by means of communication like a cultured human shouldn't wee-』



The voice of Hajime that was amply filled with sincerity was resounding through the whole airspace. He was appealing by using telepathy, so his voice should undoubtedly reach both the army and the air pirate.



While the air pirate's airship and the army's mother ship that was located diagonally right behind it were approaching, Hajime was hovering midair while showing a friendly smile. The first impression was truly the most important thing in forming personal relationship.



Tio who was nestling close beside him was nursing the small dragon in her arms while acting the straight-man「No matter how they look, thou only look like someone suspicious though」, but it didn't even give a single scratch at Hajime's ignoring skill.



Hajime lifted up both his hands to appeal that he had no hostility while he continued his words like a cultured modern-day person.



『We don't have any hostile intention. No, honestly! I'm not lying at all! It will be a cold day in hell before I lie. A person like me is saying that, that's why there can be no doubt about it. We don't have any hostile intention!』



「It sounds extremely fishy……」



Tio-san beside Hajime was saying something. But his ignoring skill level had reached the max value so there was no problem.



『Everyone, it appears that all of you are pursuing after this rug rat dragon, but the two of us don't need it! Rather, we are even thinking seriously whether we should just toss this thing away over there.』



'We don't have any intention of snatching your prey okaaay!' Hajime appealed so, but for some reason hostility was overflowing form the pilots of both factions circling at the surrounding. Especially all the pilot-san of the air pirate, their rage was fierce. They were laying out their protest by punching *bang bang* at their cockpit's windbreaker.



『……It was a joke. Just now was a joke filled with wits. That was my consideration to everyone trying to calm down this place. Anyway, we don't have any intention of snatching this thing, so we will hand over this rug rat. Owner-san, please come out to the fro~~nt』



For some reason, when Hajime said "rug rat" or "owner", the killing intent of the air pirate pilots doubled. Somehow he got the feeling that the more he talked the more their hostility got fanned up.



Even while Hajime was making speech like that, the airship of the air pirate had approached until nearby.



There, perhaps their mental petrification against the really strange duo was finally dispelled, the air battle force of the army side was starting to move.



It seemed that it was the fact that they tried to capture the small dragon alive, so instead of attacking Hajime and Tio, they resumed their attack toward the airship.



Perhaps it should be called as an abnormal obsession, because the airship was recklessly charging forward without even taking evasive action. It was getting bombed directly and got damaged all over.



The pilots of the air pirate side returned fire. However, because their number was reduced by the army's overwhelming attack, and how the airship wasn't taking sufficient evasive action, and then, because there were Hajime and Tio――or more accurately the small dragon nearby, their movement got restrained and they were unable to deploy in a defensive battle like before.



『Ee, everyone, let's calm down for now. I will hand over this rug ra――this young dragon, so both sides, please stop your ship. Let's talk it with each other about the handing over――』



「Please match your speed with usss-. And then, give Kuwaibel to me! Please-」



An amplified voice of a woman――no, a girl reached Hajime, cutting off his speech.



When Hajime turned his gaze there, he could see on the front deck of the airship that was charging to here, a girl carrying something that looked like a megaphone was leaning his body forward on the handrail that she looked like she could fall off anytime. Behind the girl was a tall blonde haired young woman and a young man with the same blonde hair standing by, they were desperately holding the girl who looked like she could fall off anytime.



The girl's silver semi-long hair was wild from the strong wind. But, the girl's expression was even wilder than that. Looking closer she was a beauty. However, her eyes that were greatly slanting upward and her desperate looked that even resembled an ogre were honestly at a creepy level.



But, her figure that was reaching out her hand earnestly and sincerely even when she knew that she wouldn't reach conveyed the seriousness of the girl.



The ship wasn't decelerating. It would get shot down if it stopped. It was something definite. That was why the girl yelled for Hajime to match his speed pleadingly.



The airship was passing through so close it almost grazed Hajime and Tio. The girl was still reaching out her hand with a despairing and grieving expression.



Hajime and Tio looked at each other's face.



「Aa~. It looks like they also know the name of this rug rat, and based on the situation, perhaps what this thing meant by friend refer to the air pirate――let's toss this thing to that girl and get away from here.」



「This hath really become troublesome in various aspects, I understand.」



They nodded once. Hajime and Tio started sliding backward with a sudden speed.



The movement that wholly ignored things like propulsive force or dynamics caused several pilots who were looking for chance to open their eyes wide in shock.



Hajime and Tio instantly approached the airship's deck.



The girl's expression greatly brightened up. The blonde hair duo behind her looked wary.



Perhaps thinking that the small dragon was going to be handed over, the mother ship behind the airship launched innumerable number of missiles. It seemed that it took into consideration that the small dragon was nearby, so its main cannon the majestic 3-gun turrets stayed silent, but in front of nearly fifty missiles, it was hard to say that it was "fortunate".



The Vulcan cannon loaded aboard the airship spouted fire, shooting down the missile swarm, but in the first place it couldn't take evasive action. The sky battlecraft pilots also joined in the interception, but naturally by doing that the respond toward the army's sky battlecraft thinned down.



One plane slipped through the defensive line of the air pirate and launched its missile.



Most likely its aim was the bridge. Human silhouettes could be seen across the windbreaker of a place that was jutting out in the central position of the airship.



The girl and the blonde haired duo opened their eyes wide. They were staring dumbfounded at their last moment――



Ahead of their gaze, one smoking sky battlecraft barged in. It slipped between the bridge and the flying missile without any hesitation.



It was a shield with one's life on the line. For a "pirate", that skill, that spirit, that everything was noble.



Flame blast illuminated the bridge, the girl and others on the deck, and Hajime and Tio who were flying parallel to the airship.



The plane's rear part was pulverized and the front nose was torn to pieces. It was merely luck that the cockpit wasn't blasted off.



But, there wasn't any concept of bail out or anything for the pilot of this world. The reason was because there was nothing but the sea of clouds below when they ejected out, inside that was a hell that rejected human's survival.



「Bovid-!!」



The girl's pained voice resounded at the interstice of the wind's howl. Even though she wasn't using megaphone, but her voice resounded excessively clearly was surely because the pilot was an important people for her.



「……Good grief. Well, I'm a Japanese after all?」



For some reason Hajime was making a strange excuse while taking out something from "Treasure Warehouse II" that he threw away. That thing which was flying in a high speed that was unthinkable to be reached just from a snap of the wrist slid right under the cockpit part that was about to vanish into the sea of clouds.



And then, that thing that spread out with *kashun-* sound――variable type chakram "Orestes" swallowed the cockpit along with the pilot through its center.



The girls and co leaked out「Eh?」, at the same time another Orestes that was also thrown on the deck unfolded and the cockpit fell from there. The deck got dented along with a loud impact sound. The pilot who returned safely (?) looked dazed from being unable to comprehend what happened.



Hajime caught the returning Orestes while calling at the girl and co who were dumbfounded at the unbelievable sight.



「O~i, you over there! You are this guy's owner――not that, you're his friend? You are aren't you?」



「Eh? A, e, u, tha, that's righttt!」



Hajime asked while poking at the small dragon Tio was carrying. The girl was in a state of 'presently in chaos!', however she somehow returned word of affirmative.



Hajime nodded「Yosh」.



「Then, I'll return him, so catch him properly okaaay!」



「Eh? Catch? Eh?」



Hajime directed a really nice smile at the girl was all flustered and all shook up. He ignored Tio who was speaking hesitantly「No, Goshujin-sama. Although the situation is as it is, that art a bit……」, and he strongly grasped the small dragon in an eagle grip.



And then, he tossed it away「Hoi-」with a really casual feeling.



「WAITTTTTTTTTT-, WHAT ARE YOU DOINGGGGG-」



The girl screamed, however she did that while running on the deck with surprising swiftness and performed a dive catch at the falling small dragon. At that occasion, she also seemed to perform a face sliding, but she seemed to be unexpectedly tough because right after she lifted the small dragon to show at the panicked blonde hair duo.



That figure looked like an outfielder baseball player showing up his fine play, or it closely resembled a person of a certain unpopulated island going「I CAUGHT ITT―――!!」. The blonde hair duo was rushing to the girl while applausing. (TN: Click if you want to see the pose. I don't really know what this refer too. Perhaps some kind of TV show in Japan?)



Seeing their figure like that, Hajime showed a really satisfied smile that seemed to say「Today too I'm accumulating up good deed yeah」before he used telepathy once more.



『Everyone, with this we are not involved anymore. From the start we are just a passing by people of virtue, and so, we will quickly vanish so that we won't be a bother to everyone. Well then-』



Hajime prompted Tio and he rotated his skyboard. The skyboard turned 90 degree left from the course of the air pirate. That was a course that distanced away from the cloud mountain range. Hajime predicted that the air pirate who had recovered the small dragon would head toward the cloud mountain range in order to escape the army, so he chose a course that was the exact opposite from that route.



But, destiny-san wouldn't let such a shallow demon king-san to get away! It was impossible to escape from destiny-san!



「Piih!? Pii~~? Pipiih!? Pii――――!!」



「Ah――, Ku-chan! DON'T GOOO-. COME BACK HEREEEEE-」



Such cry and scream could be heard from behind.



When Hajime and Tio looked behind in surprise, the awakened small dragon was chasing after Hajime and Tio once more. Perhaps the girl had jumped out overenthusiastically, because she was diving outside the handrail, but the blond hair duo caught her leg in a narrow call.



The screams (?) of the blonde hair duo「Pr, princessss-. Do you want to dieee-」or 「Aa, this is bad-. Roze-sama's clothes is slipping offffff-」who were looking desperate could be heard. The pilot who went through emergency landing on the deck jumped out from the cockpit in panic and joined in the rescue of the girl whose buttocks were getting exposed.



「Wai-, why are you chasing us!? Just as I thought Tio, a strange smell really is coming from you!?」



「That's a cruel remark don't thou know!? Even if it's me, I couldst still feel hurt here!?」



Hajime and Tio accelerated rapidly.



However, surprisingly the small dragon made its body to be clad in silver color and chased them steadily. In contrast with the tininess of its body and its pitiful 'pii pii' cry, it was unexpectedly a speed fighter.



「Uwaa, somehow everyone is following after us……what's with this game of tag?」



「This art chaos.」



In the world of twilight, Hajime and Tio were in the lead with the small dragon, the air pirate's sky battlecrafts, the army's sky battlecrafts, airship, and mother ship were pursuiting in a straight line which created a bizarre sight. Hajime was looking weary while Tio's face was twitching.



Even when they attempted to camouflage themselves using pencil Cross Velts, but as long as the small dragon was chasing after Tio by somehow grasping her position accurately, there was no other way to get away other than shaking it off using speed.



Hajime withdrew Donner from his holster and loaded it with special bullet "Exise Bullet". It was a special bullet that could change place along with the space around it to another space coordinate. By firing the bullet with electromagnetic acceleration and then exchanging place with it at the farthest distance, it enabled the user himself to move in the pseudo realm of electromagnetic acceleration.



「Tio, grab on me. We are teleporting.」



「……Right. That's fine but……why, didn't Goshujin-sama use it when chasing after that Higgs fellow?」



Hajime's gaze wandered around a bit while,「You, it's that you know, that. Yes, interfering at the battle between you and that guy is just inelegant right?」he was making a strangely lame excuse while his finger was about to pull the trigger.



But, just before he could,



「Whoops」



Hajime controlled the skyboard and made a sharp turn. The place where they were just at a moment before was rushed through by innumerable bullets.



Furthermore, the sky battlecraft squad that cut in at the path Hajime was turning to was carrying out a strafing with Vulcan to reduce Hajime and Tio into meat scraps without even a shred of mercy.



Hajime further barrel rolled to avoid that, but



「Oi oi, they are really feverish with murderous impulse huh.」



「Looks like they art losing their temper with this game of tag.」



Ahead of the gaze of the two who were turning around, there was the form of the mother ship that unnoticed had taken a steep climb and aimed its gun turret at its lower part from the far height. It seemed the turret was a type that could be stowed in, that turret that was protruding out from the ship's bottom was opening its large nozzle that had a diameter around two meter.



It was a caliber that was too big to shoot cannon ball, but it seemed what it would shot wasn't cannon or missile.



It had silver light converging in it. The energy was so immense their skin could feel it. No matter how they looked, it was in the preparation stage to fire a beam cannon like space battleship that often came out in SF.



Going with firing the main cannon of a mother ship that was boasting its hugeness just to kill two people, these guys were really bunches with screw loose in their head.



Naturally, Hajime was trying to take evasive action, but the aim of that cannon turret was detailed in contrast of its size. Furthermore, the army's sky battlecrafts were joining in the attack from all direction to seal their movement so they couldn't escape from the firing line.



Indeed, although this was for the sake of breaking the deadlock of the situation, but it was unthinkable that the height of this killing intent was coming from the bunches who were refraining themselves from large scale attack in consideration of the small dragon's existence.



『Oi, we told you already before, we don't have any hostile intention, we also don't want anything with that small dragon! We also don't want to get involved with you guys! We are going to disappear right away, so pull ba――』



Hajime's persuading words resounded to the whole airspace using telepathy. But, before he could finish his sentence――the atmosphere burst.



*GOU-* The silver bombardment was fired from diagonally above and exploded the air. Due to the sky battlecrafts attacking in waves, a wall of bullet was created between the two and the pursuing small dragon, distancing the two sides.



Therefore, that merciless attack dyed the world that was in madder red color as though it was midday, pouring down on Hajime and Tio like iron hammer from the sky.



「Piih! PIIIIIH」



「Ku-chan-, Kuwaibel-! Come back quickly! Just what are you thinking about those two!?」



The girl on the pursuing airship was desperately raising her voice using a megaphone at the small dragon that was forced to evade due to the shockwave that shook the atmosphere. Even the sky battlecrafts of the air pirate that got reduced in number were making a shuddering expression at the bombardment of the mother ship while circling at the small dragon's side.



The game of tag was over. The air pirate was now too far away from the area of cloud mountain range that was their only chance of escaping. Actually, the inside of that mountain range area was relatively calmer compared to the sea of clouds, so it was the optimum place to conceal themselves, but it was impossible for them to return there from now. The only way that remained for them now was only to dive into the sea of clouds even though they would crash nine times out of ten by doing that.



And to do that they had to take back the small dragon into the airship even for a second faster.



But, the small dragon in question was only raising its cry at the silver pillar of light searchingly.



It was as though it was convinced at the survival of those two who had disappeared inside the pillar without even a one in ten thousand chance to stay alive……



「Li, es……impossible……」



Those words were surely representing the feeling of all the people in this battlefield.



The silver bombardment from the warship was vanishing as though it was melting into air.



That attack should annihilate everything without leaving even dust behind. However, while the brightness that was like midday was vanishing and the color of twilight was returning to the world, the future that should be absolute was overturned.



What appeared was a sphere.



That solid metallic sphere which was shining gently from the reflection of the evening sun was further surrounded by jet black and crimson colored crosses around it.



「……It was an unknown attack, so just in case I jointly used eight point barrier and Aidion at the same time, but it seems that attack doesn't have the power to break through the space isolation.」



「Well, this defense couldst even completely block the disintegration bombardment of the god's apostles. As long as it's not even a penetrating attack that ignore defense, it's next to impossible to slip through Goshujin-sama's defensive wall.」



*kashun-kashun-kashun-* With such sound, the metallic sphere――variable style large shield "Aidion" was undoing its omni-directional defense. It was several layers of shield sliding and contracting smaller continuously to its neighbor. Before long the sphere was switching to its normal mode of coffin form. At the same time, the eight point barrier also vanished.



The battlefield was silent. No, more accurately the sound of wind and the planes' thruster sound were reverberating, but the people in this battlefield were so speechless to the degree that it felt like that.



They were rightly amazed and dumbfounded. An individual was pulling through a direct hit that was fired by the main cannon of a mother ship class battleship unharmed. Everyone's reaction was understandable.



In the battlefield that became still as death, Hajime started to monitor the conversations at the bridge of the mother ship using the application of telepathy even while feeling his blood rushing to his head.



While they were all in a straight line chase, because the small dragon was in the line of fire the mother ship couldn't attack satisfactorily and left attacking to its sky battlecrafts, yet why did they suddenly act decisively by attacking like that……



Inside the bridge of the mother ship that Hajime was skillfully monitoring……



『Shit-, even that was defended-. Those guys, as expected they are monster-』



『Impossible……we had confirmed it from the recording of Glowser 4 but……even though it was just sixty percent but that was the main cannon. Just what in the world are those two……』



『Captain-. Quick, quickly prepare the next attack-. The one with the full power! If not, everyone will be slaughtered again!』



『Shut up Higgs! We, the soldier of the divine country is the chosen people that rule the sky, there is no way we will lose against just two pirates!』



『But-, those two aren't human! You see it right-? The male destroyed sky battlecraft personally, and the female transformed into dragon and pursued hot on my tail even when I used maximum speed!』



『Chih. Oi, someone take Higgs away! He is an eyesore!』



It seemed that surviving sky battlecraft had the system of video recording loaded in it. With that, they knew the incomprehensible strength of Hajime and Tio, and using the chance when they were distance from the small dragon, they launched an attack that could be said as excessive. That seemed to be the case.



The person who seemed to be the ship captain gave order with angry voice at his subordinates inside the bridge who were making noise from feeling shaken.



『Launch the air battle squads that are in the middle of standby! Don't let those two get near the air pirate and the monarch dragon! Helmsman, circle to the left side of the target with velocity 3! Replenish the main cannon, maximum power! Fix pod number 1 until 20 to the target. Bullet type Grog! Keep firing without pause! There is no way a shield that can block attack like that can hold out for long! Crush them with quantity!』



It seemed they were seriously planning to shot down Hajime and Tio.



The mother ship was starting to circle to the left side while spouting silver light. The Vulcan barrels and cannon barrels that could bombard using medium size bullet type were directed at Hajime and Tio.



Hajime's eyes narrowed quietly. He broadcasted a voice that was losing its intonation using telepathy.



『You can hear me right? Listen well, I'll say it one more time okay? We don't have the intention of getting involved with the dispute between you guys. We have the awareness that it's us who are trespassing at your territory. We the nuisances will disappear. That's why, don't direct your killing intent to us more than this.』



It was silent for a while. The army side was bewildered with the voice that was resounding in their head, however, the captain spoke his answer from his spot even while half in doubt whether his voice would be transmitted.



『Sleep talk after you go to sleep. There is no way we can just leave alone anyone with that kind of bizarre power and also obsessed so much by that monarch dragon. Originally we will want to catch you two for human experiment to search for the secret of that power, but you two are just too dangerous. That's to say nothing how you two had laid your hands at the pilots of our army who are the people of god. We will kill you two right here right now for sure.』



The main cannon of the mother ship was gathering an immense energy. Innumerable sky battlecrafts flew out from it. Their number were already surpassing fifty plane if combined with the planes that had came out from the battle before this.



The small dragon was trying to approach Hajime and Tio, but the army's sky battlecrafts were obstructing it with wall of sound wave. They also attacked at the air pirate. The air pirate's aircrafts were already less than ten.



「Piih. PIIIIH」



Just what was making it trying that hard? The small dragon was desperately calling at Hajime and Tio. It didn't want to get separated from them, or perhaps, it was asking them to escape together……it also looked like it was saying that kind of things.



Hajime loosened up his expressionless face a bit and pulled the trigger of Donner. Two streaks of light flew out. One went toward the small dragon, and the other one went toward the girl on the airship. Just before it shot them through in a flash, the special bullets "Exise Bullet" stopped still in place, and using its effect, the small dragon was instantly transferred to the girl's location.



「Just stay quiet at your friend's side. Okay?」



「Pii……pih」



「Ku, Kuwaibel, is listening to what he is told?」



Those words that were said with unexpectedly gentle voice in contrast with the dangerous atmosphere the speaker was clad in made the small dragon to look alternately at Hajime and Tio restlessly, but after a slight hesitation it replied back energetically. The girl who embraced the small dragon so that it wouldn't run away for the second time showed a surprised expression at its behavior.



In addition, before they realized several Cross Velts were floating around the airship, forming protection barrier.



The focused silver light was already in critical point. The attack of the army's sky battlecrafts that became unreserved by the small dragon's distance was increasing in fierceness. Several thousand Vulcan bullets, several hundred missiles, and sound waves that were even accompanied with shockwave came in really absurd number that it was presumptuous to even call it overkill, and all those were concentrated toward just two people.



Flame blast enveloped the barrier, the figure of the two disappeared inside as though a small sun was coming into existence there.



They were receiving that much concentrated attack, however, Hajime who continued to defend using only barrier of space isolation turned his gaze at Tio beside him. Tio shrugged and answered back at the wordless question.



「Goshujin-sama who art still trying to persuade them somehow even when having killing intent directed at thee art also not bad but……as expected, acting absurdly unreasonable with no question asked, that art what truly worthy for mine master. Goshujin-sama, holding back this late art unnecessary. Mine will art always together with Goshujin-sama.」



Hajime displayed a fearless grin and embraced Tio. If the figures of a man embracing the waist of a beautiful girl on the skyboard weren't hard to see because of the flame blast from the missiles enveloping them, then surely the expression of the enemies would convulse grandly.



A calm voice resounded at the battlefield that was decorated with explosive sounds and impact sounds.



『……This is your last warning. Get lost, right now.』



Not just the captain of the mother ship, all the people who heard that voice felt a shiver in their spine from terror. But, unfortunately, it seemed they converted that terror into rage using their elitism and pride that were oozing from their every single word.



『Don't falter! Fix them in place! They cannot move-. Their shield too shouldn't be able to hold out for long anymore-. Show our power as the soldier of the divine country! Main cannon, status!?』



『Five percent left until the full charge, four percent, three percent……full charge! We can fire anytime-』



『Fire at the count of five! Air battle squads, pull back!』



The madder red sky that was turning dark was dyed by the silver of midday once more.



It was incomparable with the previous one, it wasn't just the turret below the mother ship, even the 3-gun turrets installed at the front deck also fired bombardment in exactly the same scale. The total of four silver bombardments tore through the sky with might that ripped apart the atmosphere. The diameter of its hit range could reach ten meter. If the after-shock was included then the area of further ten meter was a fatal territory.



Hajime and Tio's figure vanished along with flame blast that bloomed in the sky.



The world rumbled. The sea of clouds directly below was undulating and splitting from the impact. The cloud mountain at faraway had a large hole opened at it side and scattered away wholly.



Inside the light that should be called as aurora, the people from both camps who were fixing their eyes upon that scene by holding their arm over their eyes or through a visor――



They witnessed it right after that.



*GOU-* The jet black spiral that blew upward and pierced the sky.



In defiance of the silver light, that pure black looked as though it was wordlessly asserting that it wouldn't be dyed by any other existence no matter what.



「What's, that……」Someone whispered.



At that moment, the jet black whisper converged tighter. It rushed out from the silver torrent and became a whirling sphere in the sky.



And then, it ruptured. As though the seal was broken. As though, born from a jet black cocoon――a figure appeared.



A single roar. A single flap of wings.



That form was magnificently, majestically, and gallantly conveying without scruple a dignity as the supreme ruler of the sky that didn't fear or hesitate against anything.



The large build that drew a line against the emaciated dragon of this world, and the overflowing dominating aura. Its existence's mightiness that the skin, or perhaps the instinct could feel.



『I'm concluding you guys, as my "enemy". I don't care whether you are from divine country, if you are a chosen race, or whatever, but you can learn it with your own body. That my wife, is the one and only supreme ruler of the sky.』



Those words echoed through the whole airspace.



The people who suddenly regained their senses with 'hah' noticed although at this late hour.



Of the existence on the back of the hovering black dragon with its wings spread and the blazing sun behind it. There, a man was standing imposingly, glaring down at everything.



Anyone couldn't help but to feel awed at that figure mounting the back of dragon that they had never even seen before.



Everyone held their breath and lost their words, in the middle of that,



The girl who was holding the small dragon murmured in astonishment.



A fairy tale that she knew since she was little. Yes, that was the legendary……



「……Dragon knight, sama?」



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 234-235




(TN: Maou=demon king)



The first move of the battle's opening was a roar that shook the atmosphere and a jet black flash that tore apart event the world.



『Bre, break up-. Brea――』



『I won't make it in――』



The army's sky battlecrafts flying about in the twilight sky. The evasion order that pilot yelled vanished in vain due the jet black flash that was mowing down immediately after.



It was like a swing of a large sword that was wielded by a giant in myth. Tio's breath attack that finished charging in less than a few seconds annihilated three squads of five planes squad altogether with just one attack.



They couldn't resist or anything and didn't leave even wreckage behind. They were literally "annihilated". Just like swatting irritating flies, the veteran sky battlecraft pilots vanished like a joke.



If anyone looked further, they would see the sea of clouds split into two. It was the scar from Tio's breath attack. An ocean trench was created in the sea of clouds.



『-, don't falter-. Crush them with quantity!』



A command that was filled with reprimand was given. The sky battlecrafts were commencing hit & run without pause at Tio and Hajime who was riding on her back. Their Vulcan cannons were spouting fire and countless missiles were rapidly approaching the two.



「Tio, let's go. Beat into them just what kind of being the supreme ruler of the sky is.」



『Very well. Then, thoroughly witness mine flying technique that I fostered and evolved in earth. Don't fall off no matter what, Goshujin-sama!』



*gagagaga-* Without even caring one whit at the bullets of Vulcan cannon that hit her body, Tio roared.



It seemed that the dragon scale of black dragon that was the most superior in endurance among the whole dragon people race couldn't even be scratched by the like of Vulcan cannon. After all it was something that only ended getting whittled on the surface even when it got hit by Hajime's railgun, so this could be said to be only natural.



The approaching missiles were drawing near from all directions like a cage, giving no place to escape.



But, Tio's figure vanished before those missiles could arrive and hit.



『――【Fang of Flame】』



Immediately after, it that was whispered along with a solemn voice manifested and accomplished its meaning. Around Tio who was flying with a motion that should even be called as rhythmless, four brilliantly blazing flame clusters appeared.



When all those were launched simultaneously, they accurately swallowed the missiles approaching from the front without leaving any and demolished them. While flower of flame blast was blooming in the sky, Tio who was flying while producing shockwave instantly took a sharp right turn.



She caught the back of a sky battlecraft that was trying to fly past.



The sky battlecraft pilot took a steep turn in panic to shake Tio off, but she followed closely behind as though mocking that wonderfully sharp turn. She launched a breath attack once more and blown up the sky battlecraft.



『Shit-, this bastard-. Eat this-』



Perhaps this one was a squad mate of the one just now. The sky battlecraft circled at Tio's back in order to save his comrade that was followed by Tio, however, unable to save his comrade he got driven by rage while firing his missile.



But, that missile that looked like it would hit based on the timing and position was evaded right after that along with an unbelievable scene.



『Thy movement art monotone.』



『Somer, saultiiing――』



Yes, it was a somersault. Of all thing, the large black dragon before his eyes were somersaulting midair while flying with a speed that was nearly the speed of sound. Naturally Tio was losing speed, but the missile was unable to react to the impossible maneuver and passed through below her in vain.



And then, in a stroke of misfortune the pursuing sky battlecraft was tore apart by the black dragon's claw when they crossed each other, and ended up as a scrap.



Tio used the momentum of the somersault and descended below while recovering her speed. While falling, she rolled her body 180 degree and reversed her movement direction. By doing that, the sky battlecraft formation that was about to pass in front of her right at that timing……



Naturally, breath attack and compressed exploding flame bullets hit the formation as though the attacks were absorbed toward them. Five flame blasts decorated the sea of clouds simultaneously.



『Thi, this is hopeless-. I cannot shake it off-. Someone help――』



Tio rolled her body 180 degree from climbing steeply into the opposite direction. She once more took the back of another plane with the opposite of the previous maneuver and blown up the sky battlecraft that was desperately escaping.



『The aiming won't get fixed-. I cannot get a lock on-』



Even though this pilot had taken her back by sacrificing his comrade, he couldn't lock on Tio who was flickering left and right with terrific speed like an outstanding aircraft.



And then, Tio spread open her wings and raised up her body. She instantly decelerated by receiving the wind pressure to her heart's content. When the pilot noticed his plane already passed over Tio. And as expected he got annihilated with one attack from behind.



『To, too fast-. What the hell is this monster-. Is this really dragon!?』



There was an impact sound as though the air ruptured. Next white wall of air was generated. Tio who was easily rushing into the world of the speed of sound while making a steep climb rolled over midair.



『Use the Synthesizer-. Match my timing!』



Three squads were approaching Tio from below as though they were going toward the summit of a pyramid. Their plane's frame was starting to get enveloped with silver color. From that, this "Synthesizer" was most likely referring to that sound wave attack.



Although, Tio didn't even look concerned seeing that indication of the sound wave attack that could grant fatal action obstruction effect to the dragon species. Instead she began to swoop down.



The sound wave attack was fired. The air was undulating. Tio charged into that raging sound wave without any hesitation. Something like a free fall was lukewarm. She spread her wings while falling and with an elegant movement she rolled. Right away, a jet black typhoon was generated from that movement.



『Insolent. Fall altogether all of thee.』



It was like a divine spear that broke through a great wall. The black dragon moving in the world of speed of sound clad with black typhoon easily blew off the wall of sound wave and merely passed straight through the center of the formation.



A beat.



The sonic boom that arrived late instantly pulverized their plane's fuselage and drowned them into the sea of clouds.



Without stopping Tio opened up a great distance from the approaching missile using pure speed and maneuverability, she then blasted away one more squad with a mowing down breath attack.



And, it was at that time a large scale attack was fired at Tio from the mother ship. It seemed they couldn't get a lock-on because of Tio's overwhelming mobility, but 80% of their ally's sky battlecrafts had fallen anyway. Surely they were thinking that in that case they would just bombard the very airspace itself in a limited area.



It wasn't a high firepower that pierced through a point like the main cannon. What was approaching was a swarm of missiles that might reach a thousand in number. That swarm which was a bit too brutal to be called as a squall prided a size that couldn't be compared with the missiles launched by the sky battlecrafts. It was clear that it had an uncommon power without compare.



In front of the display of power of blowing up an airspace, Tio flapped her wings once and hovered in place.



And then, she bent her body greatly backward while sucking in air. *hyugoo-* She was making that kind of impossible sound while sucking in air, which caused Tio's chest to swell up rapidly.



The missiles that were approaching in a number that even hid the mother ship itself behind them were……



――GURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!!



The wind died. The air ruptured. The sea of clouds was blown away in radial shape, the atmosphere shook.



It was just a roar. And yet, it was a roar of the dragon king that granted terror to anyone who heard it without question. Therefore, the mere roar became a violent shockwave that spread through the whole airspace. The approaching swarm of missiles was pulverized by the wall of shockwave.



It was as though there was an invisible wall there, the missiles swarm exploded one after another in the middle point between Tio and the mother ship.



The sky where the curtain of night was already descending was illuminated dazzlingly by orange flame blasts.



「Oi oi, I don't get any turn at all from the start here?」



『It was Goshujin-sama who ordered me to show the status of the sky's supreme ruler correct? For now, I tried doing it with only using pure dogfight technique, breath attack, and a bit of magic but……was it satisfactory for thee?』



Turning back, Tio was directing a gaze that looked vaguely mischievous toward Hajime who was calmly standing on her back regardless of the heavy action.



Hajime was showing a half-amazed expression while,



「Those were midair battle maneuver things right? Kulbit and Split S, then Immelmann Turn and Cobra Turn? You also did various other maneuvers but, since when did you learn them huh? Well, it was splendid.」



『The fighter aircrafts in earth art wonderful. However, the sky art mine territory. Putting aside pure speed, mine pride wouldst not forgive myself if I lose in dogfight technique. I fished up various materials, played game, went to aerial show and learned. The most important thing art that it seemed that it satisfied Goshujin-sama.』



'gururu♪' Tio-san sounded her throat joyfully.



Because Tio could freely flew in the sky without anything like flying technique just by directly manipulating the wind, it was really bone-breaking for her to make the way of thinking like kinetic energy or potential energy to sink into her mind but……there was no doubt that her flying skill had rapidly risen up from earth's aeromechanics, so she was really happy to be praised by her master when she unveiled the result like this.



With scales that deflected Vulcan cannon, excelling in speed and maneuverability that were even better than missile, possessing unrivaled powerful attack method, pulverizing the opponent just from the sonic boom, and on top of that she even had super first class flying skill that didn't rely on her spec……



If the pilots of earth knew that their skill was stolen by a flying tank, there was no doubt that they would get teary eyed.



The flame blasts were gradually getting cleared by the wind flow.



At the other side, they could see the mother ship was charging its main cannon. The two didn't know how the enemy was planning to make the attack hit, but there was no other way of calling them other than foolish that they still hadn't escaped. The were overestimating their own existences too much.



The chosen people, the people that ruled the sky. The country of god.



Seeing words that dangerous lined up like that, it was clear that their pride was even higher than Everest, even so they couldn't avoid getting evaluated as being a bit too thoughtless. Or else, perhaps they still had some kind of different trump card…….



「Well, just because of that doesn't mean that we will just expressly wait for them though.」



Hajime was looking at even more air battle squad launching from the mother ship while the corner of his mouth rose up in a grin. Tio's body that didn't even twitch against Vulcan now twitched.



「I wonder, how does it feel to have your flank gouged out?」



The moment Hajime whispered that, the mother ship that was going to fire its main cannon anytime――wholly lost a part of its rear bottom.



It wasn't a destruction, it was a loss. Like joined together blocks had a part taken off from it, a part of the ship's bottom at the rear was coming off. While scattering crimson sparks.



The mother ship tilted violently. Furthermore there were a lot of people falling from that loss part. They couldn't hear anything due to the distance, but they understood clearly that those people were screaming with expression of despair.



『Go, Goshujin-sama. Just what hath thee done?』



「You see, while you are fighting, it was boring doing nothing so I fired a single shell at them. Inside it was packed full with spider type living golem.」



――Special shell "Squirm Shell"



The shell that was fired didn't even explode, but the shell that invaded into inside the mother ship was so to speak a cocoon. Inside it had a lot of super small spider type golem packed in, and they would be born inside the body of the enemy.



This time it was against a gigantic battleship so it was still better, but if this was against a large living thing…….



By the way, the shell could be filled with various things other than spider. Your favorite insect-san right to your position☆



『Ho, how terrifying……or rather, thy hath created something nasty there-. I'm getting goosebumps!』



「No, right now you got no skin right? You have dragon scale all over. Well, anyway, I transmuted a whole lot inside the ship through the arachne bunches and forcefully purge only that spot, that's all.」



『Avoiding the topic so smoothly……cough-. Ri, right, that place over there art……fufu, I see. As expected from Goshujin-sama. Normally thou art a heinously cruel savage and sadist bastard without compare, but the kindness thy show in this kind of time art just unbearable. I'm falling in love all over again!』



「Thank you. I don't feel like I'm praised, so after this I'll give you your savage punishment.」



While his forehead was twitching at Tio's words, Hajime used pencil Cross Velts to cover the entire purged part――the place where the dragons were captured and treated as fuel――with barrier.



While the mother ship was recovering its posture somehow, perhaps with the intention to protect the mother ship, about forty sky battlecrafts were charging recklessly toward Hajime and Tio as reinforcement.



Tio flapped her wings once to begin the dogfight once more, but Hajime stopped her.



「Any time now they are going to struggle while holding delusion(hope) like "there is no way we can lose" or "we will surely win if we use this". It will be too unsightly to watch, so we are going to crush them all in one go. Along with their heart.」



『Fumu, certainly. Shouldst I mow them altogether with a breath attack of maximum power?』



「I'll work out a bit too. At this rate, I'll be seen as a strange guy that is only riding on your back.」



Tio chuckled at that really childish line. The sky battlecraft squads were approaching closer even while they were doing that. Even seen from afar, their expression looked damned desperate. But, a hope that they would manage it somehow if they could pull through here also could be seen dwelling somewhere in them.



「I'm telling you that it's merely a delusion. Engrave into your soul, just who is it that you have turned into enemy.」



Right after that, what appeared was a swarm of black crosses decorated with crimson pattern. There were about two hundred of them lining up orderly midair behind Hajime. The scene of the swarm floating while clad in faint crimson light instigated a pure and bizarre terror. Despite the location being in the sky, the sight caused a vision as though they were lost in a graveyard.



Hajime's eyes could see the figure of the pilots whose eyes were opened wide. Without taking his eyes off from them, Hajime's hand elegantly waved like a conductor baton, pointing straight forward. The fingertips of that hand mimicked the shape of gun.



At that moment, the two hundred crosses rotated, the tip of their longer side faced forward.



「This is how to crush the enemy with quantity.」



A beat later. A thunderous roar.



The electromagnetically accelerated Burst Bullets fired from two hundreds Cross Velts were mercilessly launched in a rate of 1500 shot per minute. That was already like a wall of bullet that appeared in the sky. The battle of resource amount that was done by the army side before this was now returned back to them exactly as it was.



If they knew that if Hajime actually got serious, he could summon Cross Velts in the number of more than three times of now and several hundred Grim Reapers, just what would they think then?



The sky battlecrafts that got hit by the first attack fell into the sea of clouds in pieces. Even the planes that fortunately could dodge direct hit got their wings plucked by the Burst Bullets that were spreading lethal shockwave of crimson ripple midair and they fell.



It was just a round of offense and defense. Just from that, the sky battlecraft got their battle strength reduced until thirty percent.



『Something like this, is not battle anymore-. This is just massacre-』



『Just what the hell is that-. Where did he take it out from-』



『Is it still not yet-? The Negrade cannon, it's still cannot fire yet-?』



The pilots were in a state that could be called as pandemonium. But, that kind of composure immediately vanished. Because the bringer of death the two hundred crosses flew out all at once. With sharp angling and irregular movement that ignored aerodynamics, and sometimes while even generating something like afterimages, they were shooting down the sky battlecrafts one after another.



Indeed, it wasn't a battle anymore.



Amidst that situatin, the mother ship that succeeded in controlling its posture finally aimed its main cannon's turret at Hajime and Tio. It was focusing silver light, however, it seemed to be slightly different from its attack before. Inside the silver convergence, a muddy black was mixing like coffee dripping into milk. Looking really closely, the silver part also seemed closer to being white.



In a amoment, the white light mixed with black was fired along with a thunderous roar. Its power instead looked lower than the attack before, but Hajime's instinct that was backed by experience told him that it was something more repulsive.



In front of that unknown that was likely their trump card, Hajime wordlessly made his "Treasure Warehouse II" shined.



The sun had mostly set, while the blackness of night was covering the world, it appeared beside Hajime who was illuminated by the white light.



「I'll stamp it out from the front.」



Like that what was fired was the greatest light. The color of light shining brilliantly as though it was denying the night that it was still too fast for it to arrive, it was truly the color of sun that illuminated this world.



――Sun convergence laser "Burst Hyperion"



The horizontal firing of Burst Hyperion that finished charging. That was the true identity of the light. The sunlight energy that was converged and compressed to the very limit expulsed the world of night in the blink of eye.



The white light of the mother ship's main cannon collided with the thick light of Burst Hyperion right from the front.



The power of the two lights rivaled each other, a fantastic phenomenon of lights blooming wildly that seemed unthinkable to be something of this world was occurring at the point of collusion.



『……How can an individual, rivaled the main cannon of a warship……』



The amazed whisper that leaked out from telepathy surely came from the ship captain. Hajime scoffed at that and replied back daringly.



『Rivaled? How long you are going to hold your delusion? Just this much ain't enough at all.』



Hajime spoke the release keyword.



「――"Second Compression Furnace" release.」



Burst Hyperion was loaded with exclusive "Treasure Warehouse" that converged and compressed sunlight inside, but no one said that there was only one of it inside. It wasn't strange at all even if multiple "Exclusive Treasure Warehouse" ――"Compression Furnace" were loaded inside.



What would happen if that second energy was liberated?



The answer was simple.



Something like a state of rivalry could be broken easily.



The attack of the mother ship's main cannon was swallowed, terminated, and got pushed back gradually.



『-. Attack-. Attack that man! Use bullet that focused in speed! The surviving sky battlecraft squad too, attack that guy from behi――』



He was unable to finish saying that command until the end.



『――"Third Compression Furnace" release.』



This must be how the death sentence of the death god sounded like.



Like being swallowed by a raging stream, the main cannon of the mother ship was swallowed by the extreme thickening of the sunlight laser without being able to show anything that resembled a resistance. The advancing light of Hyperion kept pushing and swallowed a third of the front deck along with the 3-gun turrets, and pushed on until the sky at faraway in the distance.



Perhaps it was an instantaneous judgment, or perhaps a coincidence, it was unknown which was it, but just before the mother ship got hit it suddenly descended that it avoided the fate of being the Titanic of the sky.



However, it didn't change that it was greatly damaged. It wholly lost its front and rear part as though something had taken bites from it. Seeing it tilting, with fires and black smokes, and also small secondary explosions rising from it, it was obviously in a tragic state, even so it was in a condition where it was barely hanging in the sky.



The mother ship was starting to turn around while spouting out silver light even with its altitude that kept descending.



「So they finally felt like run away.」



『I don't know what kind of effect that last attack hath, but that was surely their genuine trump card. And that trump card was defeated crushingly from the front and in addition they art almost shot down. If they don't run away even after that, then that art the realm of lunatic.』



The sky battlecraft pilots who were desperately running away even while getting chased by Cross Velts were also following the mother ship in panic.



The battle was over. The army's gigantic mother ship that boasted great fighting strength was chased away just by two people.



While holding back the emotion that was overflowing from that fact, the air pirate's girl and small dragon were approaching along with their airship.



「Piih. PIIIIH」



「E, excuse me-. Kn, knight-sama-. True dragon-sama-. In this chance, we are saved from danger――」



When they were trying to call out like that,



「――"Fourth Compression Furnace" release.」



「Eh?」



「Pi?」



The extremely thick light blown off the rear of the mother ship that was running away in all broken up state. Along with the girl's words.



In addition,



「The flies are……around ten. Then I guess it's enough with this.」



Saying that, what Hajime taken out was anti-material sniper cannon Schlagen AA. Hajime who captured the desperately escaping sky battlecrafts through his scope pulled the trigger at the interval of his breathing. The shells that drew a beautiful crimson line in the night sky were shooting down the sky battlecrafts that were performing random evasion without even a single miss.



「……hiu」



「……pii」



The side profile of Hajime who was dispassionately performing blood festival using the escaping pilots without looking particularly emotional caused the girl and the small dragon to tremble in their boots while hugging each other. With a plop, the girl fell to sit on the floor. The attendants blonde hair duo were also staring at their falling enemies with pale expression. It was only the surviving pilot who was whistling「hyuu~」in admiration.



『Goshujin-sama. That aircraft carrier art unexpectedly tough. It's still flying. Shouldst we pursue?』



「No, there is no need of that. I'll shoot it down after harassing them a bit.」



Hajime who finished shooting down all the sky battlecrafts put Schalgen on his shoulder while grinning broadly. Voices that said things like「Dragon knight-sama……not?」, or「De, demon……」, or「Ru, run away quicklyy」could be heard, but for Hajime who was making that wicked smile, all those were trivial things.



Seeing such Hajime, Tio said a sentence.



『Fumu. That is to say, they couldst not escape from demon king-sama is it?』



It went without saying that the words demon king caused the girl and others to tremble even more.



On the other hand, around that time in the mother ship……



「Those two!? Are those two chasing after us!?」



「N, no! The targets aren't moving! They are letting us get away!」



「Be careful of what you are saying-. They aren't letting us get away! It's our strategic retreat that succeeded-. The next time you said something like that, I'll consider that as betrayal!」



「M, my deepest apology.」



The atmosphere was completely rough. Everyone was gulping their saliva as though their throat was parched while their face was tensing from the terror of wondering if they would be shot down anytime now.



The captain was also in the same state, he was saying thing like「strategic retreat success」from his mouth, but his face was twitching uncontrollably as though he caught a bad sickness.



「We have to, we have to inform our country quickly. If we challenge them using a fleet, then next time for sure……. Oi, how long until we enter the range where we can contact the country?」



「The range is about 1500. But, our propulsion is lowering, and in our current situation where we cannot resupply, it will perhaps take two days.」



「Chih. Those two, just how did they scoop out the whole supply room……no, in the first place how did they know the location accurately? …………is there, a traitor?」



Excessive paranoia was gnawing at his mind in this extreme situation.



But, at that time, a communication entered the bridge.



『This is the launching and landing station! Higgs is trying to launch in his sky battlecraft! He is armed and caused many casualties among the mechanics who tried to stop him! Someone, please send reinforcement! That guy, he isn't sane!』



The bridge turned into uproar from the sudden notification. The ship captain snatched a mike and pressed the communication button toward the sky battlecraft's landing and launching station.



『What is happening!? What's Higgs's objective!? Why is he trying to launch in sky battlecraft in this situation!?』



『We don't know-. He is talking incoherently……we really don't get it! He is babbling 'that guy is coming, if I don't run away quickly, the "demon king" will come. That guy is here already!'. He won't even listen to our words!』



『How ridiculous. Shit-, we have no time to be concerned with a crazy idiot in this kind of time. I give permission to shoot. If he is not going to listen, then I don't care just kil――』



The captain was going to give instruction even while he was feeling some kind of intense bad premonition. It was at that timing.



He heard it.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm on the deck you know?



「!?」



The captain suddenly sensed a presence and he turned around swiftly. However, he saw nothing there but the door that connected to the corridor, there was no one there. He returned his gaze to the front thinking if he was hallucinating, but right after that, he gulped his saliva unconsciously.



「Ca, captain. Ju, just now……」



A helmsman was looking back with a pale expression. No, not just him. All his subordinates inside the bridge were looking back just like him.



「Wha, what are you looking at! Carry out your own duty! Right now we need to hurry even for――」



It was a hallucination. It was just a coincidence that all his subordinates were looking back. The captain was persuading himself like that while erasing the sensation of a bug crawling on his back by yelling angrily. He was trying, to erase it.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in the central passage you know?



「Wh, who-」



「Ca, captaiiiin-」



He couldn't trick himself anymore. The resounding voice, the presence he felt behind him, they caused the captain to look behind him, but as expected, there wasn't anyone there.When he returned his gaze with a stiff motion, as expected he found the pale figures of his subordinates.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in front of the elevator you know?



「He, he is, approaching here?」



「Captain-. The, the elevator number 1-. It's moving!」



「Who is using it!? The image!?」



「No one is inside it! There is nobody! Just why is it moving-」



The subordinate that was in charge of remote controlling the facilities nearby the bridge was staring at his monitor looking like he was going to cry. His monitor was projecting the image inside the elevator that connected toward this bridge. But, inside the elevator that was indeed moving and climbing up, there was no one there at all.



The elevator stopped and the door opened. The camera in the passage that continued toward this bridge didn't catch the figure of anyone. However, the elevator was moving by itself, then stopped in this floor, the door opened, and then at the timing when it seemed one person had gotten off the elevator, its door closed once more.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in front of the first room you know?



The first room――Defense room number 1. In case the mother ship was boarded by enemy, at the area from the elevator and the stair until the bridge, there were three rooms prepared for the sake of holding back any attack toward the bridge. Those rooms were toughly made with a lot of cover so it would be easier to intercept the intruder.



「Defense room number 1-. An intruder in front of the door-. You are permitted to open fire!」



The captain used the radio to give instruction to the soldier standing by in the defense room number 1.



But, there wasn't any reply coming back.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in front of the second room you know?



A shudder of fear ran on their spine. The captain's gaze question his subordinate who was monitoring the place, but he didn't say anything and only shook his head with unfocused eyes as though he was losing sanity.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in front of the third room you know?



Even the defense room number 2 was easily penetrated. No, it was unclear whether it was fine to call it penetrating or anything. It was as though the door of those rooms didn't even exist, as though there weren't any guards inside those rooms from the start, "something" was smoothly infiltrating without any difficulty.



――I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm in front of the bridge you know?



Silence returned inside the bridge. Before they knew it, the damage reports and communications that asked for instruction toward the bridge that were coming like a storm from every posts in the mother ship had gone silent as though they were holding their breath. The only sound that they could hear, was the faint breathing sound, and the humming of the power reactor working earnestly to keep this gigantic ship floating.



The captain slowly pulled out his handgun from the holster on his waist. Inside the silence where even the sound of rustling clothes felt nerve-wracking, he gritted his teeth that felt like they were going to clatter, and slowly aimed his gun barrel toward the door.



「I, if you want to come then come. The moment you open the door, I'll shoot you to de――」



「I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm right behind you, you know?」



It wasn't a voice that came from far away. It was a raw voice of someone. That voice could be heard right beside his ear, as though it was said from a distance where the speaker was clinging on him.



Something like sanity couldn't be retained anymore.「aaAAAAAAH」In the end, no one knew just whose scream that was. When *pan* that dry sound rang out, the one who collapsed first was the helmsman.



What shot through his chest was the captain's handgun. The captain whose reasoning was blown away and fell into a panicked state shot the moment he turned around. After that, it was like a stone rolling down a slope. Everyone without exception heard the voice whispered right beside their ear. In a panicked state, they fired or hit each other unarmed. The bridge fell into a scene of carnage.



Such situation was also occurring in every section of the mother ship. Everyone had their mind's equilibrium crumbled against the approaching something. Their heart was broken from terror, those who ran and hid survived. But, those people were constantly feeling it. No matter where they were, no matter what they were doing, they still felt the faint presence of someone behind them.



People who didn't turn mad were less than twenty percent of the whole.



「That's the situation there right now.」



『For now, explanation pleeease』



After hearing the current situation of the mother ship that had escaped to far away from Hajime, Tio whose expression was skillfully convulsing even when she was still in black dragon form was asking for explanation with voice tone as cheerful as possible. If she didn't hear the explanation, then it felt like she would see nightmare from hearing just the end result.



「Look, there are the arachne bunches that infiltrated before this remember? Using them, I carried out one of me-style Harassment 108.」



――Demon King-style (Third Person) Harassment 108 "I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm right behind you, you know?"



This was demon king-sama's version of a certain urban legend "Ma○y-san's Phone Call" using super small living golem. While using telepathy to forcefully make the listener experienced of something "gradually approaching", their sense of fear was also amplified using soul magic. Furthermore, while making a show that something was getting closer, but actually from the start the golem that was lurking on the target's collar was using "Presence Manipulation" to produce "a presence of someone that was constantly behind them". And then the finishing touch was naturally the recording of Hajime's natural voice that said "I'm right behind you, you know?".



It was one of the wonderful harassment skills that would beautifully made anyone insane with certainty. If "Peek-a-Demon King!" was a sudden harassment, then this one was a harassment that was showing its effect gradually!



『……The idea art just too terrifying. Or rather, I think that the horror or urban legend of Japan art foul play. Before this Myuu searched the internet out of curiosity and then she didn't come out from her futon for one whole day.』



「About Japan's horror, it's persistent like this, or perhaps I should say it has damp atmosphere……it has a characteristic atmosphere that doesn't exist overseas after all. Well, for now, leaving that aside, let's just use this to 'kaclick'.」



Hajime who smiled wryly while shrugging suddenly took out something that looked like a switch, and then without hesitation he pushed that switch.



『……Just in case, I'll ask but, just now, what did thou do?』



「Hm? That's, it'll be troubling if my arachne got carried away, so I spread them to the important places inside the ship――and blew them up.」



By the way, the arachne-chan(living golem) just now that was the size of a pinky could become a force that was about as much as 10 kg of C4 explosive. And then their number aboard the ship was around two hundred.



Not to mention the power reactor, the arachne also aimed at other places focusing at the bridge and other important facilities. And then they went *BANG* not from the surface but by using transmutation to infiltrate inside the machineries first.



Surely the crews who were beautifully in great chaos from the "I'm, Maou-san. Right now, I'm right behind you, you know?" were unable to deal with this.



The power was lost, the bridge was lost, resupplying was also impossible, and most of the crews were in the middle of madness☆. There was no doubt that the ship was falling right now.



If after this they were still able to return to their country without crashing, then that would be worthy of praise.



Seeing Hajime who was saying「An explosion at the end――that is romance」while making a really refreshed expression, not just Tio, the girl and little dragon who were still trembling, the blonde hair attendant duo, and then the pilot-san whose expression was twitching as expected,



『「「「「You demon-」」」」』



「Piih」



They gave a splendid straight-man retort with their voice as one.



If there were the classmates in this place, surely they would reply like this.



――He is the demon king you know?



Like that.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Actually, I just wanted to write simple dogfight.



If a dragon used air battle maneuver in a dogfight……won't it be super romantic?



By the way, Shirakome isn't that knowledgeable regarding fighter aircraft.



Because all my reference source come from Blue Knight. No, it was really interesting that I got totally engrossed. I especially super like chapter 22.



Now then, a report for a moment.



Looks like the sale for the fifth volume will be at 25 December.



You can also see the cover illustration if you go to Overlap-sama's homepage you know!



Please go take a look if you can.



Please take care of Arifureta from here on too.



AN:



「The data……vanished?」



Just like that person whose spirit pressure really vanish, the data didn't revive.



I'm sorry, right now I'm in the middle of rewriting. I should be able to update tomorrow afternoon!



Although, the chapter this time is something like the exposition turn, so the story is not really interesting.



Anyway, as an apology that the update will be late, I uploaded the artifact catalogue.



This is a catalogue of Hajime's artifact.



Please read it to kill time.



Shirakome himself doesn't grasp the whole thing, so perhaps there is still other.



For the artifact of other members, I'll eventually add them in the list.



(TN: I made up all the German word here because I'm too lazy. Leave a comment if you know the correct word and I'll edit it later.)



Donner & Schlag



Total length 35 cm. Rotating style magazine with 6 shots. Made from composite ore of Tauru ore, Shutaru ore, and Athantium ore.



The origin of the naming was from German language「thunderbolt」or「lightning」, something like that.



Schlagen



Total length around three meter, single shot, electromagnetically accelerated anti-material rifle with zero caliber.



The naming origin was from German language「Scheaschlagen(Pulverizing)」……I think.



Schlagen AA



The successor of Schlagen. Its power and range were greatly improved. It surpassed the framework of sniper rifle and reached the level of sniper cannon.



AA was the abbreviation of「Acht Acht」. I don't know the detail of the spec, but language nuance was wonderful. It seemed that the power was also amazing. Therefore I adopted it.



Metsurai



Gatling railgun. Six rotating gun barrels, 30 mm caliber, it could shot about 12000 shots per minute. The cooling of early day version couldn't follow along and it could only keep shooting for around five minutes.



Metsurai Disaster



A six barreled gatling gun where each barrel was formed from one Metsurai. The power was simply increased six times.



Orkan



Missile & rocket launcher.



Agni Orkan



A winged cross with total length of 3 meter. It could simultaneously fired 300 pencil missiles.



Pile Bunker



Romance



Gatling Pile Bunker



Super Romance



Cross Bit



Flying cross. It could become shield, it could also fire exploding bullet. It could also form a barrier by connecting to each other with wire.



Cross Velt



The successor of Cross Bit. It had black color with red pattern. The culmination of chuuni.



Pencil Cross Velt



Alias "Don't touch, you pervert!"



Hyperion



Sunlight convergence laser. It went *chudon* from the sky.



Burst Hyperion



The successor of *chudon* from the sky.



Mirror Bit



The machines on board the sky *chudon*. It could explode sunlight energy using Treasure Warehouse.



Chakram



Chakram. Its central part turned into gate.



Variable style chakram Orestes



Wire was installed inside the chakram. It could deploy an extra-large gate by splitting into three parts.



Grim Reaper



Mechanized monster. Fully loaded with ordnances inside.



Meteor Impact



A mere rock. The opponent die.



Magic power cannon Grantschen



It's non-lethal so it's fine!



Treasure Warehouse



Anything could enter



Magic power 4-Wheel Drive Brieze



A car that looked like Hummer. Fully loaded with gimmicks like blade, caltrop, hand grenade, sniper rifle, etc.



Magic power 2-Wheel Drive Schutaif



A bike that looked American. Currently it was demonically remodeled into Shia's wheels. It seemed it could also fly in the sky.



Bola



For binding. Recently it was used exclusively for Tio, or for Hajime mommy to dry clothes.



Artificial Arm



Kuh, be calm my left hand-



Olneis



Bird shaped reconnaissance plane. There were also various other shapes.



Large Shield



Coffin shaped. It could let out a stake from below to fix it into the ground. Made from the composite of three kinds of ores.



Variable style large shield Aidion



It could turn into sphere shape that defended from all directions.



Hour Crystal



Slowing down the flow of time of a certain range.



Skyboard



Eu○ka (TN: Refer to Eureka Seven I think)



Ferner



Manta shaped airship. It used gravity control so it could make abnormal maneuver.



Submarine



It could endure even magma.



Hand Grenade *chudon*



Flashbang Grenade *kats*



Burning Grenade *goo*



Paralysis Grenade *abah*



Tear-Gas Grenade *nngih*



Frag Grenades ……



Telepathy Stone Another world version mobile phone



Specific Stone Another world version GPS



Distant Viewing Stone Another world version telescope



Reaction Stone Another world version remote control device



Magic Eye Stone Chuuni



Sealing Stone It dispersed magic power. The block that sealed Yue



Crystal Key



The key that opened even the door that crossed worlds



Compass of Guidance Crossing



It could find anything



Magic crystal series



It could stock up magic power. There were various shapes like ring, earring, bracelet, etc.



Cheatmate



Basic ability increase. It could strengthen the body to endure Limit Break. Cheat is your friend!



Novum Idola



It can make illusion.



Delischanors



Something that bestowed a duplicate soul. It obstructed the soul interference from the opponent. By using it in conjunction with living golem, a pseudo clone could be created.



Lob Regenschirm



Three stages assault lance that rotated in high speed. With the sealing stone, unique unevenness, and high speed rotation, it would dig through and disperse the magic itself.



Special bullet Living Bullet A living bullet. It would listen to a simple order of the user and crushed the target.



Special bullet Burst Bullet A bullet that was accompanied by shockwave.



Special bullet Exise Bullet It could switch the coordinate along with the space between bullet and bullet, or bullet and the user



Special bullet Vision Bullet By using it in conjunction with Novum Idola, it could launch illusion.



☆Addition.



Living Golem Arachne



Spider type golem. It could launch things like sleeping drug, paralysis drug, weakening drug, and so on. Even transmutation is OK. It's relatively all-purpose



Satellite type Bel Agarta



It poured down light of regeneration magic.



Special bullet Squirm Shell



A shell that could be packed with various things and fired. Large creature would unavoidably get teary eyed.



Torpedo



It could dye an oasis red. It could also kill an ancient monster quite a bit.



Tent and Kotatsu



The height of civilization that Hajime created



Camping Kit



Right now it was 3LDK with system kitchen attached by using space expansion



Dryer



It increase the glossiness



Impact Grenade



hidebuh



Mask series



Mask pink is retired uniform. Greatly increased battle ability



Gate Key & Gate Hall



Anywhe○ Door without door (Limited to a place with Gate Hall)



Gran Farensen



It increased gravity by several times over.



Last Zell



Limit Break for everyone



Doryukken



Shia's war hammer. It was changeable to become bombing mode.



Vire Doryukken



Doryukken's successor. It could become 100 Ton Hammeeerr



Black Slavery Whip



Tio's whip. It could mass produce black dragon. There were also times where Hajime used it on Tio.



Demon Sword of Circle Calamity Anima Erunte



Kaori's twin large sword. Drain type demon sword.



Holy Sword of Gospel Bel Rexion



Kaori's twin large sword. Healing type holy sword.



Shutzengel



Installation type. It deployed Kaori's barrier magic in large scale.



Black katana



Shizuku's beloved katana. The first present from Hajime. At night, she give it maintenance while grinning broadly. Lightning Clad - Wind Claw - Gravity Cut, etc.



Will demonstrating katana swarm



Anyway, it's a swarm of black katana that moved by themselves. I'm lacking in chuuni power. Naming under review.



Twin Iron Fan



The user is Suzu. A tiny kid will look slightly elegant with this.



Air Force Boots



You can soar in the sky



Living golem Demon Rangeeerr



Myuu's golem squadron. They had ego before anyone knew it. Myuu christened them "Belfegoor" "Satan" "Asmodeusu" "Lusife~r" "Mamon" "Leviatan" "Baalsebuf"



Recently, the small golems that she received by begging at papa were christened with names like "Agaresu" "Sitrii" or "Marubas" and so on……



Donneer - Schlaag



The small version of Donner & Schlag exclusive for Myuu. It could also perform electromagnetic acceleration using magic power battery



Kotetsuu - Muuramasa



Short swords exclusive for Myuu. Recently it felt like they were starting to have awareness……



This is Weapon Desu



Myuu's exclusive black whip. It could exterminate terrorist's "son"



Don't Touch, You Pervert



Myuu's exclusive pencil Cross Velt



Pikko Piko Hammeer



Myuu's exclusive piko piko hammer. Its tip had rabbit character.



Yue-oneechan's Love



Myuu's exclusive jewel magecra○.



Artifacts enchanted with concept magic are excluded. Because it only used that one time.



'Other than that there is also something like this right?' If you remember something like that then I'll add it if I can bother you to write it at the review.



Pardon me if the artifact explanation is atrocious……





Chapter 236




AN: I made it yeah…….



Well, it's just an exposition chapter, so it's not even a content with considerable appeal though (bitter smile)



Thank you very much for the artifact's supplement.



'Come to think of it, there is also something like that huh.' I got that thought a lot of time.



I'll add on it as occasion calls.



A sound like the creaking of metal resounded, the airship's altitude lowered with a jerk.



「Kyah」



「Piih」



The silver haired girl and little dragon who were hugging each other while trembling raised a scream at Hajime who was showing a really nice smile in a savage manner. The blonde haired female made contact using something like a radio toward the place that seemed to be the bridge and asked what was happening.



『Roze-sama-. The damage to the ship is horrible, we cannot maintain our floating power-』



The magnified voice resounded to the whole ship. The silver haired girl who was called Roze quickly returned to her senses, and then she turned her gaze at the little dragon――Kuwaibel. Kuwaibel turned its gaze at Roze and nodded once.



「Piiii~~~」



It raised a high-pitched cry. Silver light overflowed from its small body which gently enveloped the airship.



『Floating power increasing, 50 percent. Please just a bit more, Kuwaibel-sama.』



「Pii, pipih」



Kuwaibel puffed up his chest with a face that looked a bit triumphant, as though to say「Just leave it to me!」. It seemed that the declining ship was recovering its floating power with the help of that special silver power.



Roze let out a relieved sigh and she tightly hugged again her beloved friend and partner Kuwaibel. She then returned her gaze at Hajime and Tio who were looking at them with very interested gaze.



She stood up, put down Kuwaibel beside her, and then she showed an elegant bow that resembled a courtesy. Her hair was ruffled from the wind, her clothes was also a modest thing that looked like an overall, yet her appearance had a gracefulness that would make people who saw her to get taken aback.



「It's a great honor to be able to meet you for the first time, dragon knight-sama, true dragon-sama. I am Avenst Kingdom's queen Roze Phiris Avenst. As the representative of the dragon kingdom, my greatest thanks for your assistance in this chance. ……Unfortunately we are in this kind of condition, so we cannot even show you our gratitude satisfactorily, but please, you can rest your wings in our ship Rozeria by all means.」



The two comprehended, indeed this girl's attire looked shabby, but now they could understand the reason of the refinement this girl was clad with. It seemed that Hajime's prediction that she wasn't just a mere pirate was correct.



Roze's words caused the gaze of the blonde haired male and female at both her sides to wander around. It was a fact that they were saved, but the two people in front of them were too much of an unknown. As people whose mission was to protect the queen's safety, Tio's existence added with Hajime's deed and great power were making them hesitate if it was okay to simply approach these two.



「Piih. Pipii!」



「Ah, hey-, Ku-chan! That's impolite!」



They couldn't possibly defy these two, but they also couldn't abandon their wariness……the blonde haired duo were unconsciously putting themselves on guard, but Kuwaibel only gave a glance at the duo who were like that before he quickly flew out and began to fly around Hajime and Tio happily.



Roze was yelling「Come back hereee~e!」with an angry face, but Kuwaibel looked really curious about Tio in her dragon's form, so he was flying in front of Tio's nose tip while sending a deeply interested gaze.



「Tio.」



「Acknowledged.」



With Hajime's call, Tio enveloped her body with a cocoon of black magic power light. The cocoon was shrinking whizzingly. Right after that, the magic power scattered like a bursting bubble and from inside Tio appeared in her usual appearance.



「……Holy cow. She really can turn into human. It's just like in legend.」



「Even when I see it with this eyes, I still cannot believe it.」



「Nee-san. Can you punch me a bit? I think I'm hallucinating.」



The pilot who was saved by Hajime――Bovid was putting his hand on his forehead while muttering, while the blonde hair duo were also opening their eyes wide in disbelief.



Hajime and Tio ignored their shock and landed on the deck. When they did that, Tio was floating with the dragon wings she let out, but Hajime was normally stepping on the air and walked down, so everyone including Roze stared with their eyes almost jumping out from the socket.



Under Hajime's feet that were walking normally as though he was going down a stair were crimson ripples spreading with each step. Everyone was staring at that wordlessly. Even after Hajime had stood on the deck, the gaze of everyone was still glued on Hajime's feet.



「Oi, come back to your senses. We also have various things that we want to ask. The time is limited y'know.」



Hajime tapped his foot while saying that. Hearing that, Roze and others returned to their senses with 'hah' and their gaze met Hajime. Though their gaze still kept glancing at Hajime's feet.



「Tha, that's rude of us. E, excuse me dragon knight-sama. For you to come down here, can I take that to mean that you are going to give us the honor by resting your wings on our ship?」



「I'm not a dragon knight, and depending on the situation I'll leave right away but……well, it's true that for the time being I'm thinking of talking with you guys.」



The blonde hair duo frowned at Hajime's wording. They reflexively were about to say something, but then Bovid elbowed them saying「Don't get in her majesty's way」.



「Is that so……I'm glad. Welcome, dragon knight-sama, true dragon-sama. If it won't displease you, can I please ask for your name?」



「That's why I told you I'm not a dragon knight. ……I am Hajime, and this is Tio.」



「Nice to meet thou, queen-sama with circumstance.」



「Yes, it's an honor to meet the two of you, Hajime-sama, Tio-sama.」



Roze smiled widely while adding 'sama' when calling the two of them. While she introduced herself as a queen of a country, it seemed she completely saw Hajime and Tio as above her. Surely the reason of her attitude like this was related with the unfamiliar terms she were using before this.



Anyway, they were able to create a friendly atmosphere unlike with the army faction, so Hajime turned his gaze to another direction. Lured by that, the gaze of Roze and others followed Hajime's and there they caught sight of the thing that Hajime was looking at. It was a giant mass of metal. The part of the mother ship that was forcefully purged.



「Excuse me, that's……」



Roze raised a questioning voice. Hajime manipulated his Cross Velt in exchange for replying to her. The metal mass that was surrounded by barrier was approaching following the Cross Velts' movement.



「Well, it's nothing. This guys are innocent after all, so as expected making them fall together is just too much.」



「E, err……」



Giving only a glance at the bewildered Roze, Hajime used convergence transmutation to dissolve the metal mass in front of his eyes into particle state. The sight of the gigantic mass of metal surrounded by crimson sparks and rustlingly vanished into sand shape made everyone speechless.



Although, the true surprise came after that. The state inside was exposed when the outer wall was vanishing. Inside there was,



「Wha-. Dragons are, that many inside there……」



「Chih, so it's something like this. So inside there is the fuel store of those guys' ship.」



Roze pressed her hands on her mouth and leaked out a whisper, and Bovid was clicking his tongue while saying the correct answer.



The room where nearly a hundred dragon species were locked in dissolved in the blink of eye. Several fist sized metal lumps were created above Hajime's hand and they were then stored into "Treasure Warehouse II".



Perhaps because the dragons hadn't flown for long, when the cage locking them in was gone, they were falling without even able to fly. They fell with a flop on the barrier floor that Hajime spread and then they looked around in astonishment while sitting.



「This is troubling. It would be great if they can just fly away quickly but……they don't even have the strength to fly huh.」



「Uumu. It wouldst take some effort to care for this number. What to do, Goshujin-sama? There art also an option to use cheatmate and mine metamorphosis magic to forcefully remodel their body though?」



Tio suggested using the magic that once transformed the enemy monsters in the holy precincts into black dragons. Hajime carefully pondered that suggestion, but the problem was resolved before he could give the answer.



「Piih, PiiIIIhpipih」



Kuwaibel flew up in front of the dragons that weren't trying to fly away and then his body shined silver. The overflowing light was scattering like rain while showering the dragons. After a while, the dragons were starting to move their wings in bewilderment.



At first it was slowly. As though to ascertain the feeling. As though to recall the past.



One dragon, and then one more dragon was floating, and the dragons began to dance in the sky.



「Monarch dragon……was it? That was how those guys called this rug rat dragon.」



「Yes. A dragon that grant power to the dragon species. He is truly ought to be called as the king of dragon.」



Dragons in various size were flying around the small dragon clad in silver in adoration, as though they were offering their respect. Hajime and Tio's expression turned admiring while watching that sight.



Before long, the dragons flapped their wings powerfully and became a single flock that flew away. Most likely there was also a floating island at that direction. Kuwaibel was clearly giving out instruction to them to fly over there. It was certain that they would be able to rest their wings there.



「Thank you very much Hajime-sama, Tio-sama. To think that the two of you were able to save those children in the middle of that battle……how very admirable. As the representative of the dragon kingdom that love dragon and wish to be together with dragon, I offer the two of you my gratitude.」



Roze who stepped forward gracefully bowed her head deeply.



It appeared that Roze and her group were harboring feeling of affection to the dragon species, different from the army faction. Seeing that their side also had sky battlecraft and airship, Hajime thought that they were using the energy body that seemed to come from the dragon's heart, but based on what he saw from Roze's behavior then perhaps there was other method than that. No matter how he couldn't imagine this group killing dragon and took out their core.



While Hajime and Tio's interest was stimulated inside their heart thinking that there were more and more things he wanted to ask with this, they were guided by Roze to go to the reception room. That was how it went but……



The terrible condition inside the ship that was littered with holes, the crews running around for repair, and then the strange noise that sometimes resounded and the condition that made it seemed like the airship would fall anytime, those factors caused Hajime to ask「……Is this airship okay?」. In respond to that, Roze's reply was「I, it's fine you know?」with question mark inside her sentence and her gaze swimming around everywhere. In the end, Hajime rushed around to repair the ship.



He wanted to be spared of the ship crashing while they were talking, so he made them guide him to the broken area and performed repair one after another using transmutation. If there was lack of material, Hajime used a part of the material that he snatched in great amount from the mother ship.



Right after crimson spark surged, the damaged place became just like new in the blink of eye. The absurd spectacle caused all the crews including Roze to goggle.



Even when they were in the middle of moving to the next place, their gaze was nailed at Hajime's hand. When the hand moved to right, their gaze would also go to right, when it moved to left their gaze would also go left. When Hajime tried rotating his arm in a cir~cle, their gaze would also rotate in a cir~cle.



……To the right a bit faster-. The gazes went to the right swiftly-. Left-, but it was a feint, it was up! Refusing to get tricked the gaze went up! Left up down right left right up-! What the-left up right left right left-, ah, mistaken!?



「Just what art thou doing, Goshujin-sama and also queen-sama too.」



「Ah, no, sorry. Because these guys are moving too obediently, that I unintentionally……」



「My, my apologize. It feels like it would be a defeat if our gaze get left behind, that I unintentionally……」



The people around the blushing Roze were also making an expression like「Damn it, we unintentionally……」in harmony. Perhaps they were unexpectedly a group that could easily get into a certain mood.



With various happenings like that, Hajime and Tio who were invited into the reception room finally sat down on a stiff sofa. A steamy beverage was put in front of them. Most likely it was something similar like tea. A slightly sweet fragrance tickled their nose.



In front of the two was Roze. The blonde hair duo were standing in attention behind her. Midway to this room Hajime and Tio learned that both of them were siblings, the older sister was Olga Crow, and the little brother was Jean Crow. They seemed to be Roze's imperial guards. The elder sister was the captain of the imperial guards, and the little brother was the vice captain. They could also pilot sky battlecraft, but they were an expert in close quarter combat. It seemed that usually they were also aiding Roze's daily life.



「Hajime-sama, Tio-sama. Forgive me for being too straight, but can I be allowed to ask what kind of objective the two of you have? We……we have a goal, a mission. I think that if it's the legendary true dragon-sama then your understanding must have grasped it already but……like this, for the two of you to rush to our side in our time of danger, is it allowed for me to hold a hope that the two of you can give us your cooperation?」



「Wait, wait a bit. Calm down for now.」



From the middle of her talk, Roze's body was leaning forward and she kept talking on and on. Hajime pushed forward both his hands to stop her. Roze pulled back her body in panic and she corrected her posture in shame.



「I'll say this first, but I'm not the dragon knight you queen-san talked about, I also don't understand what you mean by true dragon. The reason is because we aren't a dweller of this world.」



「……Not a dweller of this world? Forgive me, I don't really understand what do you mean by that.」



「I meant that literally, we are human from different world. A world where there isn't a black rain like here, where the civilization isn't collapsing. There are multiple countries in existence there and they more or less believe in order and law.」



Roze's expression was getting more and more bewildered.



Hajime smiled wryly understandingly and he talked the summary of their experience of coming to this world. Whether they would believe it or not in the end, Hajime would leave it to their own decision. For the time being, he conveyed to Roze that with the premise that they were from another world, he wished for her to teach him about this world, the situation, and about the unfamiliar terms that sometimes came out in their conversation.



「It's a story that I cannot believe so suddenly but……for now, I understand that this talk itself won't progress without me explaining the situation. Having said that, I don't know from where do I have to start explaining……」



「Right……then, first, what is that black rain? Teach us starting from there. What happened that now the land is polluted by that rain?」



「So from there. So it's really true, that the two of you doesn't know about this world……」



Roze took a gulp of the drink with her mind still shaken by bewilderment and for now she reset herself. She pondered for a bit thinking how should she explain, and then she began to talk.



「The black rain, it is said to be the proof of the fallen monarch dragon――Helmut's grief and rage.」



In the past, at the time where the black rain still didn't exist, in the center of dragon kingdom Avenst where Roze's ancestor was acting as the king, there was an era of peace where dragon and human coexisted.



「In that era, when dragon and human reached a certain age, it was the custom for them to choose a partner to exchange friendship of a lifetime. One of the monarch dragons who were the partner of the dragon kingdom royalty in such era, was the evil dragon Helmut.」



「Monarch dragon, what does that mean?」



「Monarch dragon, they are dragon that possess special power even among the dragon species. They possess silver scales, bestow strength to the dragon species and the land, and they are able to exchange words with human. They are the ruling kind among the dragons that will only exchange friendship with the royalty of the dragon kingdom.」



The oldest and strongest country――Dragon Kingdom Avenst. A part of the reason of that status was because in a world where dragon was human's greatest friend, the kingdom royalty was the only one that could exchange friendship with the dragon's ruling kind.



「I see. That country surely was a country with influence huh.」



「Yes. The center of the world was without a doubt located in the dragon kingdom. However, even that era was approached by the end. ――It was the development of technology.」



Except the existence of dragons and ores and the like that possessed special energy, there wasn't any mysterious power like magic or anything in this world. It was inevitable for technology to develop here just like in earth. The difference was at the point that in place of electricity and gas, this world was using an energy that was called sky core.



「Sky core, is that the sky blue ore that is even smaller than grains of sand?」



「So you know about that……. Yes, exactly. It is a special ore with traits where it can be changed into various kinetic energy, stimulate the growth of crops, or even neutralize gravity. It's an ore that is really hard to be collected, but it can even allow an airship this big and sky battlecrafts to fly like this, and it can also produce light, heat, cold for our daily life.」



「……This ship, it's not using that thing that is like the dragon's heart?」



「-. Obviously-. Please don't lump us together like those Qwailent bunches-」



「……Calm down. I'm completely ignorant what is common sense and what is not in this world. I'll properly listen to queen-san's story, so please explain.」



「ah, my, my apologize.」



Roze whose boiling temper got cooled by Hajime's calm words cleared her throat. According to the explanation that she resumed, the thing that seemed like the dragon's heart――that was something that was called dragon core, it seemed that even just a cubic centimeter of it possessed the same amount of energy of a fist sized sky core.



Naturally, processing dragon core was very much better in labor and efficiency, but it seemed that Roze and others who were the descendant of dragon kingdom who didn't discard their country's ideal of coexisting with dragon even now when their country had perished, they were only using sky core. Because of that, their airship's spec was several level lower compared to the airship of their enemy――Sky Divine Country Qwailent. They also had difficulty in resupply, so they were always struggling with lacks of materials.



Somehow, it made it hard to drink the richly fragrant tea in front of them……



「Nkuh. This is delicious. Second please.」



「Ah, yes.」



Hajime-san mercilessly asked for second. Right after Roze was explaining with a bitter smile about their destitute living situation. The expression of the Crow siblings shuddered. 'Is this man's nerve made from special alloy wire!?' They wondered.



「And? The continuation?」



「Ah, yes. Eerr……that's right. While the technology development is continuing, a certain researcher discovered it. That the dragon core is far more efficient than sky core. The dragons who were the great companion of mankind had their remains buried courteously even after death. The dragon core that should be called as that dragon's soul was buried along with the dragon's remain, returning back to the land. That was the norm in that time.」



「So curiosity, stepped across that common sense?」



「I don't understand the feeling of that researcher. In the record, it was said that at the end of his research he created the fastest aircraft at that time using the dragon core of his partner who died from an unforeseen accident. And then, he didn't create anything other than that. ……It's possible, that man might only wished to fly together in the sky one more time using an aircraft that is inserted with the soul of his departed friend.」



The truth of the matter was unknown. However, the fact was that at the same time with that man's discovery, the countries all over the world also noticed it. The value of dragon core.



And then, it began. The cruel and terrifying act of dragon hunting.



Technology that made use of sky core required extremely much effort starting from the collection of the sky core. Sky core at the very least need to be fist sized to be useful, but the sky core that could be collected was only small things that were like sand. Just collecting it and compressing it into usable size consumed so much time and cost. Major effort was necessary just to research it.



Those necessities were removed by using dragon core. The research advanced rapidly and technology was developed with striking momentum.



「It was said that the countries all over the world unanimously gathered dragon core and the technology race intensified. In the middle of that, it was only the dragon kingdom that was trying to stop the tide of the world that is making dragon hunting as right. The kingdom used all kind of method. Economic sanction, preferential treatment from the dragon kingdom, the export of sky core……sometimes they even used military force along with the monarch dragons.」



「……How long they could do that?」



Roze made a troubled smile at Hajime's words.



While the countries around them were continuing to develop technology, they rejected dragon hunting as wrong――that had the same meaning as being left behind by the world. Even if they were an influential country, but if their technology level was overwhelmingly left behind, it wasn't hard to imagine what kind of evaluation other countries would have against them.



Even so the dragon kingdom continued to reject dragon hunting was because the dragon species shouldered the role as balancer of the world. It wasn't something that was proven scientifically. It was something like a superstitious belief. But, it was believed that dragons had a role of taking in toxic substance of the world into their body, and then they purified it to return it back to the world.



That was the belief in the dragon kingdom.



In a world where technology development advanced, a fact without proof wasn't worthy to be believed in. Even when the dragon kingdom persuaded that if the dragon hunting continued at this rate a calamity would occur, no one bothered to listen.



Like that the authority of dragon kingdom wavered, their influence lowered, and shadow was looming on their power.



「The one who showed unease at such situation was the first prince of the dragon kingdom at that time. He became unable to endure the declining of his homeland. He casted away the belief as superstition and strongly appealed for technology development using dragon core.」



「Naturally, it didn't end well wasn't it?」



「Yes. In the record, harsh writings about him……like he was the shame of dragon kingdom, or a traitor were written. However, even when he was showered with criticism from all the people of his homeland, he didn't stop. ……No, exactly because he loved his homeland from the bottom of his heard, that he couldn't stop anymore.」



「……I can picture it somehow. So he did it?」



Hajime looked up to the ceiling with an air that seemed to say 'dear god'. Tio too seemed to be able to imagine what happened. She sighed as though to say that it was depressing just hearing it.



Even while smiling bitterly at the two, Roze talked with sadness at the forefront of her eyes.



How the prince, laid his hand on the monarch dragon who was his greatest friend.



A research of dragon core technology that was advanced behind closed door. As the last finishing touch, he murdered his partner, and with that dragon core――he constructed a gigantic flying warship that used the dragon core of monarch dragon for the first time in the world.



That ship's majesty was tremendous, to the degree that the military balance at that time was tilted slightly just by that one warship.



Surely that prince felt relieved with that. With that his homeland was saved. There would be peace. The other countries wouldn't make light of them anymore than this, they wouldn't be invaded so easily.



「Thus, the dragon kingdom recovered its authority, but in exchange they lost their pride and persuasiveness huh.」



「Must be. Even if they called for the cessation of dragon hunting, no one wouldst listen to them. After all, they hath murdered a king of dragon to create a warship. Even putting aside other countries, the kingdom's own people wouldst be the one that gave up on the country most of all.」



「Exactly as you said. A storm visited the dragon country and they even met a crisis of internal disunity. But then, an occurrence so terrifying as though to say something like the risk of civil war is just a trivial thing was starting to happen.」



Black rain was starting to fall.



「Coming this far, the world finally noticed that they were mistaken. The true identity of the black rain is the end of the road of the energy that is released from sky core and dragon core. This thing that is dispersed into the air and changed in nature possesses a property that doesn't grant vitality but instead steal it.」



「I see. Let's put aside the detail about the underlying theory, it's true then that the dragon race, and perhaps the sky core are really balancer of this world.」



「Fumu. The world art holding true above a balance. Noon and night, man and woman, positive and negative……it's natural for a negative energy to also exist if a positive energy exist. The dragon species and sky core take in negative energy, they then turn that energy into positive energy that they release back, when the released energy accomplished their role they wouldst turn into negative energy, then that energy wouldst be taken in by dragon species and sky core once more…….the world art in circulation.」



The role of dragon species that was proved for the first time with the manifestation of calamity.



However, mankind who noticed that fact then charged headlong to the unforeseen direction.



「The dignity of the dragon species was trampled down. The choice that mankind took wasn't the abolishment of dragon hunting, or the safeguard of dragon race――it was cultivation.」



「Oou. I knew it already but……even in different world, human's karma is really deep anywhere huh.」



Several countries publicized their breeding farms that were made in secret. Mankind had already soaked their hand with sin that couldn't be taken back since before the danger of the world. They made those breeding farms not because they thought that this would happen in advance, they surely didn't even imagine that it would turn out like this. Their conduct of selling over the know-how of the cultivation brazenly to the world, just how foolish was that.



Who would be angry at the deed of mankind?



That was obvious. The royalty of dragon.



They believed. The royalty and people of the dragon kingdom loved them the dragon species from the heart, even when the country was on the verge of danger the people didn't give up to coexist with the dragon species. Because of that they believed, that surely human and dragon could walk together once more.



They endured. Even when dragon species was losing life one after another from dragon hunting, even when their relative monarch dragon was killed by the prince, because if they rampaged following their emotion then the dragon kingdom they loved would be crushed by the countries all over the world.



「The king made a decision. He told the father of monarch dragons who is his partner――Sutherland, that human and dragon should part with each other for once. The king said to take away all the dragon species and escape to the end of the world. If there are people that survived from the black rain, at that time the king asked for the dragon to grant a chance for the two sides start over one more time. Sutherland accepted and decided to part from mankind. However, that decision was a bit too late.」



「……So Sutherland's child, couldn't put up with it?」



Sutherland's child, the twin elder brother of the murdered monarch dragon――Helmut attacked a cultivation place and the country it resided in before his father's decision.



At the same time with that, it was an incident that was enough to erase the light of the coexistence faction that still hadn't vanished yet. Every country that obtained a just cause carried out the capture and subjugation of the dragon kingdom using their fleets.



「It was an alliance of many countries, yet regardless of that their pace was orderly, and their subjugation strategy was swift and precise. Even Sutherland who boasted of an unequalled strength, the best that he could do was to let some number of dragons to escape.」



「That was their aim huh. Perhaps the breeding farms were also provocation. It was to eliminate the remaining coexistence faction and completely taking down monarch dragons that were still a threat.」



「That, must be it. The dragon species that were massing to depart to the end of the world were pushed back by the quantity of the allied army and they were falling to the ground. Sutherland's children were killed one after another, or else their wings plucked and captured……it was truly a hellish picture. At the very least, it was enough to transform Helmut into evil dragon.」



His siblings murdered, their dignity crushed underfoot, the black emotion that had been piling mountain high, when he saw his siblings trampled before his eyes once more――it snapped. Helmut's mind crumbled and something awoke inside him.



It was said that the moment Helmut raised a howl that planted fear inside everyone that listened, the sky that should be clear was covered with dark clouds in the blink of eye, and then black rain was starting to rain in impeccable timing.



「Fumu. Based from what I heard here……the power of circulation that dragon race possessed, was it reversed in this case? However, if this monarch dragon possessed a power to the degree that couldst manipulate the weather, I don't think that they wouldst lose against mankind in the first place though……」



「How common. Wasn't it the rage and hatred that surpassed the limit that pushed up the rank of this Helmut? Aa, could it be, he evolved into this true dragon that queen-san mentioned before?」



Roze smiled wryly at the quick understanding of the two while giving affirmation.



True dragon was said to be the ancestor of the dragon kingdom's royalty and the monarch dragons. Its power was immense, and it was told that it could manipulate heaven and earth and could also transform into human, and so on. There was nothing left of its existence except in legend, a fairy-tale existence.



There wasn't any record of Helmut transforming into human, but it seemed that he was called as a historical true dragon that evolved from monarch dragon due to the aspect of manipulating weather. However, it was also an ability that was limited to covering the world with cloudy weather that made black rain fell.



「Tio-sama is able to transform into human, and that overwhelming ability……you manipulated wind and flame before this. That, as expected you are a true dragon……」



「No no, I'm not a true dragon. It's the reverse. I'm not a dragon that turn into human. The correct recognition art I am a human that turn into dragon.」



「Human, become dragon?」



「In our world……no, more accurately in Tio's world, there is that kind of race. Her family is all able to transform into dragon. If they are really true dragon, then that will be a bargain sale of fairy-tale existence.」



Hajime cackled saying「Well, even though she isn't a true dragon, but she is a god dragon though」while sending Tio a teasing gaze. Tio looked aside saying「I didn't say any lie」. (TN: True dragon's kanji is read as shinryuu, while accidentally god dragon's kanji is also read as shinryuu. Also the kanji for dragon of the god dragon here is for eastern dragon.)



Seeing the relaxed relationship of the two, Roze asked timidly.



「That, then, as expected about the two of you being dragon knight-sama and true dragon-sama……」



「From what I can guess, this dragon knight is also an existence from a fairy-tale, and he was the true dragon's partner, isn't that right? But it's completely different. Tio can become dragon but she is a fully fledged human, and even if you say partner but she isn't my friend, but my wife.」



「Wi, wife……」



「Mu, mumu-. Wi, wife……that's the first time someone called me that. What's this, this itchy feeling in mine chest. Goshujin-sama, this child, she is really a good child!」



Tio got all bashful and fidgety from getting called as wife for the first time. The eyes she were looking Roze with were suddenly filled with color of affection. Really, what a simple dragon.



Ignoring the writhing Tio, Hajime prompted Roze to continue talking. The simple dragon「Nou nou, Goshujin-sama. I'm thy wife」leaning on him was annoying, so for the time being he made her quiet with a slap. Seeing the hopelss dragon raising a coquettish voice「Ahanh」while collapsing on the sofa in ecstasy, the gaze of Roze and others became nailed on Tio.



Hajime's cough made them returned to reality.



「Ah, e, errrr……that's right. Helmut who became true dragon and began covering the world with black rain was said to have lost his former heart. Without discriminating human or dragon, he raised a loud laugh as though enjoying the destruction while trampling over everything.」



「So that guy degenerated completely. The birth of evil dragon, is it.」



「Yes. It was said that Sutherland began a deathly battle in order to stop his fallen son. At the same time, his spouse Detmers led their surviving children back to the dragon kingdom.」



There was one reason for that. In order to save their friend.



It was unknown whether Sutherland was able to stop Helmut. Even if for example he could, mankind would perish under the black rain that was rapidly covering the whole world. Their beloved dragon kingdom would die out.



Sutherland possessed an exceptional strength even among the monarch dragons. And if he fought seriously, then other would only become a hindrance to him. Understanding that, amidst the falling black rain, Detmers and others dashed in order to save the humans that had cornered them.



「The essence of monarch dragon's power is invigoration. And then, sky core has the property to neutralize gravity.」



「So that's, the reason of the floating islands.」



「Yes. But, as expected although they are monarch dragon, they couldn't do something like making the whole land float. What they could do was only making land with particularly abundant sky core to float. Even so, there is no mistake that we can live like this is thanks to the act of Detmers-sama and others that they carried out by staking their life.」



Kuwaibel who was snuggling up beside Roze raised a sad cry. Surely he understood the content of their talk. Roze gently caressed such Kuwaibel.



「This child is a memento from Detmers-sama. At that time it still wasn't time to give birth, but Detmers-sama who was in the verge of death because of the black rain and using up enormous power cut up her own body and left behind an egg. She said, this child who will be born someday, will be the hope as the last monarch dragon.」



It seemed that Helmut didn't come chasing after the floating land. According to the record, it seemed he watched the floating island while laughing. It was as though he was looking forward to the crisis that mankind would taste from there on.



Roze who took a breath after finishing the long story moistened her parched throat. And then, she faced Hajime with a gaze that was filled with determination unlike before this.



「After twenty years passed since that day of tragedy, the dragon kingdom that continued to exist in the sky received an invasion from sky pirate. Our country was stolen. At that time I was still a baby, I was able to survive thanks to my parents' close aides taking me away along with Kuwaibel's egg.」



Even without her saying anything, it could be guessed that the king and queen had died from Roze's expression.



The dragon kingdom perished and Sky Divine Country Qwailent came into being. The king was the air pirate's leader. He monopolized the limited resource. Roze and others who were chased out were reduced to air pirate, the slipped through the divine country's eyes and stole resource, and protected the people of the dragon kingdom who escaped together with them until now.



Like that, when Roze became ten years old, Kuwaibel was finally born. The people of the former dragon kingdom were boiled up by the birth of hope, at the same time, they kept hiding Kuwaibel's existence who was still weak so that the divine country wouldn't realize it no matter what.



「Even that end with today. My stomach froze when Kuwaibel came out to the battlefield but……from there, to think we were able to encounter Hajime-sama and Tio-sama……」



「Fuuh? And?」



Although Roze faltered for a moment at Hajime's penetrating gaze, she immediately returned back a blazing gaze.



「I beg you. Please lend us your strength. The strength to take back the land of dragon kingdom Avenst.」



It seemed that in the deepest part of dragon kingdom Avenst, there was a spring that could grant power to monarch dragon. If they could go there, even Kuwaibel who was still only a few years old would become able to use a power that equaled a grown dragon even if just temporarily.



There if Hajime and TIo's strength was combined with Avenst's mother ship and other airships, then it would also be possible to defeat the evil dragon Helmut, explained Roze earnestly.



Hajime glanced at Tio beside him. Tio's expression was pondering something, but she noticed Hajime's gaze and shrugged, leaving him to make the decision.



Hajime scratched on his cheek and he lowered his eyebrows a bit while,



「For now, let's put it on hold.」



He answered. Roze went「Eeh, isn't this the scene where you gladly accept!?」in fluster because her expectation was betrayed. Hajime said「Something like that is the domain of a hero somewhere or the abyss-san」and deflected easily.



Tio was staring at such Hajime with an expression that didn't expect it. As expected, if Hajime was told something that easily went outside the category of adventure like 'please go to a war with a country, and then please defeat the evil dragon and save the world', Tio thought that he would refuse promptly.



For Hajime whose basis was swift decision, it was a really half-baked answer.



「Well, what. Even us, after hearing the story just now we ain't just going to say "Oh is that so, yes, we will do anything". Various things happened today and we are tired. For now we are going to rest, think it carefully, and then we will give our decision tomorrow. You don't mind right?」



「Tha, that's right. Indeed I'm too impatient just now. Even though Hajime-sama and Tio-sama has just finished with a battle of that degree, my deepest apologize for my inattentiveness. We have prepared a room. It is a modest thing, but later on we will bring you your dinner, so please rest at ease tonight.」



「Ou. Much obliged, I won't hold back then. Okay Tio, let's go.」



「Ri, right.」



Hajime emptied his tea and stood up abruptly. He led Tio and got out of the room. A crew that would guide them immediately appeared and took them to their room. Roze was staring fixedly at the back of such Hajime and Tio with an expression that was a mix of hope and unease.



The airship Rozeria was gliding through the night sky where multitude of stars were shining.



At a corner of the ship's rear deck, there were the figures of Hajime and Tio. Both of them were sitting at the edge of the deck. Their legs were thrown out to the empty air. The sea of clouds that were shining from the reflection of the stars let the eyes of the two of them to enjoy the sight to their heart's content.



「And, why didst thou put the decision on hold, Goshujin-sama?」



Tio asked Hajime while watching him with a sidelong glance. Hajime was also similarly watching Tio with a sidelong glance while he opened his mouth.



「I'm thinking of deciding after hearing of what you want to do.」



「What I want to do?」



Tio tilted her head. Hajime nodded.



「Yeah. What do you want to do Tio? The restoration of the dragon kingdom doesn't matter, but you have a tii~ny bit on your mind about this evil dragon aren't you?」



「……So thou noticed Goshujin-sama.」



Getting seen through like this even though she shouldn't have taken any conspicuous attitude caused Tio's cheeks to redden from feeling too embarrassed. She thought that he really looked at her closely.



Tio slowly opened her mouth as though she was choosing her words.



「I thought that it was similar, just a bit. Of their way of living, and their last days.」



「Is it about, the dragon race's country in the past?」



「Yes. I understand Helmut's feeling, just a little. At that time, when I saw Haha-ue and mine comrades crucified, a black flame was certainly born inside me. A flame of hatred that only wished to burn others, even myself.」(TN: Haha-ue=mother, used in samurai families)



Hajime returned a silence at Tio who was talking bit by bit. He kept quiet while looking forward, lending his ear at Tio's story.



「I was able to stop because of Chichi-ue's words. I was able to change the black flame into power to protect. Helmut art surely the me of that time that couldst not stop.」(TN: Chichi-ue=father)



That was why she couldn't just be indifferent to this. When she thought that the fallen king of dragon would continue to ravage this world with black rain even from here on forever, for some reason, the feeling that this was intolerable was welling up inside.



「This is just a retelling from Yue……"The track that Tio had walked through until now. That is Tio's everything" isn't that right? That's just a meaningless supposition. Helmut was unable to win against himself. Tio Claus won against herself. That's all there is to it right?」



「Fufu, thou art right.」



Tio smiled fondly and nodded at the words of Hajime that sounded a bit displeased, as though to say 'don't lump together the stupid idiot that ruin the world with my Tio'.



A quiet time was flowing for a while.



Hajime glanced once more at Tio before he scratched a bit roughly on his head.



「Aah, geez. Stop being indecisive and say your answer already. I'm asking you here, what do you want to do huh? You are too considerate to other people other than yourself at various things. I'm telling you, show some selfishness sometimes other than with your perverted attitude.」



「Goshujin-sama……」



Tio blinked. And then, she reflexively closed her eyes and hid her expression toward Hajime who was staring at her fixedly. She then whispered.



「I want to end this. This art completely unrelated with us. The scale art too big to call it an adventure. The opponent's strength art unknown. This is just mine ego talking. I understand all that. However――I wish to end this.」



That was Tio's true feeling. It was Tio's selfishness that came from her sentimentality, based from her ego, for the sake to cheer up herself.



Hajime who heard that,



「Roger. Let's end this. We are going to end the evil dragon Helmut's everything, just for our own convenience.」



He easily consented to it.



When Tio turned her face, she found Hajime's face that looked somewhat happy there. An expression of happiness from listening to Tio's selfishness.



'Aah, no more-' Tio yelled out her indescribable feeling in her heart while leaping at her beloved master.



The light of stars shining in the night sky enveloped the two with faint gentle light.



Roze's group at that time.



「Awa, awawawah. The two of them, doing that in this kind of place-. Aa, amazing-」



「Ro, Roze-sama-. You mustn't look-. Co, come on, we understood already that they didn't disappear, let's go back inside quickly!」



「Pii, piiii」



「Kuwaibel-sama……. It looks like you are hiding your face with your wings, but it's obvious you are completely looking from the gaps there.」



「Ou ou. As expected from the legendary dragon knight-sama yeah. Doing that on the deck so brazenly. How envious.」



「Bovid-. What are you doing looking so unashamedly like that! Quickly take Roze-sama inside the ship! Roze-sama too, please release your hands from the railing! Come on, quickly-. Hey, your strength increases-. Just how interested are you-」



Roze-sama was grasping the railing tightly and wouldn't let go with her nose breathing roughly. Olga was desperately trying to take her back inside the ship, but her hold was so tight it made her shudder wondering just where did she hide this much strength!



Kuwaibel in his own way was hiding his face with his wings while also thoroughly peeking from the gaps. Jean acted the straight-man, but Kuwaibel's gaze completely stuck!



Seeing such covert pervert duo of monarch dragon and queen, it was only Bovid who was cackling while nonchalantly making his swift retreat.



Because he noticed that Hajime's gaze was seizing their figure from across the shoulder of Tio who he embraced closely.



A few seconds after Bovid vanished, crimson spark surged in the night sky.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 237




AN: I'm sorry, it's late again. Furthermore the story doesn't advance.



This is bad, I'm genuinely becoming unable to make it in time at 6 P.M Saturday……



I wonder if I should change it to Sunday……



The early morning when the eastern sky was starting to be tinged white. Perhaps also because of the high altitude, the air was piercingly cold. The blowing wind made the receiver to feel slight pain.



It depended on the person whether to feel it as refreshing or torture. Although, even if it was someone who felt it refreshing, they still shouldn't wish to stay inside such coldness for long.



In such environment, there were two silhouettes leisurely staying there for thirty minutes already.



On the deck of the airship Rozeria, there were Tio and Hajime relaxing with a steamy cup beside them.



The minerals that Hajime obtained in this world were lined up in front of him. He took them into his hand and stared at them passionately, toyed with them……it seemed that he was displaying his transmutation master nature without reservation. Beside him was Tio, she was exposing a gentle expression as though her usual perversion was just a lie while staring at Hajime's hand and face.



「E, excuse me~. Is it, a good time?」



A timid voice called at them. When Hajime and TIo turned their gaze, there they saw a beautiful girl with semi-long silver hair――Roze. Kuwaibel was firmly held inside her arms.



「Aa, what's the matter, queen-san. The queer queen-san who was loitering around there since around ten minutes ago.」



「Please at least greet if you actually noticed already!」



The truth was Roze-chan had arrived on the deck since around ten minutes ago. She witnessed a gentle atmosphere around the two that was hard to interrupt as a third person. And then, what crossed in the back of her mind was this and that from last night. As the result, she didn't know how should she call out at them and so she made an appeal「I'm nearby just by chance. Come on, notice me already! Greet out to me from your side!」.



「Roze-dono's blatant "notice me appeal" art cute, that we acted mean against our better judgment. Forgive us?」



「Uh. That, no, I was in the wrong because I didn't immediately call out……」



Roze who felt like running away even more from getting apologized honestly like that had her face blushed slightly in shyness from hearing Tio's remark that she was "cute", her mouth moved in mumbles.



「And, what do you want? Queen-san whose act is painful to look at.」



「That thing last night was Hajime-sama's fault! Does Hajime-sama hate me!?」



Last night, the punishment from demon king-sama was waiting for Roze-chan's party who was peeking at the scene where Hajime and Tio were exchanging love.



――Demon King-style Harassment 108 "From Today You Too Are Hauria"



A harassment by using artifact that reproduced a pseudo "Divine Statement" by applying and enchanting soul magic. The result was "the target's act became chuuni for a period of time".



It went without saying that when they saw the act of Roze and Crow siblings that suddenly turned painful to look at, the eyes of the other crews turned into dot. They even called the ship doctor thinking that the everyday hardships might finally turn them strange. Even after the effect ran out, they didn't even have the willpower to complain to Hajime and the three harmoniously sat on the corner of the room while grasping their knees to endure their black history.



Bovid who sensed demon king-sama's anger a touch faster and escaped alone watched such trio and laughed loudly while rolling on the floor. Him acting like that made it felt like there was a retort 'is it fine to roll around laughing at your lord's foolishness like that, captain of the air battle squad's first squad' that could be heard.



「Good grief, we cannot progress like this right? Stop making merry and say your business.」



「-. Ho, hold it down me. I am the queen of the proud dragon kingdom. It's fine. Take a deep breath. Suu, haa……」



With blood vein pulsing on her forehead, including the wretchedness of the punishment last night, Roze renewed her determination 'I won't mistake someone like this as the legendary dragon knight-sama for the second time!' and then she told the two that the breakfast preparation had finished.



「Queen-san herself expressly come here just to tell us that? Even though you can just leave that to your subordinate.」



「No, that's because when I heard that the two of you were on the deck even since when the sun hadn't risen that I'm curious about what are you doing.」



It seemed that it was something like that. Hajime shrugged and his hand beckoned at Roze whose body shrunk from cold. Roze whose gaze wandered around feeling a bit perplexed approached Hajime's side excitedly.



「Ah. The wind is……」



「Tio is covering the surrounding with wind barrier. A wind that contain heat. Feels really pleasant right?」



「Ye, yes. ……Whether it's Hajime-sama's tool, or Tio-sama's magic, they are really something that is outside our common sense. About the talk of another world, I think it finally feel real for me after a night passed.」



「Well, even if I told you of another world it's not something that can be accepted right away.」



Roze glanced at Hajime who kept making crimson sparks at the ore in his hand even while they were talking. It was a vibrant crimson light. The ore changed shape right away. It was completely a mysterious power that human of this world didn't have. The supernatural weapon created by that hand easily routed a gigantic battleship.



But, Roze knew that Hajime's power wasn't just making supernatural weapon. She didn't hear about the detailed story, she also didn't think of forcefully asking, but she saw that right after Hajime showed his appearance, he tore to pieces the hook of an approaching sky battlecraft unarmed. That was something different with the power to create thing that she was looking at right now.



Honestly, she couldn't see his bottom. She thought it was terrifying. And now when she knew that this person wasn't the noble dragon knight from fairy-tale who was the personification of justice, she felt it even more.



However, for them the descendant of dragon kingdom who were heading toward a slow ruin, the existence of Hajime and Tio was like a gift from heaven.



Also this timing when the last monarch dragon Kuwaibel had been born, she couldn't help but feel that there was destiny at work.



「Oh, finally.」



「We hath waited long. I hath great anticipation because of that.」



「? Excuse me, both of you what are……」



Hajime threw his gaze to the eastern sky while one of his hands was carrying an ore. Tio also focused her gaze while leaning close to Hajime. Roze who didn't understand what the two of them were doing tilted her head with question mark floating above her head.



「What you ask, it's that. We are here because we want to see that.」



Hajime said that and pointed, at the thing that was showing out its face right now――the sun.



The sunlight swept away the blackness of night and dyed the world silver. The shadow of the sea of clouds darkened, and the illuminated place started to shine in sparkles like jewel.



The sunrise seen from the deck of an airship that was continuously flying above the sea of clouds.



That was exactly the reason why Hajime and Tio got out on the deck since early morning. For the sake of settling it firmly inside their memory, the superb view of another world they went astray into through a strange phenomenon.



「……It's not bad. Yeah, it looks really great.」



「This art a harsh world, but the strength of the light that wipe out the black of night art the same no matter what the world. Yes, it's wonderful. It's a beautiful world.」



「……」



Roze was dumbfounded.



The words "beautiful world" that came out from Tio's mouth echoed many times inside her head. When she thought about it, when was the last time she watched the sunlight like this? She thought that this sight entered her sight every day.



However, she didn't think anything about that view. She was merely desperate to survive and to accomplish her duty, she didn't even look at the sky despite living in the sky. She noticed that although at this late hour.



The world was getting brighter moment by moment.



「……Yes, it's beautiful. Really beautiful.」



Words of agreement. However, in contrast with those words, Roze's expression was vaguely dark.



「The food is delicious even with how simple it is. Ah, give me another of this.」



「You, you are really not holding back huh.」



On the breakfast table, there were Hajime and Tio, and then Roze, Kuwaibel, Crow siblings, Bovid, and then a male crew that seemed to shoulder the role as a waiter. Usually they didn't have anything like a waiter, even the queen Roze and also the imperial guards leaders Crow siblings would do everything by themselves.



This time it was a special situation where they were welcoming guest that were Hajime and Tio.



Hajime's remark of "another" despite saying that the food was simple while also understanding the reason why the food was simple caused the waiter's cheeks to twitch a bit, even so he obediently obeyed. Bovid retorted with an amazed expression. His attitude to the two of them was the most casual among the crews of this ship.



「Yeah. I'll stop if I'm told to stop, but as long as no one say that, it's my principle to receive the hospitality I'm given with my all.」



「Hahah, I get that. I was also taught by my father to receive the good will I'm given without reservation. You had even saved our life, so eat as much as you want. Though even after I say that, the one who create and prepare the food is actually not me! Ahahahah」



'Really, don't say anything you……' The gaze of the Crow siblings that was wordlessly appealing so was piercing Bovid. However, Bovid didn't pay that any attention. Right now, rather than the serious Crow siblings, it was more important to make Hajime and Tio felt welcome. He had finished saying thanks last night from getting his life saved, but as expected it was best to show the thanks with action. That was Bovid's cherished opinion.



It seemed that they was used to Bovid's unserious attitude, so Olga sighed while turning her gaze at her master. Olga couldn't stop frowning at Roze's state that was clad in a vaguely dark atmosphere since she went to call Hajime and Tio on the deck.



「……Roze-sama. Did something happen?」



Leaving a glance at Bovid who was talking cheerfully with Hajime, Olga talked at Roze with a quiet whisper.



Roze who looked taken aback and returned to her senses then shook her head and showed a smile to avoid the question.



「We still, haven't heard the decision of Hajime-sama and Tio-sama……so it looks like my unease came out in my face.」



「Is that, so.」



Orga looked like she couldn't accept the explanation and she sent a glance of doubt, thinking that as expected the two of them had done something to her master……her body twitched.



Because Tio's hand stopped moving at the meal and she was staring fixedly at Roze and Olga.



When Tio's eyes met Olga's, she showed a smile that looked trouble, but also looked somehow gentle. Olga twitched even more from that expression.



Hajime and Tio who finally finished their meal after asking another helping twice then enjoyed the after meal black tea made in another world. Choosing the timing, Roze then asked with determination.



「……Hajime-sama. Regarding the answer for my wish last night, can I ask you to please tell us your answer?」



Defeat the divine country together and revive the dragon kingdom Avenst. And then, after putting in order a complete force, subjugate the evil dragon Helmut.



That was their cooperation request. Thinking from the aspect of their battle strength, they wished for Hajime and Tio to become the leading part in the battlefield. Especially in the part to defeat the divine country where Kuwaibel was still powerless, almost all of that part would rely completely on Hajime like that.



Last night, when Hajime and Tio got out on the deck, they thought that perhaps the two of them would then disappear without telling anyone and so they spontaneously ran after them.



But, seeing the two of them were still staying here like this, then surely the two would grant their wish……



Although they were thinking so, but they couldn't help but gulp their saliva from nervousness.



Inside the room where complete silent had descended, Hajime slowly put the cup of tea he drank on the table,



「We are going to slaughter Helmut, but we don't give a damn about that divine country something. You guys work hard yourself about that.」



「Wait, I don't understand what you are saying.」



They almost trembled in happiness when they heard that the two would kill the evil dragon, but they suddenly went cold hearing the sentence's latter half. Roze asked back with a half smile looking as though she was running from reality.



「I told you, I cannot be bothered about your country's revival, but as for Helmut, we are thinking perhaps we will go kill that guy a bit, purely for our own convenience.」



「……Wait, I don't understand what you are sa――」



「Aa?」



「Understand. Evil dragon subjugation banzai. Sayonara the future of dragon kingdom's revival. That's what you are saying right. I understand.」



Roze who tried to do her best added with escaping reality, but she returned to reality due to Hajime's voice and expression that looked like yakuza. She couldn't stop her eyes from getting teary. Replacing Roze who fell silent, the Crow siblings stood up so fast their chair fell down while raising voice of protest and persuasion.



「Why!? If you two have that much power, then it shouldn't be that difficult to defeat the divine country! This is our dearest wish-. Please, I beg you two to rethink it-. Please-」



「Right now, even in this time the people of the dragon kingdom are suffering in hardship! The dragons are also in the same situation! Didn't the two of you repel the mother ship of the divine country yesterday and saved the dragons-? Here please show your righteousness one more time!」



Olga and Jean's words resounded loudly. However, the expression of Hajime who received those words showed not a single ripple.



「This is not really something you need to raise your voice that much right? If Helmut is defeated, the world will clear up. When that happen, then you can build your country anywhere on the vast land down there. Something like the land that might be polluted, or the battle against the divine country of that, those things are matters that are not related at all to us resident of another world. We don't happen to have any duty or responsibility to become your substitute in war.」



The sound argument that was returned to them caused the Crow siblings to be at loss for words. However, the power that Hajime and Tio showed wasn't something that worthless that they could give up that easily. The two weren't that farsighted that they could just say「Oh, is that so」in acceptance, even though there was the possibility to defeat the hateful divine country right in front of their eyes like this.



That was why, they raised their voices asking how the two of them could abandon the suffering humans and dragons even after they knew the situation and also getting begged on like this.



「Hajime-sama. Please we beg you to lend us your strength. At the very least, even if it's just a cooperation to make it so Kuwaibel can reach the underground of the palace, can you please help us with that?」



Roze's pleaded fervently. Hajime retorted back without any particular change in his expression.



「What kind of compensation you can give me?」



「Eh? Co, compensation?」



The Crow siblings were going to make a ruckus once more, 'even though this concern the future of the dragon kingdom's people' like that, but Roze stopped them with her gaze. And then, she thought of what she could present, and the result, with determination she――



「I, I'll offer myse――」



「No need.」



「Hauh!?」



She was unable to say it until the end. Even though she was going to offer herself with a determination of the lifetime, yet it was cut down and discarded instantly. Roze whispered a line「E, even though, I am a queen」that might make a certain princess-sama somewhere to go「Comrade♪ Comrade♪」while jumping for joy.



「Or rather, you are really going to say that in front of Tio huh. The nerve you have there is really quite something.」



「Eh, ah. My, my apology, Tio-sama! I am not intending to insult Tio-sama by any means……」



「It's fine, it's fine, I understand.」



If she knew that actually Hajime also had multiple wives other than her, just what would this queen-sama of another world think? Tio averted her gaze with a vague expression.



Roze sank into silence with a difficult expression and her gaze wandered around furiously while her head was working desperately.



Hajime opened his mouth with a sigh to finish the talk soon.



「Certainly, I have great power, and I can brag that just destroying a country won't take much effort. But, it's because of that that I won't use my power because of other people's will. My power is only mine, and it has to be wielded constantly by my will. Save me, help me, those wishes aren't something exclusive that only you have. The world is overflowing with that kind of wishes, as many as the stars in the sky. I don't have even the littlest bit of intention to spend my life and my important people's life until it run dry from responding and rush about everywhere to that kind of wishes just "because I can".」



That was why, even if it was everything for the people in question, Roze's wish that was nothing but a common wish for Hajime wasn't something that he would undertake that simply as long as it didn't even have any merit for him that could make him overturned his decision.



「And, you guys who are wishing for me to slaughter several thousand people and overthrow a country in your place, what kind of compensation you can pay me that can make me overturn my will that is flatly refusing to do that kind of thing and make me decide to wield my power?」



「……」



Roze couldn't say anything at all this time for sure. Olga, Jean, and Bovid were also the same.



Hajime stood up from his seat. Roze twitched and trembled.



「As expected, I'm not that shameless that I can keep remaining here after refusing your dearest wish like that. I and Tio will go to visit Helmut after this. I'll only promise that I will clear up the dark cloud from this world. I don't know how you queen-san and others will live in the new world where the black rain vanish and the sunlight shine on the land but……at the very least, I'll pray for your success. It'll be great if your dearest wish can come true.」



「ah, wa, wait-. Please wait-」



Hajime said that and prompted Tio with his gaze to walk out from the door. Roze threw herself at such Hajime. Of course, she wasn't attacking him but stopping him from leaving. She clung on Hajime's arm and desperately formed her words.



「Sa, say, err, tha, that's right! Even though you say you will subjugate Helmut, but you don't know where his location is right? We will show you the way! That's why, please don't leave-. Putting aside the matter of the divine country's subjugation, we still haven't be able to return our debt of you saving us!」



「If it's Helmut's location, we can do something about it ourselves. About the debt, the delicious meal and empty bed are enough for that.」



Hajime quickly shook off Roze's clinging arms, but Roze circled around him and took position in front of the door with both her hands spread out. Hajime's eyes narrowed quietly, but even while sweating coldly, Roze didn't show any sign of moving at all.



「Pl, please, come to Avenst by any means!」



「You are trying to take us away?」



「That's not it! I'm not thinking that such thing is possible! ……If it's in Avenst, then we will be able to show our gratitude a bit more properly. Even the cooking there is incomparable with the food in Rozeria, also in Avenst's airspace there are also island with lake and island that grow rare fruit! After that, after that there are also a lot of dragons living there-. It's only a few, but we are living in coexistence. Among us there are also people that can ride dragon, the sight of human and dragon flying together is really beautiful……after that……the people of Avenst are all good natured, ah, there is also craftsman that specialized in handling ore! Surely you will be interested. Besides, err, that……」



She was already desperate. Even while getting incoherent, Roze was trying to make her invitation to mother ship Avenst into reality by speaking out things that might attract Hajime's interest one after another. It was also just a bit painful seeing her like that.



Roze spread out her hands with all her might to not let anyone pass while narrating the charm of her country that didn't even have any territory with teary eyes. It seemed that she was thinking if she invited Hajime to Avenst, then there would still some possibility left they could move his emotion and receive his cooperation.



There, Crow siblings and Bovid also joined. They kept speaking on and on so that they wouldn't lose their connection with Hajime somehow. Kuwaibel was raising s small cry while approaching Tio's leg.



Staring at those brave figures of the queen and her group desperately clinging to their hope, Hajime's expression suddenly turned gentle. Roze and others got taken aback, then their eyes shined with hope thinking that perhaps Hajime would hear to what they were saying.



Hajime was making an expression that seemed to say 'can't be helped huuh', yet it also looked really gentle, while――his hand was reaching toward Donner.



(Wait wait wait wait-, wait a second, Goshujin-sama! As expected, there art no way thou wouldst shoot them to death here correct?)



(Tio. You, what do you think I am. Of course I won't open up any hole in them. I have properly changed the bullet with non lethal rubber bullet. I'm just going to give them a bit painful forehead poke.)



(……I, is that so? No, even so I think that art still too much though.)



Roze and others were puzzled seeing Tio who suddenly held down Hajime's right hand and began to whisper from point blank range. Surely they didn't imagine even in their dream that if Tio was late just by a step, they would get *dopan-*-ed.



Tio glanced at them who were actually in a pinch and whispered to Hajime with her body glued on him.



(Goshujin-sama, this art a rare chance, how about accepting the invitation?)



(What, you are interested?)



(Yes, I'm interested in the point where human and dragon art coexisting. Besides……)



(Besides?)



Tio looked down shyly. Hajime's eyes blinked at the unexpected gesture.



(Helmut's subjugation wouldst not take that much time correct? As expected, after closing the books of one history of this world, we wouldst not be in the mood of continuing to adventure aimlessly again. Helmut's subjugation wouldst be the end of this adventure.)



(Well, I guess.)



(Yes. After subjugating Helmut, we wouldst return to earth. That's why……)



(You are saying, you want to continue this adventure of just the two of us a bit more? Well, certainly an adventure of just two day and a night sound questionable.)



(Ye, yes. So just a bit more……is it no good?)



This was Tio whose vocation was protector, so honestly Hajime didn't know if that was all of her true feelings. Perhaps she more or less had sympathy toward the dragon species of this world and Roze and others.



But, Tio's selfishness where he usually needed to ask her before she finally said it out, now she said it by her own initiative. Hajime's answer was decided already.



「Aa, then, perhaps I should take a look, just for a bit, at this country of queen-san and others.」



「Ah, that means……」



「Yeah. I'll accept your invitation. However, that's all there is to it until the end. Understand that this doesn't mean I'll agree to cooperate with you.」



「I, I understand!」



They somehow held on to the hope. Of course, they also understood that at this rate it would be only an empty hope. Even so, they couldn't help but felt relieve and happiness.



Seeing Roze and others, the four of them rejoicing with each other, and Tio who was linking her arms with his in a good mood, Hajime smiled wryly.



Approximately a day after that.



Deep inside cloud mountain range area where giant cloud mountains were stretching out, the nation on board a ship Avenst finally showed up.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I plan to end Tio arc in about two more chapters.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday if possible.





Chapter 238




Inside the corridor of a magnificent palace before the dawn, hurried footsteps echoed.



The servants who were already starting to work turned their gaze in wonder about the loudly stamping footsteps, there their expression turned startled because they recognized the figure of the high official with a grim expression. That was because the high official of the divine country wasn't a commendable character with the habit of waking up before the dawn.



The male high official turned through several passages, and before long he arrived in front of a room that was guarded by soldiers armed with firearm. Even though the guards recognized the high official's face, but they instinctively put themselves on guard seeing his unusual state.



「You guys, announce my arrival to his majesty quickly! This is an emergency business-」



「Silas-sama. However, his majesty is still in the middle of his rest……」



The male high official who raised an angry voice――Silas was answered by one of the guards, but Silas cut him off with angrier voice.



「I don't care-, wake him up! Quickly! I told you this is an emergency-」



「Ro, roger!」



One of the guards called out to inside the room. After a while, who came out was a woman wearing thin clothes with a displeased expression. When the guard explained the situation, the woman's expression was becoming even more displeased even while she drew back into the room.



Silas was tapping his foot in irritation while waiting. The guards were stirring awkwardly seeing that.



After a while, the displeased woman just now showed out her face with her clothes in order this time. And then she prompted Silas to enter.



Silas entered the room by pushing aside the woman and he ignored the small curse of the woman that came from behind while heading toward the door inside the room. The room he was currently in was the room before the bedroom. It was a place for reception.



He knocked on the door a bit roughly, then he obeyed the voice「Enter」coming from inside that was said with a voice that sounded deliberately bad-tempered and he opened the door.



「Silas. Do you really have a reason to rouse me out from bed?」



It was a man who was past his middle age. He was gulping amber colored alcohol that was poured into a glass while asking that. Although his appearance was only wearing a gown, his eyes' sharp glint and grim expression had the pressure that naturally overpowered anyone who saw.



This man was the king of Sky Divine Country Qwailent――the usurper Gregor Cluzet Qwailent.



This king who had lived until now by stealing from other people since the time he had awareness of his surrounding would easily turn his back on other even if it was his trusted confidant. Silas knew that. This man's overwhelming violence, and his craftiness that fully made use of that violence, and then his atrocity that was deeply dyed by his pillaging nature, his aura that came from all those wasn't just papier mache.



Such atmosphere would usually make Silas shrank into himself, however this time Silas only gulped his saliva and opened his mouth.



「The mother ship Ostinato, fell. ――It was shot down.」



「……What did you say?」



A mother ship getting shot down had never happened since the founding of the country. Gregor's eyes slightly opened wide from hearing that report. His pressure was increasing further than before while he urged Silas「What happened?」to continue.



「Last night, a sky battlecraft that belonged to Ostinato returned back alone. The pilot was a man named Higgs from Glowser squad. His sanity was mostly lost, so it was difficult to question him about the circumstance, but according to him, they were attacked by two monsters in the middle of a battle against Avenst, and then Ostinato got shot down.」



「Monster? Is it about Bovid's squad? Indeed, their skill is like a monster but――」



「No, that's……he said that they were done in by a man who fired a bombardment in the level of a mother ship's main cannon by his lone self, and a black dragon that flew in the speed of sound while manipulating flame and wind at will.」



「……Redo the questioning. No matter how you think, he must be crazy. Don't tell me, you aren't waking me up because you swallowed that kind of nonsense right?」



Gregor whose displeasure was increasing drastically had his finger gliding toward the gun placed on the desk. He must be thinking that if Silas was that kind of incompetent, than he didn't need him anymore.



Silas continued his report even while he was trickling cold sweats.



「Of course, I'm reporting this after confirming that it's not nonsense. After the questioning, we sent a call at Ostinato using wide area communication. But, there was no result. And then when we sent an investigation unit at the place where Ostinato fell……」



「It was true?」



「Yes.」



The investigation unit here referred to a unit that mainly investigated the land. They were mostly unarmed, in exchange their airship was fast and thickly armored, the unit members were also wearing special protective clothes that could defend against the black rain's encroachment for a little while.



The component of black rain that had been raining down for many years on the land was also included by a lot into the moisture in the air, so even if someone didn't get touched directly, their body would get eroded just by breathing the air. To investigate the land, what was needed wasn't respiratory device that purified the air, but a fully sealed protective clothes with oxygen tank.



Therefore, even if they were called as investigation unit, but their activity on the land was limited timewise……



「It was an investigation unit that was sent urgently, so they didn't look around for much detail but――」



Silas was at loss for words. His lips distorted as though he was hesitating and choosing his words carefully. Gregor urged him「Doesn't matter, just report it as it is」in irritation.



「It seems that the exterior of Ostinato, its 3-gun turrets as well as the ship's rear bottom are gouged out wholly. The sky battlecrafts onboard are mostly gone, most of the important spots were blown off as though they were exploded from inside. And then……about the crews……」



「Hmph. They are annihilated anyway right?」



「Yes. But, it seems that the cause wasn't just the black rain.」



Saying that, Silas took out a data storage of recording video inside the mother ship that was brought back by the investigation team. Silas's expression was pale for some reason. Gregor received the data storage while looking suspicious and inserted it into his personal console.



What was projected in the display was……



『That guy-, that guy is coming-. Run away quickly-』



『Stop-, it's me! Don't shoot-』



『Noooo-, no moreeee-. The voice won't go away-. Someone-, hel――』



『Aa, aAAAAAAAAAA-』



『Die-, DIEEEEEEE-』



It was a scene of chaos and madness that would make one covered their eyes. The recording was only showing the crews of Ostinato. However, everyone was fighting, bawling, or desperately running away as though they were being chased by something unseen.



And then, the people who lost their sanity early attacked the people nearby, and then the stray bullet from the attempt to counter attack that would attack other people……after that it was just like a stone that rolled down a slope. It was a crucible of madness that created unseen terror and excessive paranoia against the comrade before them.



「What, is this……」



「……」



Silas couldn't answer at the mutter that unconsciously came out from Gregor's mouth.



Before long, when the madness reached its peak, everywhere inside the ship exploded unnaturally, and Ostinato ultimately crashed to the ground. The lightning strike inside the sea of clouds further destroyed the inside of the ship, but someone must be displaying their last obstinacy, because the ship recovered its floating power for a moment just before it crashed on the ground and it somehow avoided complete destruction. Even so the ship still exposed a figure that looked atrocious even just from looking.



「Silas, what happened with Ostinato?」



「I don't know. We cannot confirm the existence of intruder from the ship's recording. Just what is "it" the crews were frightened at……or perhaps, it might be the "monster" that Higgs was talking about.」



Inside the room became deathly silent. It was an eerie silent that would make one wanted to express it by saying it was like even the insect was holding breath.



「……What about the battle record against Avenst? You will know what was "it" Ostinato was fighting from there right?」



「That's, because of the explosions from unknown cause, all the record inside the ship except this one was destroyed and couldn't be recovered.」



Perhaps, that too was the work of the "monster"……even without putting it into words, the two of them thought of the same thing.



Silence ruled the place for a while. Gregor was looking across the window at the sky that was nearing dawn while he suddenly gulped down his alcohol. He drank directly straight from the bottle. Its alcohol content was high and quite some amount was remaining in it, but he drained it dry without feeling bothered by that.



And then, he threw the bottle to the floor that it broke into pieces. He wiped his mouth roughly and looked at Silas with a fiercely blazing gaze.



Silas's body jumped while he fell into hallucination as though he was being glared by a wild beast. Gregor made a grin that displayed his brutal nature and gave his order.



「Summon the ship captains. Everyone of them except the defense fleet.」



「Wha-, that's……. Your majesty, you will finally take care of those guys?」



「Yeah. The struggle of those Avenst bunches was a suitable amusement. I don't know what they are starting to raise, but this time they overdid it. I'll have them disappears now.」



By no mean Avenst had succeeded in applying guerilla tactics against the divine country. In the first place there was overwhelming difference in resource and technology between the two sides. If Gregor felt like it, it was a trivial matter to annihilate them.



They were surviving solely because battle that happened unpredictably became Gregor's amusement. That was all.



But, as expected the prided mother ship of the divine country getting shot down was a situation that he couldn't turn a blind eye on. Because they introduced themselves as country of god that ruled the sky, they couldn't have themselves got even a single scratch from the like of pirate. This concerned the dignity of the nation.



Therefore, he would overwhelm them with all his forces excepting the fleet that was left behind for the country's defense. He would exterminate them from this world, not leaving a single dust behind.



Silas lowered his head wordlessly and turned on his heel in order to accomplish his task.



「Come to think of it, that princess too should be in a suitable age about this time……kukuh, maybe it's also not bad to take in the royal blood. Or perhaps, I should even show how the last royalty fall in front of the survivors.」



A delighted laugh echoed.



The gigantic mother ship Avenst was moored in the valley of a cloud mountain..



The mother ship of divine country Ostinato that Hajime sank was also gigantic, but Avenst was two sizes larger than it.



Although, if it was asked whether its majesty surpassed Ostinato because it was superior in size, then the answer could be no other than "No".



After all,



「……The gun turret, has a lot of laundry aired there.」



「……The deck, hath plantation spreading through the whole thing there.」



Hajime and Tio who were observing the gradually nearing Avenst using binoculars muttered so spontaneously.



Yes, the mother ship Avenst was horribly peaceful from the outside. The gun barrels and turrets on the exterior were linked with each other by wire and laundries were hanged in a row there. A panty of some madam was hanging on the tip of the main cannon. Honestly the two of them couldn't help but felt their strength drained from them seeing that.



In addition, there was a splendid plantation on the deck. There were a lot of people taking care of it diligently even now. And then, on top of such deck children were running around energetically. There was even a daredevil that slid down something that looked like a slide that stretched to the outside from the deck until the bottom of the ship in one go.



「I, it's more or less treated as the "royal capital", so it's attaching importance to the livelihood or something……in the first place, Helmut had collected the dragon core of the monarch dragon that became its driving force, so even though it has weapons but they won't work satisfactorily. And so, if that's the case then it's better to use it for valid practical use……」



Roze made that kind of justification with her cheeks reddening slightly in shame.



Actually this mother ship Avenst was the battleship that the prince once created using the dragon core of his partner. Although, its dragon core was taken out by Helmut, so right now it was moving using only sky core, and the most it could do was only flying just barely.



Knowing that, Hajime threw a questioning gaze of what they would do if they were discovered by enemy, to which Roze puffed up her chest and pointed with her finger.



「It's fine. Its weapons are mostly not functioning, but the thickness of its armor is top class even among the existing airships in the present time. Even if it got hit by the main cannon of a mother ship, it is able to endure several shots with room to spare. What's more, airships protecting Avenst are always at its side.」



Looking closer, there was an airship moored beside the mother ship Avenst.



Airship Averia――it was the sister ship of Roze's battleship Rozeria. If it had to be said then Rozeria put importance on speed and maneuverability, in contrast Averia was a battleship that put importance on firepower.



These two ships had protected the descendants of dragon kingdom Avenst until now, said Roze proudly.



Hajime was glancing at such girl while cocking his head in puzzlement inside his heart.



(Just two ships, what's more their mother ship is not even in destroyer level……they are really pulling through continuously until now while burdened with protecting baggage? Is there just how much the difference in skill between the two sides? No, even so……)



Hajime turned his gaze to Tio. Coincidentally Tio also turned her gaze to Hajime at that time, so their gaze met and their expression was at loss for words. Roze herself said that they had protected all these continuously until now, but perhaps, that was……like that the two of them reached the same conclusion.



While they were doing that, the mother ship Avenst was gradually getting closer and closer.



Naturally the existence of the airship Rozeria was also noticed by the other side, so the people who were tending to the plantation, and also the children were gathering toward a spot on the deck bustlingly. That spot must be the spot where Rozeria would come alongside.



Roze waved her hands energetically. A loud cheer was raised just from that. It seemed that her popularity was becoming of a queen.



The Crow siblings and Bovid and others of sky battlecraft squad also came out to the deck and started the preparation to transfer to Avenst.



When the airship came alongside the mother ship Avenst, the deck of Avenst was jammed with people. Although Hajime had fixed it to a certain degree, but Rozeria was really in a terrible state. It seemed that it was enough to make the expression of the people welcoming the queen to turn pale.



「Everyone, there is no need to worry. We were attacked by Qwailent, but it's as you see! I and also Kuwaibel are safe!」



「Piih!!」



When Roze lifted up Kuwaibel high with both her hands, joyful cheers occurred once more. Roze hugged Kuwaibel back on her chest and lifted one hand to calm down the cheers, and this time she raised her voice with a meek expression.



「But, a lot of pilots offered their precious life in order to let us survive. Please direct your feeling toward the brave warriors who are unable to go back home. And then, please give them praise. We are protected by them.」



The sky battlecraft pilots were lining up on the deck. Sobbing voice resounded from here and there from the people who didn't see the figure of their important people that they should have seen off at the departure. Bovid and others put their fist on their chest and looked up to the sky. That was the salute in dragon kingdom. They offered a silent prayer at their comrades who had gone ahead of them.



The people on the deck naturally also offered a silent prayer.



Silent prayer was spreading in the sky where gentle breeze was blowing.



After the silent prayer continued for a while, an aging man stepped forward in front of the crowd.



「Roze-sama, welcome home.」



The white haired man with splendid moustache bowed his head deeply with his back kept stretching straight.



「Gramps. I'm back. Was there any problem?」



「None, there wasn't any such thing. This Sabastian Orto is entrusted with looking after this place during Roze-sama's absence. No problem would occur that easily as long as I'm here.」



This man who answered calmly yet with a definite confidence seemed to be Roze's trusted retainer. His appearance, his way of speaking, and his atmosphere were absolutely that of a butler despite the normal work clothes he was wearing. Hajime and Tio had a thinking in regard to this man.



That thought was,



『『Almost』』



Hajime and Tio spontaneously retorted. 'If only his name wasn't "Sa" but "Se", they would be able to proof the existence of the implicit rule shared through parallel universe that speaking of butler meant "Sebastian", and yet!' was what they thought.



When the alternate world duo who didn't read the place's atmosphere made a complicated expression, Roze mistaken that expression thinking that the two of them were getting bored, and so she started to get down the ramp in panic. She did that while calling Hajime and Tio's name by attaching '-sama'.



Naturally, there was no way the people didn't get suspicious when they heard their queen calling others using '-sama', and as their representative Sebastian raised a question.



「Roze-sama, can I ask who are these two people?」



「They are guests. This gentleman is Nagumo Hajime-sama, and this lady is Tio Claus-sama. They will be staying in Avenst for a while. ……They are important, really really important people, so please take care of them absolutely politely.」



「……Roze-sama's, important, person?」



Gramps's gaze seized Hajime. Knowing the meaning of that gaze, Hajime averted his gaze. 'This is because you said important "people"', Hajime retorted inside his heart.



「I'm sorry to be rude, but Roze-sama, more specifically what kind of acquaintance they are for you? By any chance, are they from Qwailent?」



「No, Gramps. They aren't related with Qwailent. That, about their background, saying it here is a bit……. Anyway, I request this to Gramps no matter what! Please give them our greatest hospitality! ……No matter what, we have to please Hajime-sama.」



The last sentence was said in small volume that couldn't be heard by the people at the surrounding, but Sabas who possessed the ears of an excellent butler caught it perfectly. Sabas who had taken care of Roze since she was born loved Roze like she was his own daughter.



And that master of his that should even be called as his beloved daughter was now desperately trying to please a man that he didn't know……



'Okay. I don't really get it. In other words, he is enemy isn't he?' He concluded.



Of course, Roze whispered that in the meaning that she wished for Hajime to be pleased with Avenst. She understood that if Hajime felt like it, then it didn't matter what Tio wanted, and so Roze made that utterance because of that, but the eyes of gramps Sabas who didn't know one bit about that instantly turned into the eye of a killer. While smiling friendlily and gently.



「So that's how it is. Well then, I will immediately prepare the room and meal. Nagumo-sama, Claus-sama, if any of you need something, then please order anything from this Sabas without any reservation.」



As expected from the steward that directly served the royalty. He showed a truly elegant manners. While smiling friendlily, and gently. With the eyes of a killer.



Thinking that for now he should clear up the misunderstanding before this gramps gave them trouble, Hajime opened his mouth.



「Aa, Sabas-san? I'll say this because it seems you are having a misunderstanding, what queen-san there is saying doesn't mean like that okay? Or rather, I'm a married man. See, this woman here is my wife.」



Saying that, Hajime grasped Tio's arm and jerked her to the front. For some reason, Tio bowed her head gracefully while saying「Nice to meet you, thank you for always taking care of my husband」, she was making a greeting as though she was meeting the superior of the company where her husband was working for some reason.



It seemed that it was something she wanted to try saying at least once after seeing an afternoon drama. Tio was giving glances at Hajime saying「How's that? How is that? Didst I look like a wife just now?」.



Hajime smiled wryly thinking that this wasn't that kind of situation, even so he brushed Tio's hair unreservedly. Tio's cheeks were dyed red from a sweet pleasure that was different from when she got slapped.



Even seen from the side, it was obvious in a glance that the relationship of the two wasn't something shallow.



When Hajime tried to look at Sabas thinking that the misunderstanding must be solved with this……indeed, it seemed that the misunderstanding that he was a scoundrel aiming at their important master was solved, but in exchange a new misunderstanding seemed to be created.



The eyes of Sabas whose body was trembling all over were moistening with sadness and,



「Roze-sama……gramps feels really sad-」



「Eh? Eeh? Wha, what's wrong gramps!? Why are you suddenly looking like wanting to cry!?」



Roze-chan got flustered. Gramps's hands gently grasped Roze's shoulders and he opened his mouth in admonishment.



「Roze-sama――you must not commit adultery.」



「Gramps, is your head okay?」



Roze tilted her head wondering, 'has he finally starting going senile?'. Behind her the Crow siblings were making an amazed expression, while Bovid was desperately enduring his laughter.



「Indeed, gramps was looking after Roze-sama strictly. I am keeping a watchful eye at Roze-sama even in regard of the matter of love. Even though currently there is hardly anyone with lineage that is a good match for Roze-sama, there is no way I can just leave Roze-sama to any man. Therefore, the love letter for Roze-sama from those people who doesn't know their standing, I tore up and discarded all of them after I inspected them but……」



「Eh!? Please wait a second. That's the first time I heard that though? There is someone who gives me love letter? In this Avenst? Or rather, what do you mean by inspecting them and then tearing them up!?」



Roze's popularity in Avenst was high. And then, she was living with the people in the same ship, and she was always talking with them normally, on top of that she was treating everyone amiably. She was boasting a tremendous popularity among the young men.



Of course, Roze was idolized as a queen, and those men didn't believe that they would be able to build a really good relationship with Roze, the most that they did was only writing up their heart's feeling and sent them to her. And it was done by a considerable number of people.



However, Roze had never received something like a love letter even once. She had also never getting confessed at. She was at that age, so it wasn't like she didn't have interest for that, but she thought that no one was thinking of her like that because her social position was in the way.



But, she never thought, that it was like that because……



Roze-chan morosely pressed her question to the gramps, but it didn't reach the ear of the brooding gramps.



「Roze-sama, please give up your idea! To aim at a man who is married……even before thinking about the moral as a royalty, it's already mistaken as a human! Please, think again and stop from something like a looting love!」



「Really, what are you saying gramps!? I'm going to stuff you into Rozeria's main cannon and blast you off you know!?」



The people of Avenst stirred.「Her majesty is, looting love……holy cow」,or「She abducted a man she is pleased with, altogether with his wife……as expected from our queen」, or「My, love letter……」, or「Or rather, just who is that man who shot through Roze-sama's heart?」, or「That breast. That beautiful black haired woman is his wife……how envious, I'm jealous」, or「You, you like that kind of woman more than me? Then, look forward to an encounter at the next world okay」, or「Wai-, that's a joke. I only have feeling for you-. Ah, wait, don't push! I'll fall, I'm going to fall-, sto-, aa~~~~-」, those voices could be heard.



Roze desperately raised her voice in denial. However, putting aside the male camp, the female camp's misunderstanding was also unexpectedly not really clearing up. It seemed that the female camp of Avenst knew quiet welt that their queen who was at that age was a hidden pervert.



Roze who got lukewarm gazes directed at her no matter what she said yelled「This is misunderstanding~~~~~-!!」resoundingly through the blue skies.



Two whole days passed since Hajime and Tio arrived in mother ship Avenst.



During that time, Hajime and Tio received the greatest hospitality possible from Roze and others.



At the first day, Roze gathered the top brasses and shared the information regarding the circumstance and background of Hajime and Tio, so the top brasses with Sabas whose misunderstanding was solved at the forefront were giving their hospitality by their own initiative, to the degree that was desperate. Hajime and Tio tasted a treatment a bit like VIP.



They had their fill of various cooking that was using the mysterious ingredients of this world. The foods fundamentally were grain, fruit, and vegetable, but those products had extremely good flavor from the grace of the sky core's effect, coupled with the skill of the cook, it was enough to satisfy both of them.



They were also guided to a floating island that possessed a large lake. The water that was flowing out from the floating island dispersed midair and turned into white mist which was covering the whole island, that sight truly should even be called as a secret region that was covered by a mystical veil, to the degree that just by being able to look at that made the two thought that it was worth it to come to this world.



Also, the sky cores that were dotting the lake's surrounding seemed to possess the property to take in the humidity in the air and turned it into spring water. The fact that its nature was subtly changed due to that area and the environment caused Hajime's blood as a transmutation master to boil up.



Hajime also exchanged a piece of god crystal with the craftsmen of Avenst who were handling the sky core and they had discussion. They got along greatly with each other. The expression of Hajime who comprehended the various natures of the sky core looked pleased with himself.



There was also the matter of the misunderstanding about Roze's illicit love with the married couple spreading, but the people of Avenst also came into contact with Hajime and Tio with immense curiosity. Someone would surely call out to them kindly when they walked inside the ship.



And the best thing in the two's opinion was that they were able to see this coexisting livelihood of dragon and human.



Human and dragon flew around to patrol and repair the ship's exterior, to harvest on the floating island and deliver luggage, and sometimes just to dry the laundry. The human and dragon that became partner numbered very few if seen from the whole, even so the good old way of living of this world could be found there. It was something that Tio admired very much.



In general, the country aboard the ship called Avenst really matched Hajime and Tio's preference whether in the people's trait, their senses of value, and also their way of coexistence. It was a comfortable country. At the very least, it was far better than the trait of the country that tried to kill them without question and spewed out outrageous remark to Tio the very first time they met.



And then, when Tio and Hajime welcomed the morning of the third days they were enjoying enough this country called Avenst and this world.



The two were waiting for the appearance of the sun for who knew how many times at the front deck of the mother ship Avenst.



There, a voice that was filled with faint nervousness and resolve called out at them.



「……Hajime-sama, Tio-sama. What do you two think about our country?」



When the two looked back across their shoulder, over there was Roze who was holding Kuwaibel in her arms like usual. No, it wasn't just her, the Crow siblings and Bovid, Sabastian, and then the top brasses of Avenst starting with the captain of airship Azeria were arrayed there. Everyone was making a complicated expression like a traveler that was made to stand in the fork road.



「I think it's a good country. I can even think of it as normally comfortable even without the hospitality.」



「Is, that so. I'm, glad to hear that.」



Roze's expression who heard that showed a wry smile. She must have guessed it. That the thinking if they could moved the emotion of the two, then perhaps Hajime would change his mind and gave them their help, such thinking didn't work.



「As expected, something like a status of being our hero, it's not enough as compensation isn't it?」



「You already knew that right from the start right? A man who will change his mind easily after receiving that much hospitality, do you think that kind of man can be expected to become anything like a hero that saved a country? Something like that just isn't in my nature, and it don't even suit me.」



「Fufu. Indeed, when I think back about your deed when cornering the mother ship of Avenst, the title of hero really don't suit you Hajime-sama at all.」



「Now you have said it queen-sama. ……Conversely, it feels like it's you who become a bit unbound from something instead.」



While the expression of the top brasses looked frustrated and pained, it was only Roze whose eyes were containing resignation along with a vague resolve.



Roze took a deep breath at Hajime's pointing out so.



「Perhaps. During these two days, I have been looking at the two of you all the time. Even when you two were having fun, I saw that your heart is unwavering. Why? Even though all these nice people might die, how can you still abandon them? What a terrible person. I also had that kind of thinking.」



「Hmph? You think differently now?」



「I will lie if I say that I'm thinking completely differently. Because no matter what, I am an absolute ally of Avenst. But, somehow, the two of you, aren't inhuman people who doesn't show interest to us……let's see, if I have to say, I come to think of the two of you like a "large tree".」



Hajime titled his head not understanding what Roze meant. In respond to that, Roze talked while choosing her words. The top brasses who were making complicated expression were also lending their ears to Roze's speech.



「An unshakeable existence, that is just existing there. Sometimes it protected us from cold rain, or softening the illuminating sunlight. But, it would never hold out its branches because it is asked, that kind of existence.」



「……That's a strangely fitting phrase.」



Roze chuckled while saying「I'm honored with your praise」seeing she was able to make Hajime blink.



The eastern sky was starting to grow light bit by bit. The dawn was near. Roze turned her gaze at the eastern sky that was starting to brighten while adding on her words. The top brasses were also lending her their ears silently.



「At that time, when the sun came out, the two of you said to me that "this world is beautiful". I had forgotten that all this time, but certainly, even when it has ended up in this state, this world is beautiful. Even though it's this beautiful, even though it has been broken like this, but mankind is still not repenting. ……I thought, just for a little. Taking back our country, defeating Helmut, and then taking back the world before this――is there any meaning in those?」



The top brasses were suddenly starting to get noisy. That was only natural. After all, their king was blurting out something that sounded like she was denying mankind's continuation.



「A destructive thinking huh? But I think that you were persuading us really desperately considering all that though?」



「Of course. Because it was something that I only thought for a bit, I'm not throwing away our dearest wish or anything.」



Relieved sighs were leaked out. The top brasses were stroking down their chest.



Amidst them, Roze talked to Hajime who was tilting his head wondering just what was it she wanted to say.



「Surely, there is no meaning in it.」



「In your dearest wish?」



「No. In being saved.」



Kuwaibel cried out sounding vaguely troubled. It was Kuwaibel who sought help the first time at Hajime and Tio. However, he didn't seek help to break the deadlock in the dangerous situation of that time. He was seeking for the salvation of the dragon kingdom itself from Tio's overwhelming presence that his senses as a monarch dragon detected.



Guessing what Roze wished to say, the expression of the top brasses looked taken aback and turned into a vaguely troubled look.



「We surely have to save ourselves by our own effort. If not, in the world after it is saved, we will surely walk on the path that destroy the world once more……that's what I think.」



「I think it will be fine if it's the people of dragon kingdom though?」



「No. As long as we don't even massacre all the people at the fight against Qwailent, the one living in this world won't just be the people of dragon kingdom. Even if we tell them let's live in repentance after having everything ended by a supernatural existence, just what kind of persuasiveness that can be found from that kind of words?」



After having their country destroyed by an incomprehensible existence that suddenly appeared, there was no way the people would then lend their ears toward the preaching of the people of a dead country who didn't even really fight.



The overwhelming power that Hajime and Tio displayed was a lethal poison in a sense. If such power could be wielded, then the wielder would undoubtedly be able to force their will to happen. Seen from the view point of people who were lamenting powerlessly, the people who were reaching out their hand toward their dearest wish, it wasn't an exaggeration even if such power was called as a magic with unequalled charm.



Therefore, Roze who was charmed and became captive of that power where she then asked for help, after she saw the figure of Hajime and Tio living a really normal daily life, showing admiration and wonder at everything in the trifling ordinary day, it seemed that her boiling mind recovered its calmness.



「Originally, we should also say "Don't get involved, this is our problem" about Helmut's subjugation too, but……」



「You are awfully different from two days ago huh. Well, those are admirable words but……my wife said, 'I want to beat up Helmut-kun viciously until you cannot even recognize how he looks like!', so just give up on that.」



「N, no, Goshujin-sama? I, didst not really speak that far……」



Actually, Hajime-san also thought that he wanted to go and took a look at an "evil" dragon. This wasn't just a mere dragon they were talking about. It was an "evil" dragon. 'Isn't that tickling the soul!' Though currently it was a serious scene, so he read the mood and kept such thinking only in his heart.



「I see. Then, we will fight in the world that stop raining. We will pray for your success in Helmut's subjugation. And then, if possible, it will make us happy if you will remember us, the dragon country Avenst, oh horrible dragon knight-sama from another world.」



「I told you already right, I'll pray, so that the dearest wish of you all queen-san and others can come true. Or rather, what's with that horrible dragon knight-sama huh. As I thought, you are holding a bit of grudge aren't you?」



「Who knows, what are you talking about?」



Roze said that while chuckling.



It seemed that she really wasn't planning to request the two of them to become their proxy in war anymore.



There were two kinds of victory. A meaningful victory, and a meaningless victory. Surely the path Roze and others was walking on was filled with hardships, but if they were looking for the former, then they had to fight by their own. Her smile was a bright one must be because she had clearly realized that and resolved herself.



The top brasses were making a troubled expression at their queen's decision, but when Roze looked back and asked「Is there any objection?」with her gaze, they bowed their head unanimously. And then, when they lifted their head back, the same resolve and determination like Roze were dwelling in those eyes.



「Hajime-sama, Tio-sama. I'm glad I can meet the two of you. Please, stay healthy.」



「Ou, you guys too. I won't forget about the people of the sky who are living together with the dragons.」



「Roze-dono. I'm praying for a limitless happiness for thee, and for thy important people.」



The morning sun showed its face. Warm light filled the world from beyond the sea of clouds.



Hajime and Tio shook hand with Roze, and like that, they were about to part――



「-, Cross Bit!!」



Suddenly Hajime yelled. Right after that, the huge flash that was launched from the sun assaulted the flank of mother ship Avenst.



Hajime defended against that attack using barrier that was formed by the Cross Bits he secretly deployed two days ago when they arrived at this ship.



Thunderous sound and impact shook the world. Roze screamed and she was about to tumble down, but Tio helped her to stand still.



Because the barrier didn't cover the whole ship, the extremely violent flash was making mother ship Avenst to tilt with its after wave. The top brasses on the deck were falling to their knees altogether.



Was it ten second, or one minute?



The flash fired from the sun was vanishing as though it was melting into the empty air.



「Hiding in the sunrise, they are acting witty.」



When Tio and Roze turned their gaze toward the sunlight at Hajime's mutter――



There were countless black dots there.



It wasn't just one or two. A great number of black dots could be seen inside the sunlight that was illuminating the world with blazing light.



No, those were, what appeared with the sun on their back using that light to hide their figure were――



「Qwailent's fleet……no way, why are they here!?」



Roze's words that sounded like a scream resounded.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Just, one more chapter……you know?



Next time the update plan is at 6 P.M Saturday too. That's the plan.





Chapter 239




AN: I don't get it.



Whether it's about the harmony that the people of Narou sometimes showed, or about the trust toward Shirakome that is non-existent.



Even though I said that there is only one more chapter left, but no one trust me!



Right, fine then. Then Shirakome also has my own thinking.



Yes, I'll answer to that trust. I'll continue for two or three more chapters okay!



It's not ending at all! Even though I had written twelve thousand characters, but even the fight didn't start yet!



I'm sorry for lying!



……It will really help if you all can laugh it off 'just like usual, what a hopeless Shirakome huuuh', like that.



Tio arc, please accompany it for a little bit more.



A fleet that was formed from easily more than a hundred ships appeared from inside the dawn. The number of the airships was countless, and there were 30 ships at the same level with the mother ship Ostinato that was sunk before this, and then there were ten mother ships of Avenst's level that surpassed Ostinato's level, the number of the sky battlecrafts was very much like the stars in the sky, and then there was one super gigantic battleship that seemed to be the flagship, advancing forward leisurely.



Their majestic appearance showed with certainty that it wasn't an overestimation to call them as the country that ruled the sky.



「……Why, how, are they here?」



They thought that their location wasn't known. Because if that was the case, then they would have been annihilated already since a long time ago. The fact that they were fighting even if it was with guerilla method was the proof that the nation on ship Avenst wasn't discovered, that was what they thought.



That was why, Roze could only stand dumbfounded in front of the embodiment of death that suddenly showed their figure. She could only let out meaningless question of「Why」「How」.



Crow siblings and the other top brasses were also in similar state. The combatant Bovid and then Sabas were showing a resolved face that said「Aah, so they finally come」. These two might be the only one who vaguely noticed this possibility. But, even though they noticed there was still nothing that they could do.



Silver color flashed.



「Chih. Oi, queen-san! How long you are going to stay dazed like that-. If you don't have any motivation, then I won't defend the next one anymore!」



「-」



Right after Hajime's yell shook the air, the second wave of attack from the fleet assaulted mother ship Avenst. It was an attack like previously, a silver bombardment that thrust toward the flank. Twelve came in one wave.



In respond, several variable chakrams "Orestes" were floating around before anyone knew it.



The Orestes instantly cut into the line of fire and they unfolded with *kashun* sound. They opened a gate that crossed space in their inner area.



Each of the silver bombardment that was approaching while making the air screamed got seized into the internal of Orestes, and instantly they were returned back toward the fleet by another Orestes that were floating above Avenst.



The fleet got the main cannon attack they launched themselves returned back as it was toward them, however, they didn't show unsightly appearance like getting sank from direct hit of that. Several airship class ships that were deployed at the front shined silver, at the same time a barrier was deployed at their front line.



The barrier that was also shining silver completely blocked the returned main cannon bombardment. And it didn't stop there, the bombardment's might was shaved off as though it was getting sucked and then the attack was erased in just a few seconds.



「Hee. As expected, they are also making countermeasure against their own weapon.」



「Something of this scale, it seems that the country itself art moving out. It's unknown whether this art only a part or their whole force though……. Goshujin-sama, it seemed that there was survivor wasn't it?」



Tio guessed that there was survivor from the mother ship Ostinato who reported back to their country and she hummed in admiration. To think that there was a survivor from that attack of Hajime that should even be called as a savage deed, and that survivor even managed to struggle until he reached back home……surely that survivor was a possessor of a powerful fortune, she thought.



In reality, that possessor of powerful fortune was returning home in half crazy state, and after that, as the result of receiving an inquiry that was like a pseudo torture, his personality then became calm as though his nature was reversed or perhaps he had even reached enlightenment, and now he had become a character that was like a saint who loved dragon and nature and the sun above all else……



「Whoops, so it's physical attack this time. For now it looks like they are evading us.」



Several hundred missiles flew out from the fleet. All of them looked as though they were avoiding the vicinity of the front deck at the warship's bow where Hajime and others were at. They were flying toward the rear half of mother ship Avenst and the two airships at the side.



It seemed that they had noticed the existence of Hajime and Tio. On top of that, they weren't aiming at direct hit course toward the two of them surely because they were thinking to capture the two of them if possible.



「Well, it's easier to deal with when they art bunched up. Goshujin-sama, please take care of the straggler.」



「Okay.」



Tio thrust both her hands forward. The stance looked like she was going to hold something from left and right. And then focused jet black magic power came into being instantly. It was sparking and compressed――and it was fired.



*GOU*, a bombardment in a scale that didn't lose to the enemy ship's main cannon before this surged.



Tio was launching the prided breath attack of dragon race. It easily erased a part of the approaching missile swarm. In addition, when Tio swung her arm, like a giant laser blade that was made from jet black light, the missile swarm was mowed down horizontally.



Several dozen missiles that got away were shot down by Hajime's sniping.



At the same time,



「Now then, to conform to manners, we have to return the favor properly.」



What Hajime took out while saying that was of course the sky *chu……the sunlight convergence laser "Burst Hyperion".



「First Compression Reactor――"Release"」



The sunlight energy that was already focused was launched directionally. The fiercely extreme light burned the retina as though it was further overwriting the sky's morning glow.



Naturally, the barrier fleet formed the silver barrier. The light of Burst Hyperion mercilessly pierced through that barrier. The impact sound that made the air screamed resounded, a part of the barrier fleet was pushed back by the might.



「Second Compression Reactor――"Release"」



The laser bombardment mercilessly increased its might. Different from the silver bombardment, the barrier was making unpleasant sound "bikiri-, paki paki-* without even being able to absorb the attack. The battle line was disarrayed and the silver light that was enveloping the barrier ship that was nearby the place where the laser impacted was flickering weakly.



「Third Compression Reactor――"Release"」



Of course, Hajime-san further pushed hard. The maximized sunlight laser was finally going to pierce through the fleet's barrier.



But, perhaps it should be said as expected from the fleet of a country. It didn't look like it would go that easily.



The warship with the biggest size shined brilliantly. That ship which seemed to be the flagship was enveloped by similar silver light like the barrier ship and then it radiated the light toward the barrier ship.



「Hmph? It looks like monarch dragon granting power to other dragon huh.」



Hajime whispered while releasing the fourth compressed reactor. Just like how monarch dragon granted power to other dragons, it seemed the flagship was also able to grant power to other airship.



「……That's, the ability of the exclusive ship of Qwailent's king――Durgrant. As long as that flagship exist, there won't be any way to defend against the fleet's bombardment and there won't be any hope to slip through the barrier.」



The one who answered Hajime's whisper was Roze's spiritless words. Shadow of despair peeked through her eyes. She must know it really well. The reason they couldn't win even if they fought from the front. Until now they must have been brought to grief many times by this enemy.



As though to make doubly sure, there were also another fleets separated from the fleet in front, floating from three directions with the mother ship Avenst at the center. It seemed they were advancing while hiding on the outer layer of the sea of clouds and finished the encirclement.



「I see. That's certainly a tough barrier. ……Though it seems it's taking considerable compensation for it.」



A scream suddenly resounded. It was the yell of death agony that came from a beast. A clear ill will could be felt from their action that was purposefully broadcasting that voice using speaker to the outside.



「……The fleet is all linked up with equipment that magnified the dragon core energy. Naturally that means that their driving force is using dragon core. They are using the land of Avenst for breeding dragons, so they are literally consuming dragon core as disposable item.」



To shed more detail, dragon core would become bigger along with the dragon's growth. Dragon that was grown up through the years would possess fine quality dragon core inside their body. Because of that, with the objective of harvesting usable dragon core immediately after the birth, they were also using drugs to quicken the dragons' growth.



The scream of the dragons who were continuously killed having their source of life exploited one after another even right now in this moment caused Roze and others to make a pained expression as though it was themselves who were being cut apart.



Hajime saw them looking like that and he let out a sigh and he stopped the firing of Burst Hyperion.



Actually he was thinking to take out all his Burst Hyperion and launched his maximum bombardment that was concentrated in one spot + sublimation magic but……he saw Tio beside him who were obviously boiling with emotion of rage and grief despite her expressionless face, so he refrained from doing that.



The attack of Burst Hyperion ended and the unharmed fleet was resuming its march leisurely. It seemed that the fleet was vaguely enveloped with the atmosphere that was convinced they had endured through Hajime's attack.



But, at that time, a man's voice resounded in the airspace that was rampant with despair and scream. It was a voice that was heavily coated with ridicule, ill will, and atrocity.



『So the bombardment just now is your doing, the black hair there.』



There wasn't any self-introduction. There wasn't even any preface. If he asked, than the one asked would surely answer. They could do nothing else but answering, they wouldn't even be allowed to stay silent. It was a question that couldn't even hide such haughtiness.



And so, for the time being Hajime shot Acht Acht.



A life-sized gun barrel. Zero time sniping without even focusing to aim.



Surely it looked like a peashooter after seeing the extremely big bombardment of Burst Hyperion.



But, that was a mistake. After all that sniper cannon was specialized in penetration. The speed that was beyond the pale of the knowledge of electromagnetic acceleration was equal with destructive force. Under the condition of one point penetration, it was far above Burst Hyperion that was a weapon of extermination.



「Well, the main unit is also considerably tough huh. It would be quick if the boss is blown away by just now.」



「That place looks like the bridge, but it didst not meant that place art really one. Look, somehow his anger art transmitted to here. I didst not know who art this person, but it looks like he is still alive.」



A dangerous atmosphere was conveyed through the speaker of flagship Durgrant. That was only natural. Because his question was replied by a shelling, what's more that shelling easily pierced through the barrier and then blew up a part of the place that seemed to be the bridge of the flagship Durgrant.



Seen from the whole, it was really just a damage to a minor part but……



It was really easy to see how shaken the fleet was. And it was even easier to understand the anger of the man who asked the question just now.



And then, that feeling of shaken also came from Roze and others behind. Lines like「Lies, Durgrant that had never even been scratched until now is……」, or「The legend, is easily broken like this……」, or「That mercilessness that is just like usual……I'm going numb here y'know, Hajime-san」could be heard from them.



The radiance that was enveloping Durgrant increased. At the same time the screams of the dragons were also reverberating once more.



『You black hair, can you hear this? I'm not taking out fuel from them or anything you know? I'm only simply torturing them. They are crying with a nice voice right? This crying voice of these animals you bastards are treasuring. ――If you want me to let you all die painlessly, then don't you dare making light of me aga――』



『What the hell you are talking about since some time ago? Speaking sluggishly like this after I've been waiting patiently like this. What a slow guy. Stop wasting time and speak your business. I'll listen so talk quickly.』



Against the haughtiness, even more haughtiness attacked back. Hajime answered using telepathy while still acting arrogantly with his arms folded. That attitude looked like he felt all of these were troublesome, it was unthinkable that he was doing bombardment contest like a space battle that would come out in an SF just now. He didn't even ask the identity of the one talking to him.



Hajime had no interest about the identity of the one talking to him from the bottom of his heart. This was an opponent of little importance.



That implicit thinking was conveyed vividly to all the people in that airspace.



『……You doesn't even know who I am? Looks like the collaborator of Avenst is a dumb guy huh.』



『There is no way I'll know that when you don't even introduce yourselves. Well, from your way of talking there is not even a fragment of refinement in it, are you an upstart punk or something? It's better to not trying too hard to make yourself look threatening y'know. You might feel like a big shot after bringing a lot of your friends along like this but……the smell of a barking dog is intense even from here.』



Bursting out sound from Roze and others who knew about the true identity of the voice's owner could be heard from behind.「Bufuh」It seemed that they reflexively leaked out a laugh.



Or rather, there was now Hajime didn't understand just who was it riding the flagship in this situation. In other words, everything except when he said he didn't know the speaker's identity was merely his true feelings.



『What a cheap provocation. You said that, but you are desperately thinking about a plan to breakthrough this even now aren't you? That's a laugh. In deference of your comical figure I'll introduce myself. ――Gregor Cluzet Kwailent. The king of sky divine country Qwailent. Now you understand? The one in front of you is the god king of this world.』



In a sense that claim wasn't a mistake. He possessed the greatest military force and also monopolized most of the limited resource in this world. Whether to give or steal, to let live or kill, it all depended on him. There wasn't anyone who could object even if he introduced himself as a god.



But, Hajime who heard that claim was,



『I see. Well, say, that. Do your best okay, God-sama. I think you must have it hard in various things though.』



For some reason, Hajime gave him words of encouragement with a very gentle expression.



What crossed at the back of Hajime's mind was a god of a certain another world. The existence who when he was insisting「Because I'm a god. I don't have friend, my country was also ruined, and I'm an attention seeker who liked to create doll, but I'm seriously a god! That's why, everyone, listen to what I'm saying okay!」instead got a wind hole opened on his body and went *pop*.



Thinking back, that guy was someone really pitiful. Good grief, just who it was, who was the guy that beat up that kind of unfortunate and pitifully hopeless god to death leaving not even a dust behind. What a terrible guy.



『Goshujin-sama. Art you waiting for a retort for that? I wouldst say this, just in case, it was Goshujin-sama who obliterated that self-proclaimed god in rage. Also, I wouldst say this because it seems thou hath forgotten but, it was also Goshujin-sama who shaved the retainer god to death. That deed of chopping off his four limbs to instigate his pain and fear, and then shaving him to death slowly from the edge of his body, it was something that was really hard to forget.』



It seemed from the middle the event of Ehito going *pop* was leaked through the telepathy. An exasperated straight-man retort came in from Tio.



Roze and others were taking a step back with a creeped out expression. It was really not a method of killing that human could do! They were taking distance with their shudders laid bare. The top brasses could be heard whispering things like「I vaguely thought it but……as expected he is a demon」, or「A brute, there is a brute hereee」, or「What lack of mercy……I admire that yeah」and so on.



Naturally, it was a telepathy that was broadcasted externally, so the words of self-poclaimed god and the words of unfortunate and pitifully hopeless god were also overheard by all the people in the area. And the king of the divine country who was talked to be at the same rank with that kind of god and in the end even got a gentle expression directed to him was,



『Roze. Choose. Will you all fall into ruin altogether, or will you come under me along with the monarch dragon and abandon your country?』



He changed his target. It wasn't like he was feeling awkward or anything. His emotionless voice was displaying really clearly the rage that was boiling like magma inside him.



Those were the words of the sworn enemy who usurped the throne and took over the country, however Roze was unable to answer immediately. Gregor's objective was clear. He was aiming for the power of monarch dragon from Kuwaible, the blood of royalty from Roze, and the enjoyment of seeing Avenst struggle after it lost these two.



In such case, then the people of Avenst would surely going through annihilation exactly as though they were shaved to death. And then, Kuwaibel would be forced to go through experiment and mating to mass produce monarch dragon, while Roze would also become a plaything.



But, if they didn't obey, then Avenst would perish immediately. The only difference between the two choices was whether it would be a slow or fast death.



Originally even if they were going to challenge Qwailent in the cleared up world, but they wanted to leave behind those who couldn't fight in a safe place. But it seemed even that choice was already gone.



After closing her eyes for a bit, Roze made her decision.



「Hajime-sama, Tio-sama. Please head toward Helmut's subjugation without reserve. Surely it will be easy for you two to breakthrough the encirclement with your strength.」



Hajime turned only his gaze toward her across his shoulder.



「You are going to have a decisive battle here?」



「No. Only I and Kuwaibel will go under Gregor.」



Screams were suddenly raised. The Crow siblings, Sabas, Bovid and the others combatant, and all the other top brasses unanimously called at her to stop. They didn't wish to have a long life so much that they would sacrifice the queen and the monarch dragon. They insisted that such way of living that knew no shame wouldn't save anyone!



「I'm not giving up. Even if it's only a faint hope, even if it's a thorny path, as long as we are still alive then there is still hope. Furthermore, if Hajime-sama and Tio-sama are going to kindly subjugate Helmut for us, there might be a chance for us to make a comeback by making use of the resulting chaos. Right now, right now we have to live!」



Roze dignifiedly ordered to the top brasses, and also toward the people of Avenst who were starting to show up on the deck because they were awoken by the first cannon attack. Seeing the piercing light in those eyes even in this edge of despair made them comprehended, that indeed, there was definitely no color of resignation there. What was there was merely an earnestly firm resolve and nothing else.



This time everyone but Roze was at loss for words. They instinctively knew that the decision of the queen couldn't be overturned just by their words. Her command to them to live for now pierced their chest.



The lips of Hajime who was watching at them like that across his shoulder, it warped slightly. That was the form of a small smile.



When he looked beside him, Tio was making a really gentle expression that was filled with affection. That figure who wouldn't give up until the last moment even when she understood that it was a hellish path――was really beautiful.



Hajime shrugged his shoulders. And then, he asked about something that he had already understood since the time the fleet appeared from inside the dawn.



『Oi, Grugor. To say the truth, I'm actually unrelated with this woman and Avenst. Do you feel like overlooking us two?』



『……』



It seemed that he didn't have any intention to answer. He must had washed his hands already from Hajime. He didn't care what would happen to Hajime after this even if Hajime ended up all but dead, as long as he was still alive in the end and he could be experimented on through something like torture to search for the secret of his strength. His intention against Tio should also be the same.



……Surely, he wasn't sulking or anything because his name was mistaken so naturally just now, yes, there was no way it was so.



Hajime who took the silence to meant no felt Tio making an expression that looked itchy as though she was holding down the emotion welling up inside her while he took a deep breath――



『Cough-. Aa~, informing the criminals who are abducting and confining the innocent dragon hostage~. Release all of them right no~~~~w! Your mother in the countryside is crying you knowww!』



At once Hajime felt gazes piercing him from behind that were asking「This guy, just what is he saying?」. At the same time, that kind of atmosphere was also transmitted toward him from the fleet somehow.



But, Hajime-san didn't pay any attention to everyone's bewilderment and began to dash leaving everyone behind. Because, that was Hajime Quality after all!



『All of you, don't have the right to request a lawyer! You also don't have any ground to plead for any extenuating circumstance! But, I'll allow your right to keep silent! If you let go of the dragon hostage, and then stay sil~lent and return home, I'll be merciful and won't shoot from behind! Now, this is a chance of a lifetime for you to avoid death penalty you know! Who cares about Beroder! Kidnapper gentlemen! Just scurry back home with all your strength without fea~~r!』



What he was saying was already absurd. Also, even the name of the king-sama that he said was absurdly mangled.



『Are you listening, this is a warning! If you don't release the dragons right now, I'm telling you it will be re~~ally terrible for you all okay! Just ignore what Hageter is telling you to do! I'm not lying y'know? It will be a cold day in hell before I'm lyi――』



A bombardment from the flagship Durgrant! Surely it was the payback for the name calling that was totally wrong already except the letter「r」.



Roze called in panic at Hajime who blocked that with his barrier.



「Hajime-sama!? Just what in the world are you planning!? Why are you provoking them like that-」



「Either way, it was already too late by the time we hadn't departed from here when that fleet arrived. Surely they won't overlook us anymore now. Of course, it's possible for us to escape right away but……」



It was impossible for Hajime to show his back toward people who were attacking him hostilely. Of course it didn't change even now that should be Roze and others should be the one fighting. That was why, at present Hajime had no intention to make a move directly.



Then, why……Roze who was asking that was replied by Hajime with a grin.



「In this world, there are fellows who should also fight other than queen-san and co right? The fellows who ought to burn their soul betting their survival and dignity on the line.」



「Eh?」



Hajime averted his gaze from the bewildered Roze and gazed at Tio.



「Tio. Won't you show to your junior this rug rat dragon, the real king of dragon?」



「Kufufuh. Actually the screams of the dragons hath been clinging into mine ear and it wouldst not go away since some time ago. Even if Goshujin-sama decide to leave this place, I'm planning to do it. But, I believe with mine all that Goshujin-sama wouldst surely meet mine expectation in this kind of time.」



Tio's lips warped happily yet ferociously. Her pupils split vertically and they had already turned into dragon eyes. It seemed the meaningless torture to the dragons made her stomach boiled up much.



Hajime showed a similarly ferocious smile and then he sent telepathy to Gregor with a tone that sounded a bit serious.



『Mensor. You know that we possess unknown power, you know that we already sink a mother ship of your country without it being able to do anything, and yet even knowing all that, you don't feel like stopping huh?』



『……Indeed, the power of you bastard is of unknown quantity. But, exactly because of that there is worth in stealing it. I'm someone who steal. There is a first rate treasure before my eyes while I'm able to wield my maximum strength, no way I'm gonna stop don't you think? As long as there is even a percent chance of victory, I'll always go to steal what I want. This time is the same.』



『I see. So you also have something unshakeable inside you in your own way. ……But, hey self-proclaimed god, you are mistaking one thing yeah.』



『What?』



The bombardment from the flagship Durgrant ceased. Right after that, Hajime and Tio leaped up from the deck.



Hajime and Tio who jumped to the sky nestled close to each other midair and hovered still.



And then, both of them stared at each other from really close range it looked like they would kiss anytime, and like that……



*bachikon-*



「Ahahn」



Hajime's spanking burst on Tio's butt. Seeing how there was a crimson ripple spreading from that, it seemed that the spanking was accompanied with "Magic Shockwave". Even though there was almost no damage from that, but the masterful slap that sent numbing pleasure(pain) running through the whole body until the deepest core caused hopeless dragon-san to reflexively got on all fours. Even though she was midair but it was done skillfully.



「Come on, do your best, hopeless dragon. Even though you are the princess of the dragon race, but you pervert is gasping in front of this large army.」



「I, I'm gasping, because of Goshujin-sama's fault……」



*bachikon-*



「Ahiih. Just now, it reached amazing place-」



「Even though you are the pervert, what are you doing blaming other huh?」



After saying that it was one more spanking. Tio's large butt undulated from the impact. It was accompanied with a bewitching voice that resounded once more, through the whole airspace.



Of course, everyone of Avenst, and everyone of the divine country's large fleet, and also that Gregor-san, everyone of them without exception was shocked「Just what the hell these people are starting so suddenlyyy!?」so much their eyes almost popped out from their socket.



Hajime was building a world of only the two of them that was different from the one with Yue while he mercilessly kept spanking Tio's butt. And then he took out a test tube vial from his pocket and took off the cap using his mouth. Next, he plunged it into Tio's mouth that was opened gaspingly.



「Nnguu!?」



Tio who suddenly got something plunged into her mouth, and furthermore liquid was flowing in from that, coupled with the butt spanking it caused her expression to change into a terribly joyous one! What a pervert! As expected from the hopeless dragon!



Gregor who finally returned to reality around that point gave out his order. He didn't understand what was going on, but for the time being he was going to shower them with bombardment. The main cannon of several mother ships were aimed toward Hajime and Tio.



「Nnmuu!? It came-! It came, Goshujin-samaaa-! As expected, the conversion rate from personal reward of Goshujin-sama art in different level! Just like Yue's blood pledge contract, this art truly the master and servant contract that art build on love!」



「No way. If this thing is going to get a skill name, then it will absolutely be something like pervert contract, or SM contract, something like that.」



Tio who were breathing 'haa haa' roughly on all fours with expression of ecstasy yelled with a voice that was oozing with excitement. And then, she was standing up unsteadily while fidgeting before she received a necklace with red jewel attached from Hajime.



「Is it okay without transforming into dragon?」



「Fufun, haa haa, don't look down on me. Haa haa, nnnh. This art different from the battle in Holy Precincts where I hath to do it without any rehearsal. Afuuu……I hath trained diligently and mine skill was further polished then before. Haa haa……to say nothing, of how I hath received reward personally from Goshujin-sama now. For the current me, nothing art impossible!」



「Hm, is that so.」



Hajime's indifferent reply cause Tio to tremble from feeling shivers.



And then, now, just when the main cannons were in the verge of firing, she bent greatly backward while taking a deep breath……



GURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-



She let out a dragon howl with human body. Still with an extremely disgusting smile as though she was going to throw out all the pleasure in one go.



The howl radiated, however, it wasn't a mere yell. The howl turned into black colored ripples with Tio as the center and it rushed through the airspace. The black ripples that undulated repeatedly, over and over again, they ignored the barrier and passed through the fleet.



Was it an unknown attack……. But look there, that woman's smile. It wasn't normal!



The fleet's main cannons cautiously stopped in the stage of firing preparation completed.



Right after that, pulsation resounded in the world.



*Thump-*



*Thump-*



*Thump-*



It wasn't just one or two. There were innumerable pulses that couldn't be counted. It was as though the world itself was going to wake up, and then there was bizarre yet overwhelming presence, presence, presence-!!



――Now, awaken. O mine brethrens. O proud, powerful existences.



A voice that resembled telepathy, and yet was vaguely different somehow was coming down.



――The eyes of dragon, art not something for the sake of expressing grief. They art there for the flame of conviction to dwell inside



『Your majesty-. The full, no, the dragons-』



『This is, the second mother ship Ambition! Strangeness is occurring in the fuel bunker! Those guys, just what in the world is going on!?』



A solemn and dignified voice resounded in Gregor's ears, at the same time there were also screamed reports coming one after another. Every one of those reports were conveying about the strangeness of the fuel in each ship.



――The claws of dragon, art not something for hugging tight the trembling self. They art there in order to tear apart malice, and protect what ought to be protected.



『Eighth mother ship Granada! The dragons, they are getting dyed! Something is happening!?』



『This is the tenth mother ship Fudelta-. The dragons are enlarging here! At this rate the cages will be broken! Your majesty, your order please-』



『Reporting-. The dragons that are dyed black are spewing out heat energy from their mouth! Shit-, the fuel bunker is destroyed-』



The report didn't come only from the fleet. A screaming report and panicked yell asking for instruction were also coming from the fuel bunker of flagship Durgrant. Furthermore, there was a thunderous sound booming and the tremor from that was transmitted until the flagship where Gregor was at.



「What is happening!?」



「-. The restrain of the dragon that is let out from the cage for torture is destroyed! It's rampaging and killing the crews!」



「Impossible. That restriction is for anti-dragon use that is equipped with Synthesizer! Why didn't it activate!?」



「It's activating! Other than the one in the restriction tool, the crews are also activating theirs! But it's not working against the black dragon!」



「What the hell happened-. Aargh, broadcast this to all ships too! Kill all the dragons that are turning strange. Kill them right away!」



The moment the order was given, killing weapon was aimed toward the dragons who were continuously pulsating inside the fuel bunkers. The dragons who were still bewildered at the change that was happening to them saw those gun muzzles and the menacing crews. They were shrinking back in fear.



――The fangs of dragon, art not something to be gritted in front of death. They art there in order to crunch thy own weakness into pieces, and display the soul of struggle tempered with reasoning.



The dragons who were going to huddle into themselves suddenly stopped still. That change caused the crews who were readying their weapon to stop moving for a moment in suspicion. They stopped completely.



「Gururururuh」



Countless low growls were echoing. The dragons who were dyed jet black and grew up to adulthood regardless of their former size slowly raised their head that was lowered as though begging for forgiveness before this.



「Hih」



「U, a」



Several crews raised a short scream. Those were undoubtedly voices of terror. Their eyes met. With the dragons who raised their face. They were pierced by those dragon eyes that were filled with fighting spirit and soul of conviction.



――Raise the howl! The dragon's howl! Demonstrate to the world, of thy existence! Lift up highly, thy proud soul! All of thee――art the dragons!



Instantly, countless howls shook the world and spread through the sky.



It caused a hallucination that perhaps the whole fleet might rupture from the inside, from these furiously grand dragon howls!



Just from that, the eardrums of the nearby crews were damaged, and among them there were even people who lost consciousness with the white of their eyes exposed.



――Soul - Metamorphosis - Sublimation Composite magic 【Black God Dragon's Authority】



Once in the Holy Precincts Tio used【Dragon King's Authority】. It was an age of god magic that transformed other creature into black dragon. Before, she could only change the target one by one by using black slavery whip in conjunction.



But right now, although there was the requirements that she needed to be in a state that had stocked up power from using Pain Conversion, and also the targets needed to be creature that was close to dragon, but she was able to transform all the dragons within range into black dragons that possessed tough black scale with one roar. Furthermore, by using an arrangement of【Divine Statement】――【God Dragon's Word Soul】, it could also awaken the dragon instinct.



Yes, by Tio's power, all the dragons who were confined by the fleet in great amount as fuel――were transformed into gallant black dragons!



As the result,



*DOGOOOOOOOOO*



Countless explosive sounds reverberated. The cause was one. The "breath attack" that became usable after the black dragon transformation exploded inside all the airships.



『It's no good-. We cannot hold them ba-gyaah』



『Shit-. What's with that scale!? The bullet cannot go throuugh-』



The reports were gradually turning into mere screams. And then, the fired breaths smashed the internal walls, the black dragons that were surging out from the cage were trampling down the ship's inside, and they finally flew outside.



Like ashes that were whirling up from the stirring winds, the dragons went home to the sky one after another from the external walls that were melted by the flashes of the breath attack.



Even just a single mother ship would confine dragons in number that easily surpassed a hundred. The number of the black dragons that were flying out was uncommon.



『Fire-! It's convenient if they are going out by themselves! They are coming out so shoot them down!』



Gregor's instruction was transmitted. The heavy weapons on board the ships immediately spewed fire.



The bullets were approaching like falling stars toward the crowd of black dragons that flew out to the sky. But, another dragon that flew out first cut into that firing line. It spread out its wings and used its body as shield to cover its comrades!



The black scales it inherited from its parent weren't something that could easily get pierced by the heavy weapon. But, even so if it was asked whether it could come out unscathed, then the answer was no. Its black scales were smashed and scattered each time bullets hit it, and finally the bullets gouged its body and blood and flesh were scattered.



But, the black dragon who turned its body into shield for its comrades' sake didn't waver even with death before its eyes. Its merely, with the will of fighting till the end, the will to protect its comrades, it even fired its last breath attack just from those wills.



It was a small breath that was already powerless, however it splendidly destroyed one of the ship's weapons. At the same time, the hole-riddled black dragon vomited blood while losing strength.



But, thanks to that sacrifice, several dozen black dragons were able to fly out to the sky from the hole without getting sniped.



――Flap thy wings, o noble child. Blessing to that soul



A grand howl reverberated. The ripples that were spreading once more in the sky enveloped the black dragons that were falling powerlessly.



At the next moment, the black dragons that were definitely wounded all over their body flapped their dragon wings strongly. They rearranged their posture midair and then looked down at their own body with puzzled feeling. There they witnessed the sight of their wound gone already with their black scales regenerating swiftly.



The cause of that? That was obvious. It was their mother that awakened them as "dragon".



The gaze of the black dragons caught sight of the great existence that was standing in air with human form. That figure was going 'haa haa' somehow though.



「KUWAAAAAAAH」



「GAAAAAAAAAAH」



「GURYAAAAAAH」



There was only one meaning of the howls echoing through the sky.



――Gather. Toward the great dragon who was going 'haa haa'.



The black dragons simultaneously started flying toward the center of the battlefield. Naturally, bullets and missiles were coming at them from behind, but several black dragons were constantly covering their comrades at the rear, in that chance they would roll and fired their breath to intercept. And then, the wounded black dragons would have their body healed when a soul-stirring howl echoed and they would return to battle.



「What……sight……」



That was Roze's whisper. Kuwaibel who was within her embrace was unmoving with his gaze fixed forward unblinking as though to burn everything into his eyes. And then, the people of Avenst were also looking still at the sky in a daze without moving. But, just from looking at their expression it could be understood that their emotions were completely the same like Roze.



――A tornado made from great number of black dragons.



With Tio at the center, the black dragons circling around her were creating a sight that had never been seen before in this world.



The light of the sun that was showing out its face completely was reflected glitteringly on the scales of the black dragons. It was as though black diamonds that were perfectly cut by artisan's hand were dancing while reflecting the light at random.



What a truly grandeur, sublime, and beautiful sight.



Amidst the rising up emotions that jolted the soul of the humans of the fleet, Tio's words were directed toward the king of pillage.



『Thou the so called god king that rule the sky. No more tedios talk art necessary. ――Open wide thy eyes. Witness, what kind of existence dragon art. The true meaning of ruling the sky!』



『-. Who cares-. Fire-. Don't get absent-minded! I permit lethal attack! Aim all weapons at them! Flagship, turn around-. Whole fleet, cover for Durgrant's retreat! I'll kill the whole family of anyone who disobey!』



A command to kill resounded. There was also a resolute retreat command at the same time. However, it was only for himself who was the king. The long rule of terror didn't allow anyone to disobey his words even when they understood that they were obviously in an ugly situation.



The flagship Durgrant turned around, at the same time the whole fleet launched simultaneous attack. There were silver bombardments and also missiles attack. All those that were fired from all direction were like a cage that was made from firing lines.



「Thinking again, this is the first time I'm going to see it live huh. I'm looking forward to it.」



「Fufu, I'll answer that expectation. ――"Limit Break"」



The necklace that was handed to her before this――"Last Zell".



With the combined effects of the artifact that brought about Limit Break, and the Cheatmate II (Uma○bo walleye pollack roe flavor, drink version) she drank just now, the finishing move of Tio Claus that originally couldn't be activated without getting damages all over her body was now activated!



*GOU-* The wind roared. Storm of magic power where crimson and jet black mixed. It spiraled up and pierced the sky, with size so big that it enveloped the tornado of the black dragons from further outside. The sea of clouds twisted and whirled like a typhoon.



The flooding silver bombardments and also the swarm of missiles got rolled up and jumbled together where not even a single one went through the storm. The overwhelming torrent of power turned anything and everything powerless!



The light of sun was vanishing.



The sky above the sea of clouds was getting covered further.



「Aa, as I thought, your great self is……」



A true dragon manipulated even the heaven and earth. It was the legend that was taught to her. And now, it was occurring right before her eyes. Roze was trickling tears naturally. Was she deeply moved? Was she scared? Roze, and also the people of Avenst who were similarly shedding tears didn't really understand. However, there was something pressing on their chest.



Thunderbolts and bursting sounds overran the world.



What was generated at the sky further above the sea of clouds, was a sea of lightning and flame. Lightning was flickering like prominence in the flame sea of sky that was spreading as though to burn the world to ash.



The tornado of crimson and jet black dispersed. The black dragons that were left behind were merely looking up to the sky. It was as though they were worshipping the existence there.



*slither* Something was protruding out from the sea of lightning and flame. It was a part of a long torso. Jet black scales that seemed to suck in the light could be seen. It was undulating, emerging out from the sea of lightning flame with top and bottom reversed, it vanished, and then emerged out once more.



On the whole, it wasn't a body of dragon, whether in size or shape. But, all existences in this airspace understood.



――That thing which was beyond human understanding was……a dragon



*zuzuzu-*, It made a sound that was like a rumble in the ground and the existence that was swimming in the sea of lightning flame showed its appearance.



It appeared with skin of flame while clad in tremendous sparks. The golden dragon eyes that were split vertically in the middle were glaring at everything in the lower world.



The giant body that easily surpassed three hundred meter long was coiling and the surrounding was colored by flashes of lightning and prominences.



A beat.



――GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!!



For a moment, everyone hallucinated whether the world was burst open. Because of the howl that was like an explosive sound……wasn't the cause.



『The god……that control……the sky……』



Yes, it was truly the heaven's might. Just a single howl caused everyone to feel the will of judgment that seemed to break the world.



Without any distinction of ally or enemy, this was an existence that would make all existence to feel awe.



――Black god dragon Tio Claus



Manifested here.



Something like the chance of victory for the fleet, there was no way they even had a percent of it.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



※Dragon + Hostage = Dragon hostage (coined words) (TN: In Japan, hostage is read 'hitojichi'. Hito=person, jichi=collateral. In this chapter the author used made up words of 'ryuujichi' or dragon hostage.)



A lot of people pointed that out, so I wrote it just in case. I'm sorry that it was hard to understand.



I was late this time too. Really forgive me.



And so, the plan for the next chapter, if possible it will be at 6 P.M. Saturday, or perhaps at 0 A.M Sunday, if I cannot make it even then, then it will be at 6 P.M Sunday. Please treat me well.





Chapter 240




AN: Sorry it's late.



Sea of lightning flame in the sky. Sea of clouds of death whirling below.



It could be seen as the sight of the end of the world, or perhaps as the sight of the creation of the world. Surely the impression would differ depending on the person.



But, in any case, there wasn't anyone who doubted that this was a scene of legend that would be engraved into the history of this world.



――Where art thou going?



The solemn soul of language came from the sky. All the people who heard it would be made to hold awe whether they wanted it or not by that voice.



That voice was directed toward the flagship that was trying to escape first by making the whole fleet into sacrificial pawn. No, more accurately, it was toward the master of flagship Durgrant that gave the order――the god king of pillage Gregor.



Even that person himself must understand that the question was directed to him. Inside the bridge of flagship Durgrant that was already turning around and moved to escape, Gregor who was watching dumbfounded at the absurd sight behind the ship through the display twitched and trembled.



『Don't listen-. Full speed――』



Gregor yelled in panic toward the helmsman with shaken eyes. However, he was unable to speak his order until the end.



――O false king, know shame



『Yo, your majesty-』



『-, dodge!』



A scream came from the helmsman. Because suddenly a giant tornado descended from the sea of lightning flame. The tornado of scorching heat that burn the air with hell fire and heat wave spiraled and dyed the inside of the bridge with brilliant light.



The helmsman reflexively tilted the ship faster than Gregor's command to dodge. The flagship Durgrant veered right away to the right with a motion that didn't suit that giant frame.



――Thou couldst not escape



Along with those words, the second blazing tornado descended. It didn't stop there, as though to invite despair toward the flagship Durgrant that was tyring to slip through somehow, the third, fourth, fifth tornado descended.



『-, impossible to dodge! It's coming!』



『Barrier full strength! Breakthrough-』



The loud yells of the helmsman and Gregor echoed.



Flagship Durgrant tried to slip through the countless flame pillars that were connecting heaven and earth, but it finally couldn't evade and came into contact.



Instantly, the giant body of flagship Durgrant was attacked by fierce vibration. The posture control system didn't work and the ship's bow was lifted up as though it got hoisted, the ship was rotating uncontrollably. In addition, there were even consecutive impacts that followed. The thunderbolts that were generated inside the tornado were assaulting the ship.



The crew who was in charge of the silver barrier control saw how the ship's energy was consumed with frightening speed and he raised his voice with pale expression.



『The barrier output-, it decreased by fifty percent! Your majesty-, at this rate-』



『Chih, start replenish……shit-』



Gregor unconsciously cursed when he was about to give instruction. In order to maintain the barrier's output, they needed to exchange the pod of dragon core fuel, but he remembered that there were no more dragon for that.



『Turn around……turn the ship around! At the same time, fire at full power toward that black dragon!』



They couldn't retreat.



Gregor who made that judgment then ordered to turn the ship around while feeling indescribable rage and unease.



At the same time, the weapons loaded on board the flagship Durgrant fired simultaneously. Missiles in the amount that was absurd to be counted, storm of bullets that should be called as a wall already, and naturally the silver bombardment too.



Of course――all those were shot down. Anything and everything, without a single exception. By several hundred, several thousand lightning showering from the sky.



While flagship Durgrant was retreating, the other fleets were naturally joining in offense using their full power to push back Tio. Yet regardless of that, Gregor was unable to even retreat.



The reason of that was this.



From all directions. In the range diameter of several dozen kilometer. Sniping of roaring lightning was shooting out every target under the heaven simultaneously and swiftly.



The world that was covered with the sea of lightning flame was literally the absolute territory of the black god dragon.



『Charge the Henkhaborg-. All fleets, buy us time!』



The fact that their attack didn't reach caused Gregor's voice to turn increasingly disarrayed. Even so, all the fleets reflexively obeyed the words of the king who symbolized terror and violence.



The barrier fleet form multi-layered formation to protect the flagship Durgrant, the other fleets aimed their maximum firepower without pause from all directions, sky battlecraft squads were unleashing attacks suicidally.



At the same time, flagship Durgrant's multi-column 3-turret cannon was focusing silver light with terrific momentum. However, that light was something mixed with black color like what mother ship Ostinato showed in the end, so it was obviously different in aspect with the normal bombardment.



――Main cannon Henkhaborg



It was a silver bombardment that took in the property of the black rain to become an abominable energy wave. The bombardment that focused and mixed the impure energy that filled this world, when it hit the target, even if the ship's frame itself was protected by the barrier, the energy that caused necrosis to the cells would encroach inside the ship and annihilated the crews.



Of course, after it was fired, highly polluted energy would get scattered at the surrounding area, so one's own army also would not escape the effect. It was a forbidden weapon that was hard to use, it bared its fang not just to enemy and ally, but even to the world.



And now, it was fired.



A flash shined and filled up the burning world completely.



It didn't matter even if it was against existence that had veered really far from the beaten track, as long as it was still a living thing, it should be possible for it to experience cell necrosis. And then, as long as they could just succeed in eroding its body, the would be able to kill it for sure!



A twitching smile emerged on Gregor's lips.



――Fool



It was fired in no time.



The black god dragon's――breath!



The flash that was fired from the jaw that was opened wide was pure black. It was an absolute color that wasn't polluted by anyone, painting over everything.



The bombardment of silver and black that exemplified taboo was certainly mighty, it could pulverize even a mother ship in a single shot. But, the breath that was fired from the black god dragon far surpassed it. The difference in power was overwhelming, like a needle that was thrust to intercept a log.



*GOU-* When the atmosphere growled, this world's strongest bombardment was easily swallowed by the black breath after a moment of resistance.



『Impossible-』



Gregor's yell echoed.



But, the scene before his eyes was a definite fact. The strongest attack of flagship Durgrant was swallowed right from the front, and it didn't stop there, it was getting annihilated along with the negative energy by the aberrantly scorching heat.



The first layer of the multi-layered barrier that was deployed by the barrier fleet was smashed open like a paper waste. The second layer was also breached like scattering glass after a moment of resistance. The third layer, the fourth layer……



『Dodge-』



『Ro, roger!』



At the same time with the barrier's pulverization, several ships of the barrier fleet were hit by the breath and they exploded everywhere. Gregor recovered his sanity seeing the figure of the defensive ships going up in flame and he gave his command, and then the helmsman who similarly managed to go back to reality steered the ship with miraculous reflex.



When flagship Durgrant rotated, the last barrier was broken through at the same time.



『All hands-, brace for impa――』



The yell that was raised by someone couldn't be finished until the end.



Right after that, a terrific impact attacked flagship Durgrant. Thunderous sound and fierce alert sound rang.



The breath Tio released didn't stop and opened up a large hole in the whirling sea of clouds and vanished toward the ground. No one had the leisure to observe where it landed, but if they could actually do that, surely they would experience the feeling of a block of ice thrown on their spine without doubt.



After all, the place that was impacted by the breath that descended from the sky――a mountain with elevation around two kilometer was hit directly and it got blasted away spotlessly.



It was the breath of a god dragon that changed the geography.



Flagship Durgrant got hit by that, however, it still wasn't sinking. Its mobility that didn't suit its large built and the great reaction of the helmsman saved them, that they got away with only its main cannon part wholly gouged out.



Although, the figure of the flagship tilting diagonally while on fire and smoking was giving a shock to the whole fleets as though it had been sunken down.



The captains of the fleet were staring dumbfounded without giving any order at the symbol of despair the flagship getting cornered, as though time had stopped. The attack of the fleet also stopped and naturally the sky battlecraft squadrons were also staring at the flagship with their eyes opened wide.



There was no way Tio would overlook that opening.



――O proud warriors. Flap thy wings. Raise thy howl. Drive into the heart of these invaders who acted as though they owned the sky, just whose territory this place art



Those who answered was naturally the black dragons who were protected from the all-directions fleet attack. The dragon howls that shook the soul resounded through the blazing sky.



It was too late even when the enemy returned to their senses in shock.



The pilots of sky battlecrafts that were staring at the flagship Durgrant while circling saw the opened large mouth and fangs of dragon through their cockpit at the next moment――right after that, they were swallowed by scorching heat breath and vanished.



The other sky battlecraft squadrons also got their back taken instantly and they exploded due to the black dragons' breath, others got hit by the tackle of the falling black dragon and they got crushed along with their cockpit.



The airships and mother ships resumed their attack.



However, the current black dragons didn't let go of the opening of the paused barrage.



The last sight that a male captain who was sitting on the command seat inside the bridge saw, was the scene of a black dragon swooping down while flapping its wings in a big way, its large mouth opened across the windbreak. Right after that, his consciousness was expulsed into the perpetual darkness along with the black flash that blanketed his field of vision.



Black dragons were clinging on a mother ship. They were outside the firing range because they were too close. The sky battlecrafts who originally should be playing active role so this kind of situation didn't occur were unable to protect their ship due to another dragons attacking them with clever cooperation and suicidal resolve.



Like that, with deadly attack toward the bridge, the black dragons were sinking the fleets one after another.



Even in that battlefield that presented a chaotic situation, there were also tough ships that were defeating the black dragons using skilled maneuver, but the black dragons that should be shot down already were revived as though nothing happened at the next moment and attacked again.



Of course, there were black dragons who got hit by main cannon class attack and they were exterminated without reviving back. There were also those that were falling in tailspin and vanish into the sea of clouds without the revival making it in time.



But, however……



『These guys……don't they have any fear?』



A captain of a certain mother ship whispered.



Immediately after that, a black dragon on the verge of death whose wings were turned into tatters and its dragons scales smashed, even so its fighting spirit wasn't dulled even by a fragment, it was howling as though to burn its life into ash and charged toward the bridge. And then, it destroyed the bridge with its breath!



They didn't have anything like fear. If they had fear, then it would be fear toward death without even fighting, living with their soul rotting.



『Shit-. Why, are they not stopping-』



The captain of a certain airship screamed.



A black dragon received all attacks with its body while protecting a comrade behind it, even so it advanced forward without stopping. Even when half its body was blown away from a missile's direct hit, the strength dwelling inside those dragon eyes didn't waver in the slightest.



It definitely, delivered its comrade toward the enemy's location! Of course, the breath of the protected black dragon blew away the bridge.



They wouldn't stand still anymore for the second time. Because this was the sky. This was their territory.



Therefore, they were outdoing their opposition.



They were outdoing their greatest enemy. And above all else――their past self!



「Aa……really, what a sight this is……」



The voice that was blurred with the overflowing feeling came from the descendant of the country that loved dragon, and swore to live together with dragon――Roze Phiris Avenst's.



Their greatest friends who were oppressed, their dignity trampled down, even their right to live stolen, now they were reborn once more. She had no words. Roze didn't understand any way to express this emotion inside her.



However, the one thing that she understood was――



「Piih, piiiiiih」



And the last monarch dragon――Kuwaibel also felt the same like that. The heroic and grand battle of his brethrens, with their existence staked on the line caused a roar to leak out naturally. He dreamed it, longed for it. They floundered, to make it reality. And then, the sight of the future that they ought to struggle to arrive at, was right here right now.



He didn't know his mother and also his mother. He also had no sibling. When he was born, there was only the human girl who was his partner before his eyes. He didn't think that he was lonely. However, actually he was wishing from his heart from brethrens that would fight together with him.



That was why, their awakened figures made Kuwaibel's young soul trembled. He wondered what should he do to express that overflowing feeling……



But, there was only one thing that he understood……



『Do you want to fight?』



「-」



「Pih!?」



A question suddenly resounded.



Roze and Kuwaibel turned their face together at that voice's owner.



The silhouette standing above the coiling black god dragon. There was no need to ask, it was Hajime. There was a lot of distance between them, but they understood that Hajime was turning his face toward Roze and Kuwaibel.



The reply of the two was concise.



『Yes.』



「Pii.」



Yes, they wanted to fight.



With dignity, betting their right to live. In order to proof, that the flag they hoisted up was indeed right.



They wanted to stand shoulder to shoulder with their brethrens that were demonstrating a fierce battle. So that they could call themselves their "friend", their "king" with their head held high.



Roze and Kuwaibel looked behind. Over there, they saw the figure of Avenst's people clenching their fist staring hard at the battlefield. Everyone saw the figure of their fighting friend, their will to fight 'We cannot just remain a spectator in this kind of place!' seething inside.



Hajime who made a small smile toward such them was,



『Queen-san. I'll ask one thing, for fleets that big to depart for here, doesn't that mean that the battle strength in their country right now is relatively few?』



『Eh? That's, certainly……most likely, there is only a defense fleet that excelled in defensive battle remaining there I think.』



Even though the sudden question caused Roze to be taken aback, she answered like that after pondering for a bit. Hajime's expression distorted fearlessly.



『This battlefield is the battlefield of this world's dragons. Perhaps it's also fine for you to join the battle as friend, and as king but……in this battlefield there is Tio, the black god dragon. And then, there are the "awakened" dragons who obtained the divine protection of the god dragon. Then, defeat is impossible even in one in a million chance.』



『But-, while that may be true, to remain a spectator in this battle that be our existence――』



『That's why, I'm saying to use this chance to overthrow the divine country.』



『I don't really understand what are you saying.』



Roze reflexively returned a reply that sounded joking to those words that sounded like a joke. Kuwaibel and other people were also making a bemused expression thinking「Just what is this person saying?」toward the content of the telepathy that they hear.



Hajime's expression suddenly turned serious toward them all.



『Roze Phiris Avenst. Right here is surely the turning point. Even after they lost their king and their battle strength plummet rock bottom, if the divine country hardened their defense when they grasped that information, will you be able to defeat them then? Just with those two airships and few sky battlecraft pilots?』



『That's……』



『In a battlefield, to be separated from those important to you, to leave them to face formidable enemy……such things will be accompanied by terrible pain. But, did such brittle relationship that couldn't do that exist between the human and dragon of the dragon kingdom of the past?』



Even if their body was separated, but their heart was always beside each other. Sometimes they were separated by heaven and earth and advanced for the sake of their purpose. That was the bond between human and dragon in the dragon kingdom of the past.



『Right now they have Tio's divine protection, they are able to display the greatest strength as black dragon. But, later after we leave, the infinite regeneration and also the enormous magic power will be gone. Even if the black dragons cooperate with you all to retake the kingdom, the obstacle you have to overcome will be great.』



『……』



Hajime asked the wordless Roze.



『Don't you all, have your own battlefield?』



Once in the battle in Holy Precincts, Hajime left behind his comrades in the battlefield and advanced forward. It was done under a definite bond. That was why his words now was conveyed to Roze with a definite weight.



『……But, the distance from here until Qwailent――』



『If you wish, then I'll open the door. It's a little bit of present from the instigator. ――Now, what will you do, queen of a ruined country?』



In a sense, this battlefield was ideal. There were the awakened dragons, there was the supreme ruler of the sky, and there was the divine protection from such being. If they fought together, Roze and others would be able to clear up the pent-up resentment of the many years almost unharmed.



But, indeed it was just like Hajime said, even with only the black dragons there wouldn't be any problem here. What's more, there wasn't any reason for Roze and others that they had to join the fight no matter what. It was nothing but the problem of emotion.



They didn't understand how Hajime would send them until the divine country, but if he said that he could then surely he was really able to do it. Roze was convinced of that.



And then, a surprise attack toward the divine country was certainly also their biggest effective chance to retake the kingdom.



However, there was no doubt that the danger would be far above this battlefield. Most likely, many of the soldiers gathered in this place right now would lose their life.



Roze shut her eyes.



The enemy's battle strength. This move to recover from their hopeless situation. The degree of damage. The chance of victory. The merit and demerit after they took a step forth. In case they didn't depart for battle here, the state of things in a world with cleared sky. The action prediction of the divine country that lost its main fleets……



「Your majesty.」



「Roze-sama.」



Roze came back to herself suddenly and she looked back. There, she saw the figures of Bovid and Sabas staring at her with a strong gaze. No, it wasn't just the two. The Crow siblings, the other top brasses, and then, all the people regardless of gender and age, they all were staring at Roze with a gaze that contained a flame that was even hotter than the sea of flame spreading in the sky.



(Aa, that's right. If it's resolve, then we already have it.)



Didn't they decide to fight already? Didn't they wish, that they want to fight?



Wasn't the will of dragon kingdom Avenst, displayed already?



Roze made a bitter smile at herself who was flinching back now when the time came for that. And then, right after that she declared loudly with definite dignity and resolve as the king of a country.



「People of dragon country Avenst. My beloved people. It looks like the time has come.」



The explosive sound of battlefield struck the eardrums. However, no matter how much noise resounded, their ears didn't fail to hear their queen's words.



「If we leave all the fight to our awakened friend and run away because we treasure our own life――our heart will die. Even if we plunge into this battlefield following our emotion――there won't be any significant meaning. To consider escape as battle, that escape is fighting just like what we have done until now in the cleared up world――that's something that our pride won't allow anymore. I'll say it one more time. ――The time has come.」



Breaths were held. Everyone corrected their posture and they stared straight at Roze.



「Resolve yourself. From here on, we will challenge a next to impossible battle.」



Let's rescue the friends of the dragon kingdom that are born merely to be exploited and killed. Let's liberate the people of the dragon kingdom that are captured and treated like slave. And then……



「We will make over the world. As the first step of that――let's take back our kingdom!」



The answer was naturally a soul-stirring war cry that wasn't outdone by the dragon howls.



At the same time with that war cry that sounded like it would blow away the thunderbolts and explosions, the top brasses were giving instructions one after another. Everyone was starting to move swiftly. In the middle of that, Roze turned her gaze toward Hajime.



『Hajime-sama. Please guide us. To the land of our longstanding desire.』



『Welcome to the battlefield. Queen-sama.』



Hajime who made a wide and villainous grin made his fingertip shined and took out an artifact. It was a sparkling key colored with mystical blue. A key that opened even a door that crossed over worlds――the Crystal Key.



Hajime threw it with just a movement of his finger tip. The crystal key flew while leaving behind trail of azure light and it pierced the space between Hajime and mother ship Avenst.



The crystal key that had been given improvement with gravity stone inserted in it rotated at the same time when Hajime twisted his wrist, as though it was unlocking something.



――*gakon-*



The sound of opened lock rang in the world.



Of course, it was an optional extra. The sound was meaningless, but Hajime was struck with the idea so it couldn't be helped. This too was also Hajime Quality!



Incidentally, previously the opened gate looked like shining membrane, but right now the gate looked like an impressive two-leaf door that appeared from thin air that was opening while making solemnly heavy sound *gogogo-*.



Of course, that was an optional extra! It was meaningless, but Hajime got carried up from excitement so it couldn't be helped! This too was also Hajime Quality!



By the way, the door was merely three-dimensional projection, so the size and also the design could be changed based on Hajime's current mood! It was his prided item that he made from a month of hard work combining the film technology of earth and magic of Tortus!



『……Hajime-sama. By any chance, are you someone that is affiliated with god?』



No, he was just an obsessive inventor desu. To the level that he would even forget eating and sleeping once he got absorbed into something, and he wouldn't stop until he got drained dry by the legal wife, or eating the suplex of the rabbit-eared wife.



『Go. May the luck of war be with you.』



『-. Thank you very much. ――I'll pray that someday, we will be able to meet once again in a world where the world, the people's heart, and also the dragons' soul are all cleared up.』



Roze bowed, and then she turned on her heel toward airship Rozeria in order to take command over the whole force.



『I feel a bit uneasy with only those children. ……Oho? Fumu, is that so. Very well, leave thy brethrens to me.』



Tio who was staying still above the sky to watch over the battle of the black dragons sent a sidelong glance at Roze and others. And then, several black dragons came back from the battlefield and soared toward airship Rozeria while sending their gaze at Tio.



It seemed they were conveying to Tio that they would follow them, so they asked her to take care of their brethrens.



『What an overprotective god dragon-sama.』



『What art thou saying? If Goshujin-sama say that, even thou were lending thy hand that thou open the gate.』



『Something like that doesn't count as lending hand. I was only sending those guys to hell.』



『The act just now art something necessary for them to be able to live proudly holding their head high in the future ahead. The act of instigating also count as lending hand. Fufu.』



While they were talking telepathically just between the two of them, airships Rozeria and Averia vanished inside the gate followed by the nation on ship Avenst.



……They passed through the impressive shining door that was created by the throwing tantrum Hajime「Just a bit more-. Just a bit more until it's finished-. That's why, I'll eat properly when it's finished okay!」even while having his cheeks stretched *munii* widely by Yue and his body locked by Shia's Cobra Twist.



『You bastard-, where are they going-? Just what the hell are you two!?』



An angry yell rose from the battlefield that had reached the one-way intensification. Gregor's voice that was filled with unease and confusion didn't have even a speck of its former dignity anymore.



『This kind of incomprehensible power-, suddenly appearing out of nowhere-. Don't screw with me-. How can something like this is allowed! Damn it-, damn ittt-. I am, the king of the divine country you know!?』



Gregor's yell complained to Hajime and Tio――or rather, it was closer to a soliloquy. The number of the ships was already decreased until half. They were unable to even replenish their dragon core energy. The energy output of the fleets that was declining didn't even have the spare energy to fire their main cannon anymore.



There was already no trace left from their majesty when they first appeared from the dawn.



That must be cornering Gregor's mind even further. He was continuously yelling things like『This kind of reality, this kind of absurdity, how can this be allowed-』.



Toward such him, Hajime said……



『You are weaker. That's all there is to it right?』



Gregor's clamor that was like a child throwing tantrum stopped still.



――Gregor Cluzet Qwailent was weaker.



Certainly, that was all there was to it.



The foundation of the king of pillage, was a conviction toward strength.



Whether it was violence or ingenuity, anything was fine. Anyone that could surpass their opponent would be able to make the other submit, trampled on them, or destroyed them. A person who could that was right, the words of the weak was nothing but nonsense.



The strong was right, the weak was wrong.



That was the thing that Gregor exactly believed in.



『……Is that so. So I'm the weaker one even after becoming the supreme ruler huh. Hahah, that's really a harsh joke yeah.』



Gregor raised a dry laugh that sounded somewhat comprehending.



There was no more defensive ship nearby, flagship Durgrant was also raising white smoke everywhere while tilting. There was no energy replenishment and the ship was in a state where maintaining its floating power was the best it could do. The great number of weapons the ship was equipped with were laying out barrage using physical attack like bullet and missile, because of that it still wasn't sunk down yet but……



『Yoo, tell me. Just what the hell you two are?』



That was likely Gregor's last question of his life.



Hajime showed a thinking gesture for a bit before he answered with a grin.



『Just a passing by monster.』



A black dragon finally slipped through the barrage even with wounds all over its body and arrived in front of the bridge's windbreak. It opened its jaw widely. Light of death converged inside there. The crews screamed and ran away.



Amidst that, Gregor threw his body on the commander seat and sat down heavily. He then rested his chin on one hand while, with a small voice,



「So I pull the utter failure at the very end huh. Good grief, what a joke.」



He whispered such thing.



The bridge of flagship Durgrant was destroyed. The sight of it falling down powerlessly was enough to dishearten the surviving ships.



The black dragons raised their howl toward they who couldn't even took satisfactory battle maneuver and got reduced into a disordered mob.



And then, the dragons threw their body into the last decisive battle.



It didn't take that much time until the whole of this world's greatest battle strength became a squall of wreckage showering down on the ground below.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



It was late but I posted it somehow.



Next month I should have more leeway and can post more……



Now then, it was raised up in the impression column, so I'll explain it for a bit.



For Shirakome,「」= the lizard like one. 「」= the snake like one.



When in god dragon mode Tio is snake-like, so the description letter is also「」. But, there is no concept of「」in this world, so I wrote「」in the conversation of this world's human. I'm sorry that it's puzzling.



By the way, Tio become「」shape when in god dragon mode is because――preference. Hajime's.



PS



I also wrote it in the activity report, but the comic version's latest chapter is in the middle of display at Overlap-sama's homepage.



Finally it's Yue-sama you know! Only at the end though! Please go there to take a look by all means.



Also, I'll report this just in case.



This month, light novel volume 5 and comic volume 1 will be released.



The special content information is also displayed in Overlap-sama's homepage, so if it it's fine please go take a look there.



My best regard.





Chapter 241




AN: Butler = The strongest warrior class. When I was writing this common sense, it became long again……



The sight that unfolded ahead after passing through the solemn door was a calm blue sky.



「This place……」



It was Roze who whispered that. Roze who returned on board the airship Rozeria passed through the sky door Hajime created along with airship Averia and mother ship Avenst. They had made their resolve for their battlefield that was waiting ahead.



Even so, when she thought back of the battlefield in between the sea of lighting flame and the whirling sea of clouds that should be called as a scene of myth, she fell into a doubt whether they were dreaming now that she saw this calm sky.



「Roze-sama-. Be, below, it's Qwailent! The distance is 1000!」



「Eh?」



The report from the person in charge of observation caused Roze to let out a dumbfounded voice. The sky that could be seen from the bridge was very transparent blue, the morning sun was rising slightly higher than the sea of clouds. Thinking what was this person saying in the middle of this peaceful sight, Roze turned her gaze toward the monitor that projected the image below the ship……



「I don't really understand what are you saying.」



She unconsciously muttered such thing. While making twitching face & dripping with cold sweats that looked like waterfall.



Of course she would be like that. Because below where airships Rozeria and Averia, and mother ship Avenst were floating, was the land of their birthplace that they couldn't even approach until now――sky divine country Qwailent, no, dragon kingdom Avenst's floating land was right there.



『Your majesty! Look sharp! Avenst is also coming here remember!』



「-」



A scolding came from Bovid who was boarding his sky battlecraft in the dock while standing by.



Roze who got taken aback and recovered herself from that gritted her teeth hard. At the same time inside her heart「Hajime-sama you idioo~~~~t. I'm the one who asked for guidance but-, to suddenly toss us out right above the target like this-, idiottt! Stupid-. You bruteee!」she was hurling abuse at Hajime grandly.



『Avenst, can you hear!? Evacuate right awa――』



Roze was about to command the commanding captain to evacuate mother ship Avenst that not only was unable to fire its main cannon, it couldn't even lay out barrier or perform battle maneuver. But, before she finished,



A loud alarm sound rang in the early morning sky. The alarm that could even make people indulging in laziness to jump awake in one go caused Roze's body to jump and trembled.



Inside her head, 'what to do, what to do, Hajime-sama you idiottt, what to do!' the same words and insult were repeating. Roze was about to fall into panic, but there, a scolding「Get a hold of yourself!」reached her from her partner.



Kuwaibel that was hugged tightly by Roze from an instinctive habit slapped his tail on Roze's cheek *pechi-*. When Roze dropped her gaze toward the partner that she was hugging, there Kuwaibel who if it had to be said had a pampered child trait was staring fixedly at her.



The unshakeable dragon eyes that were surprisingly deep were staring straight at Roze.



――Aa, that's right. If it's resolve, then I finished it already together with everyone.



Roze let out a long exhale 'fuu~~', then at the next moment she opened her eyes in a flash. And then, she firmly surveyed her comrades inside the bridge whose face was turning pale, and her comrades in Averia and Avenst through the monitors.



『Let's fight.』



Those words were calm, yet they possessed definite dignity and strength.



『In order to stand equal with our old friends who are fighting even now at that sky.』



Those were the words of the queen of the dragon kingdom.



『In order to save our imprisoned friends and brethrens.』



Those were the words of a person who even while her status fell into being air pirate and she lost her important comrades on countless occasions, by no meant she had abandoned the feeling of the halcyon days.



『In order to change the world.』



There weren't just combatants here. There were also civilians. Rather, the civilians were a lot more than the combatants. Normally this wasn't a place they should be taken to. But, surely the old and young, the men and women in mother ship Avenst wouldn't listen to that.



If Roze and others were lost, then they would have no future. Here was the turning point. A future where they would be welcoming a slow ruin while simply running away and getting toyed with, not a single descendant of the dragon kingdom wished that.



If not, then they wouldn't pass through that sky door.



That was why,



『Let's fight.』



There was one reply to that call of the queen. Only words of answer『By your will-』and resolute gazes.



A smile emerged on Roze's lips. That smile was the same fearless smile like that man who she thoroughly hurled abuse at until just now.



『We will take back everything! The battle of revolution is right here! Let's bet our body and soul! Sky battlecraft force, all planes take off-. Deal damage as much as you can to the defense fleet before they can move completely! Averia, concentrated fire at the defense fleet's flagship! Avenst, support fire using physical weapon from above!』



Orders came like a storm.



Like a butterfly that came out of its cocoon flying out all at once, sky battlecrafts were flying out from all ships. Their main force received severe damage from the previous attack and their number was decreased, but their number was a force that reached two hundred.



It was genuinely the greatest battle strength that the nation on ship Avenst possessed. There were also youngsters who hadn't finished their training among them, there were also old men who retired already. The planes used also didn't consist from just plane of good condition. There were also many planes with old armament.



But, the height of their fighting spirit was the real thing.



『All force, aim at the flagship of the defense fleet! Don't get left behind and fly into their bosom before they could lay out the defensive barrier! The barrier of the defense fleet is a tough one-. Consider yourself useless if you are outside the barrier once it's formed!』



The leader of first squad of air battle force and the overall commander Bovid gave his instruction. It was an extremely dangerous tactic where if the pilot was inexperience they would die right away from crashing. But, the barrier of the defense fleet here was even more powerful than the defense fleet before this. The barrier would be deployed about fifty meter from the ship. It wasn't something that could be destroyed by sky battlecraft's armament at all, they wouldn't even be able to approach then.



But conversely speaking, if they could approach within that fifty meter before the barrier was deployed, their attack would go through.



It was that kind of reckless tactic, however, there wasn't a single plane that was faltering. Rather, they were approaching with a momentum that would make anyone thinking they would even launch kamikaze attack without stopping toward the twenty ships of the defense fleet that were finally starting to from their anchored state.



「Roze-sama. Our preparation is finished.」



A voice came from Sabas who was standing by behind Roze. Roze nodded briskly. She showed a resolved fearless smile toward Sabas who could read her feeling. Sabas too also nodded with a gentle smile that was hiding beastly ferocity inside.



Roze surveyed inside the bridge.



「Everyone, I'll leave Rozeria in your hand. Please endure somehow until Kuwaibel come back.」



「Piih.」



The man who took charge of Rozeria in Roze's place――Carter Gilton nodded deeply accompanied with the strong nod of the other crews.



Behind Roze who turned on her heel, Sabas and the Crow siblings, and then ten of the most elite imperial guard members followed.



Their strategy was simple. The spring at the deepest part of the palace that could grant power to monarch dragon――【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】, they would take Kuwaibel there. And then with the strength of Kuwaibel who would temporarily awaken as a grown dragon they would crush the defense fleet.



If they could just destroy the fleet, then there wouldn't be any existence in the divine country that could defeat Kuwaibel that could wield the power as monarch dragon. This was a country that was built from the rule of fear and violence of the king named Gregor. They shouldn't be able to maintain their fighting spirit by the time the defense fleet fell.



The problem was how much time Avenst could buy with the defense fleet as the opponent. There wasn't any guarantee that Avenst wouldn't be annihilated during the time they infiltrated the palace with few elites until Kuwaibel returned to the battlefield.



Explosive sounds roared outside. Bovid and others, the air battle force was starting a super close range battle that should even be called as the dance of death. How much damage they could inflict on the defense fleet with this surprise attack would become the key of this battle.



Because Bovid understood that, surely he would be reckless. Just like how Bovid made himself into shield to accept the enemy bullet in order to save Roze and others, there was no doubt he would put his life at stake here.



「Please, everyone……be safe.」



Roze whispered that while equipping herself with firearms in Rozeria's bottom. Even though she was determined, even though she had resolve, but there was no way her heart wouldn't be pained thinking that the people she loved might die. Roze's lips that were strongly biting showed that pressure on her heart more eloquently than anything.



「Pii」



「Ku-chan……」



Kuwaibel's strong eyes.



「Roze-sama.」



「Gramps.」



Sabas's unshakable smile.



「Your majesty.」



「Roze-sama.」



Crow siblings' fearless smile.



The accompanying imperial guards also smiled similarly.



Seeing that, surely everyone in Averia, and also everyone in Rozeria, and then also the people she loved in Avenst, they were undoubtedly making the same powerful and fearless smile. Roze was convinced of that.



There wasn't even a single complain toward Roze who decided to head to this hell.



The hatch below the ship opened. Rozeria was evading the surface-to-air attacks that were starting sporadically while flying toward the palace. The scenery below that was flowing through was the townscape of the birthplace that she was seeing for the first time.



'Aa', inside her heart Roze leaked out an admiring sigh. Roze who were taken away when she was a baby didn't have any memory of the dragon kingdom, the feeling of "coming home' overflowed inside.



And then, surely such feeling was much stronger for the senior people who knew about this country compared to herself who didn't know of her birthplace.



Those people riding the sky battlecraft, those people who were looking down from the airships and mother ship, what kind of feeling they were having?



Were they holding flood of emotions? Surely the scenery wasn't exactly the same compared with in the past, so were they enraged seeing their changed motherland? Perhaps they would die in the next moment while still holding such feeling. In this battlefield where the chance of survival was remarkably low, their feeling would rain down along with the flame blast.



But, surely, not even a single one would stop flying until their last moment without a doubt.



For what sake? That was decided already.



――Aa



Like that, Roze let out her deep feeling one more time.



With an automatic rifle in one hand, she touched the barrel on her forehead and she closed her eyes as though praying.



Right now, she understood. Just what a king was, what she was. What her existence ought to accomplish.



「Thinking of the future, in order to seize the day――I make my decision. I place my important things at the two sides of the scale.」



Gregor was a king of pillage that embodied the truth of power. Control to those who obey, death to those who defy. Surely that was also one way of living.



Even Roze might be similar.



She couldn't choose everything. She had to make her choice. With her body that wasn't a god, she couldn't grasp at the ideal. Even if as the result of her choice someone would be cast away, in order to not lose everything, Roze had to make her choice.



Just like how she made herself and the soldiers who had went through joys and sorrows together with her to leap into hell, for the sake of the future, and for the sake of the people who were living for the moment.



But, she didn't think that it was mistaken. The reason was because that would be an insult toward the soldiers who answered at her will.



That was why, she would change.



「I'll change. Become a warring queen. The queen of the soldiers.」



'Someone else after me could become the kind king. In order to connect our future toward that someone, I'll become a warring king.' The powerful words of Roze that contained such feeling made Sabas's expression turned a bit lonely, the Crow siblings shut their eyes, and the imperial guards displayed a tensed expression.



Roze turned toward them and,



「Let's go. To our battlefield.」



Saying that, she leaped down without hesitation.



Sabas and others nodded at each other and they similarly leaped down following the beloved person they decided as their master by themselves.



Roze and others who jumped outside to the air naturally obeyed the planet's truth and began freefalling. The roaring sound of wind entered their ears while they spread both their arms to balance themselves.



Their distance until the ground was gone instantly and the palace was below them.



「Ku-chan-. To that terrace-」



「Piih」



When Roze spoke with a volume that didn't lose to the wind, Kuwaibel responded immediately. When Kuwaibel who was clad in silver light raised his cry, the same light immediately enveloped Roze and others too.



Lightly the body of Roze and others were liberated from the wedge of gravity. They rotated midair and took the landing stance. Kuwaibel adjusted their falling position and guided them toward the terrace nearby the highest floor of the palace.



But, at that time, dry bursting sounds resounded at the same time with the sharp sound that cut through wind. Fortunately the bullets didn't hit them, they rushed between the group toward the sky.



When they looked, there were several soldiers at the palace's garden. They were pointing at Roze and co while aiming their rifle.



「Leave this to me.」



Right after that, silver glints rained down on those soldiers. Those things that were launched cutting through the air pierced the face of the soldiers peremptorily, and then they went limp like a marionette with its strings severed.



When Roze turned her eyes at the perpetrator, he――Sabas was running his gaze vigilantly at the garden while between his fingers there were three――knife for eating held in between.


